"It's no big deal when it conflicts with my worldview, but otherwise, *huge* fucking deal.  So bad that we need an invisible, mute, impotent icon to pray to to make us feel better and trust in its 'plan'"ITT, people who don't see just how badass these responses are.  Just when I think a question has an adequate answer, someone like Chalmers comes along and shakes things up again.&gt;  I find Craig to be an excellent debater

You do?  Really? Just listening to him makes my blood boil.  He can't stay on topic and he makes no effort to understand the opponent's side of the argument.  At least thrice amongst his debates, the core of *an* argument of his has been crushed in a debate, and yet he uses the same gish-gambit with the same hashed-out, refuted arguments every new debate he attends.  Nothing he says is new or original.  You can get one soundbyte from each of his arguments, play them on a cassette tape, and have legitimate scholars argue with that\u2014it's functionally equivalent. 

The worst\u2014*worst*\u2014is that he cherry-picks quotes from his opponents and takes them blatantly out of context, yet fails to recognize (as Sean Carroll once did) when his quote-mining fails terribly.  

The man is insufferable to listen to, and the only reason he's considered respectable is because people who *think* they know how to think slurp up all of his indigestible nonsense like communion wine and call him in across the globe to playback their incoherent worldview over a microphone.&gt;Craig sounds confident even if he has no idea why he's talking about

That much I can agree on. 

&gt;The sad part is that instead of actually listening to his opponent, and intellectually engaging whatever the topic is, Craig simply stays entrenched in his position and is more concerned about winning a debate than actually advancing a positive discussion.

And that's what drives me crazy when listening to him.  He has no intention of being intellectually honest.  It sounds like everything is a game to him.&gt;Which is more plausibly True, that (P1) everything that begins to exist has a cause or that (P1') some things can begin to exist causelessly?

Answer: It *entirely* depends on what you mean by "begins to exist" (to simplify things I'm going to start calling this 'permutative existence,' given that it a matter of rearranging existing material).  If you mean "begins to exist via a new permutation of existing material" it's trivially True to say *most* things seem to behave in such a matter.  Granted, I'm hesitant to even say, under this description that *every* permutation requires a cause, since quantum weirdness begs the question of causality via form (ie., are all fluctuations in the quantum field causally linked?).  

Now, if on the other hand, you mean "begins to exist via the creation of a new material wholly orthogonal to any existing material" (I'm going to call this material existence, given that a new material wholly independent of any other material has come into being), my answer would have to be "we have no clue which is more plausible, given that we've never seen such an affair, and only one has been known to have even *possibly* occurred."  

&gt;Minimum equal footing you said. Why?

Concerning material existence (which is what this comment was directed towards): because we have never observed a formation of material existence, and at best, we know of only one that has ever existed (and have no access to the preceding conditions).

&gt;Does P1' have any support at all? It doesn't. Even if it was True we couldn't support it in principle. If something began to exist causelessly we couldn't know that was what had happened, at best we could say we had not yet identified a cause.

I'm assuming you're referring to permutative existence here?  In which case, I think the quantum weirdness addresses the issue.  Not that it's relevant to Kalam, since permutative existence is so mundane that it requires no feat of imagination to construct a Big Bang synopsis devoid of any intelligence or divine qualities. 

And yes, that's exactly what "uncaused" means: you can keep asking "but *how* if there wasn't a cause?" but the point is that the question "how" is absurd to the context.  It's like asking what the color of democracy is. 

&gt;P1' is self-contradictory: something beginning to exist causelessly is the same as nothing causing something to exist, but nothing does not have the ability to cause things to exist.

Again, you are applying causality where it need not be applied.  You're asking "how" to something that may not have a "how".  After all, that *something*, may actually have the capacity to cause itself.  After all, do you not say that a god is uncaused?  How can a god exist uncaused but an item not?  Whatever magical uncaused characteristic you'd like to apply to the uncaused god, we can readily apply to the universe that was previously *nothing.*  

And again, not that this matters, because I don't subscribe to an uncaused causal theory.  I actually subscribe to an eternal material theory: meaning the materials for spacetime and matter already existed (and have existed forever), but at the possible point of the Universe's inception, an event occurred in this other-dimensionality that brought about this permutation.  This is actually the common theory of many cosmologists and physicists. 

&gt;We don't gain anything by assuming P1'

This is a continuation of a proposition on which I do not agree.  I have nothing to address here besides pointing out that we have plenty to gain by not ruling out theories that have not been disproven (especially when the evidence is largely lacking for or against it\u2014after all, whether you refer to permutative or material existence, P1 rests on the notion that *everything* must adhere to the principle, and that's a tough premise to defend).

&gt; It's unsupportable and worthless so we have no reason to accept it, and it's nonsensical so we have reason to reject it.

Practicality is not a valid reason to reject a claim.  It's impractical to consider that nothing can travel faster than the speed of light.  It's impractical to have to rework all of physics to address new fundamental changes.  But the truth doesn't depend on practicality.  And the fact that accepting the *possible* explanation that the universe was wholly uncaused leads to a brute fact is independent of whether or not it's actually True. 

&gt;P1 is supported by everything we know of that causes other things to "begin to exist", however you understand that. 

See above.

&gt;P1' would still be unsupportable nonsense and P1 would still be the better assumption.

Also see above. 

&gt;Sure, that's a legitimate complaint, but P1 P2 C don't distinguish between divine and mundane causes, so this complaint has nothing to do with the actual content of P1 P2 C.

I'm in complete disagreement with P1, certainly when it comes to material existence, and to at least a degree of reasonable doubt when it comes to permutative existence.  So however we want to frame this, that is the issue (of many) I'm taking with Kalam. 

&gt;And is what I said unTrue? 

It is.  David Hume would like a word with your unquestioning belief in the notion of causality, and to what it could be applied.  

&gt;The assumptions are the same, the variable is who's doing the assuming, cosmologist or theologian.

This whole thing came about because I pointed out "begins to exist" is an unnecessarily dishonest phrasing, and an unwarranted claim no matter how it's interpreted. 

&gt;If you think the universe has a cause but are arguing that cause is more plausibly mundane than divine, you're still assuming P1.

My personal position is that it is the most *plausible* of the explanations out there, but I am unwilling to accept P1 as an acceptable premise for definitive argumentation on the grounds that it is an unwarranted claim.  In the same way that I think that all life evolved but don't need to accept the claim that "all life must arise from evolution" (since it's possible we may one day fabricate life).  In other words, the plausibility of the mundane origins theory does not depend on P1 being True or False.&gt;Puzzle #2 is pretty much what the fine structure constant describes about the Universe - the relative bigness of things, among a host of other elements - and yet he doesn't even mention it.

It's quite possible he isn't formally trained in physics.  As a layman of physics myself, the idea of the fine structure constant seems pretty intuitive once one learns about gravitational forces and constants, and knows a bit about spacial scaling vs. density, masses, and forces.  In short, it's possible he cares to argue this from a philosophical standpoint first, and then use scientific reasoning to supplement how actual said thought-experiments are even impossible.

&gt;He treats it as if it's irrelevant, but this magic number gives us a great many fantastic questions to explore, even in this specific subject.

I didn't get that impression.  Rather, I felt as though mentioning it was sufficient to thoroughly debunk Double Earth.  That said, what sort of questions did you have in mind?  It seems to me that once it's been established that everything can only be considered relative to everything else, we've hit the impasse to other questions. &gt;you do realise body temperature is 98.6 degrees fahrenheit

Overly anal correction here, but, 98.6 degrees F. is just the average, some people are a little warmer, and some are a little colder\u2014not that this changes anything about your statement...

Sorry my wife is a nurse and she'd never let me read that and not say anything on the matter.I'm getting 40 lashings for not addressing the content as advertised... 

[A sample of 130 individuals had an average of 98.25 degrees F. with a std. dev. of 0.73 degrees F](http://www.stat.wisc.edu/~st571-1/07-normal-4.pdf)

[By and large, we are known to typically differ by about 1 degree farenheit, and per individual can vary across a 0.6 degree range within a given day](http://www.webmd.com/first-aid/body-temperature).

If I don't reply again, it's because I'm dead. &gt;If these all check out, I'd would still be skeptical, but would find it trustworthy unless evidence presented itself that contradicted such a claim

Assuming OP was willing to die and suffer any consequence for this belief and had no history of mental illness, the question is whether you *believe* OP, not whether you think the evidence is trustworthy.  

In other words, are you saying OP's conviction would be sufficient to say that you actually believe Elvis visited him/her?
*Many* people claim to have seen Elvis after he supposedly died.  It's a common trope to claim he's still alive, to the point that it's used in jokes from time to time. 

&gt;Coupled with there being other people, throughout time and culture, who have reported similar experiences and I think the intuition here doesn't suggest much about personal revelation in the religious context.

Ok, but now consider that the only group telling us about these alleged other people are the people making the claim itself (ie, the authors of the bible).  Now consider that it wasn't written down for at least 50 years after the fact.  Now consider that most of these people had much less education concerning biases, revelatory experiences, etc.  Now consider that Mark (the earliest gospel) never recorded an actual resurrection, just an empty tomb.  Now consider that the only source we have of the event is a biased one, and no other unbiased source of that era makes anything remotely similar to that claim.  Now consider that even today many find it textually supported to propose that the resurrection was metaphorical and visionary, not actual, and that it's quite possible this is all the original believers thought as well. 

All in all, I think you're being too generous with the bandwagon appeal, without mentioning that there are other factors that detract far more such that they bring the Elvis claim back into relevance. &gt;1) Why did Einstein advocate deism?

A couple of points on that: 
1.  Since when does a single scientist have a monopoly on arguments concerning reality?  After all, there's plenty of good philosophical reasons to reject religion as well.  Not to mention, Hawking just said physics explain the universe perfectly without any god, so who's to be believed? 
2.  I think you're a bit mistaken here.  As I understand it, Einstein, like many physicists, like to refer to the cosmos and mysteries of the physical universe as "god."  It's almost more of a naturalistic pantheistic definition of god than anything deist in the sense we may think of it.  In other words, I don't think Einstein really advocated for deism, but had advocated for due respect and wonder for that natural universe. 

&gt;Why are humans so complex?

If we were any less complex, would we wonder why we weren't more so?  For that matter, if we were more complex, would we notice how we didn't need to be so complex to exist in the first place?  To me there's nothing particularly complex to the point that evolutionary biology is insufficient at providing a satisfactory explanation.  To me, complexity is relative, and we may *seem* complex simply because we don't understand ourselves, when in actuality we might be quite simple.

&gt; Why do we have humor?

Social response to show approval or excitement at something unexpected.  A physiological response to encourage discovery and positive experiences. 

&gt; Art?

A rather broad question, especially since "art" itself is hard to pin down.  My broad-strokes answer is that we wish to express and expand in our experiences of what we consider aesthetic, which is shaped by our social upbringing as well as natural inclinations.  We desire to express this because we like experiencing new things, sharing our thoughts with others, being recognized for something, seeing things in new ways, etc.


&gt;religions?

Eh, we aren't perfect.  Actual answer: our logical way of thinking is largely driven by survival.  This has led to an imperfect but optimized way of thinking that improves our chances of survival, but often colors our ability to see the world objectively. 

&gt; Passions? Wild imaginations?

History and technology seem to show us that creativity has been very evolutionarily advantageous, wouldn't you agree?  

&gt; Space travel?

See above.

&gt;All these seem way too superfluous for a random, pointless accident.

I feel I've already addressed this, but consider this too: you consider art and imagination and the like to be things of wonder, but that's in part because we don't fully understand them.  What may be impressive and seem superfluous at first glance may in fact have very practical reasons if fully understood.  Just because the function isn't immediately obvious doesn't mean that it doesn't exist.

&gt; The universe could have easily just been gas and rock.

Well technically, it is.  We're just gas and rock organized in such a way that the gas and rock considers itself special and meaningful compared to the differently organized gas and rock. 

&gt;Some spiritualists say the universe is experiencing itself through humanity and that explains why we are so complicated.

Rational people say that too.  It's just complexity coming to a point where it can observe itself.  

&gt;This makes sense but indicates a will.

How so?  It's not as though the construction of the complexity required a prior intention.  Our cognition can be largely attributed to survivability mastering itself.  Survivability is a necessary trait that exhibits itself, since things that fail to exhibit it are wiped out.  It all seems pretty necessary as a byproduct to me. 

&gt;If atheism is such common sense then why were there so many smart people like Newton, planck and einstein who believed in woo woo?

Newton lived over 200 years ago.  He didn't know what we know.  See above about Einstein (and probably Planck).  Now consider that there are plenty of people who *don't* believe in the 'woo woo'.  Study after study shows a direct correlation between education and secularism; I'll look at that far sooner than I'll take a single person's opinion, especially since I'm aware of some very smart people who don't know shit about anything other than their field. 

&gt;If the truth of atheism is obvious then why would any smart person not submit atheism?

Cognitive dissonance and a defense mechanism for fear of being wrong.  It doesn't surprise me that the majority of world religions have a sort of collateral for not accepting their brand of woo, usually in the form of hell or punishment.

&gt;Did Jesus, Buddha and Muhammad exist as depicted or were they just made up by the elite to control the masses?

False dichotomy?  But they clearly didn't exist as depicted, even theists will agree on that, because if they *all* did, they'd be contradicting one anothers' beliefs.  

&gt;I was starting to think theism is only for dumb people but then I realized that all my friends are atheist and they are all dumb bogan pot heads (bogan is australian for hillbilly) much like me except i don't do drugs. 

This is a worthless comment.  There are dumb people who come to the right conclusion on accident all the time.  I don't respect their conclusion whether or not it agrees with mine.  

&gt;So the idea that religion is just something that dumb people use to make themselves feel better seems to be negated here.

Your stupid friends (your words) have no bearing on the accuracy or validity of an argument.  

&gt;So shouldn't we assume that even plants are conscious because they display conscious behavior until we can prove that conscious is in fact created by the brain (this question relates to the woo woo of consciousness being non-local which i think most atheist would disagree with).

That's not how the None hypothesis works (at all).  But even if it were, people *have* assumed this and have tested it.  It's been proven that plants aren't conscious in any determinable way that we have considered.  

&gt;Is there anything in the universe which comes into existence then disappears for eternity? If not then what reasons do we have to believe that we will disappear for eternity after death?

Depends on what you mean by "coming into existence".  As I say all the time on here, "coming into existence" in the layman term is really only a permutation of existing material in a new form.  In that sense, things are coming into existence and (conceivably) never existing again literally every second of every day (if you consider time a dimension in the permutation, which you'd have to).

The second question doesn't make sense for a large number of reasons I won't bother getting into, because I don't accept the initial proposal. &gt; The question is the same. Do I believe the OP is telling the truth or believes to be telling the truth? It depends on if the evidence is trustworthy....One person's testimony would not get me to believe in something so outlandish.

So then one person's conviction and lack of mental illness is not considered convincing evidence.  Got it.
&gt; Well the above one is key - is one of the components of \u03b1 an ultra-fundamental unit in physics? Even a definitive 'no' answer would be something. And would lead to a bunch more questions.

Oh I didn't realize we hadn't resolved this question either way.  That is an interesting notion.

&gt;More directly is this number effectively being one of the things behind having a Universe in which distance, length and time can be perceived.

Despite the non-intuitiveness of the question, I think I see what you're driving at.  A layman such as myself would hazard a guess that such a thing could not be known unless we had at least one other universe to compare to, unless the math itself was so transparent that it could be revealed solely through derivation.Absolutely.  In fact, you can even apply the logic to the informal proof in the OP.  Take rule 3, *"If a maximally great being exists in some possible world, then being maximally great, it must exist in all possible worlds"*.  By 3 (it does not depend on 1 or 2), it's clear by "maximally great" we mean "necessary", so let's substitute that in and see what happens: 

Using the *same* S5 that Plantinga uses to conclude the proof, then, 1 reads:  

1.  It is possible that a maximally great being exists

2.  It is possible that a ~~maximally great~~ necessary being exists (by 3)

3.  ~~It is possible that~~ a ~~maximally great~~ necessary being exists (By S5 and our reduction above). 

Once you see how 1 actually smuggles in the conclusion, it's pretty clear that we ought not accept 1 outright (and to my knowledge, there's *no* reason to accept it).

Is it possible that a ~~maximally great~~ necessary being exists?  We have no idea, and there's no reason to suspect so, since a formulation of why this must be the case is entirely undefended (it actually leads into the question of "what is 'maximally great' anyway?").  In the end, it just makes the OA argument all the sillier, and Plantinga even fails for what he "aimed" to do, which was prove that his belief can be "rationally defended."  In my mind, there's nothing rational about the OA.Well said.  It's the insistence that the being must be necessary where this argument falls apart.  This necessity needs to be substantiated, otherwise the premise is utterly faulty, and the proof unsound.A case for the Hindu god Brahman, the "Cosmic Conscious".  

Premise 1: Our minds are epiphenomenal, and a direct function of our brain (rejecting 1 will still allow for the proof, as we can make metaphysical assumptions about the mind of Brahma).

2:  Therefore, consciousness is a function of brain

3:  A brain is bio-organized material

4:  Brains are capable of computation/consciousness

5:  Therefore, consciousness is a function of ordered material. 

6:  The universe is organized

6.Lemma: The universe is not purely chaotic or random\u2014there are laws and constants that govern the predictability of the universe, such that there are defined patterns that we can recognize.  Therefore, the universe is organized. /Lemma

7: Minds are characterized by external awareness, internal awareness, thinking, judgment, etc.  

8: Via the faculties of human minds, we know that the universe employs, at minimum, an internal awareness, thinking, judgment, etc.  This can be stated because humans are of the universe, and humans think, observe, make judgments.  Whether they comprise a majority of the universe is inconsequential to the fact that they employ mind faculties all the same. 

9: Employing the Cosmological Argument, we know that the creation of this consciousness could not be itself, therefore, Brahma must have existed to bring it into being via Vishnu.

10: Employing the Second Law of Thermodynamics, it's reasonable to assume this Universe (ie., dream) will come to an end in the future.

Conclusion: The Universe is a mind, at minimum employing internal processing without external perception, but possibly far more, that will come to an end.  Therefore, the Hindu God Brahman exists.

&gt;&gt;If such a God exists, then reasonable nonbelief does not exist.

&gt;Why?

Premise: a god who desires a loving relationship with its creation will make itself known to them. 

Without demonstrating a degree of trustworthy existence, it is as possible to form a meaningful relationship with this god as it is the easter bunny or santa claus.  Conceivably, such a god would have the intelligence to construct a world wherein its existence is known but the choice to follow is still present (case in point: the god of the Christian bible makes itself directly known to various characters, and yet some of these characters still defy god).

If this reasonable belief does not exist, then either a) the god does not care to be known by everyone (and therefore does not care to have a relationship with everyone), or b) is too incompetent and petty to have realistic expectations.  

Both scenarios fairly deconstruct the omni-x christian god.

&gt;&gt; Reasonable nonbelief exists.

&gt; Nice opinion

Care to refute it?  I'd say most of us here are pretty reasonable, and as an ex-christian myself I can say it wasn't for lack of "desiring a relationship," if that's what you're driving at.Of course, nobody has ever been able to demonstrate *why* anyone can reasonably reject 3.  Said rejection just a brute fact that some pretend doesn't exist.&gt; So we should look to Aquinas, for example, who might say that to love is to wish the good of something.

Except you've formed a tautology, because what does it mean to say "God is the wishing of what is good" when "good" is defined as "god's wishes" (or character, or whatever)?

But rather than play the definition game, the only way to reasonably reject #2 that I can see is to demonstrate how it is in any way "good" (however you wish to define it), that some people will have eternal happiness and others will not on account of a factor entirely out of their control.

Of course, you can try to sidestep the whole issue by becoming a universalist, but then you also remove all relevance of the faith you carry, because even if "believing here on earth" enriches your life just a little, then it isn't "good" that some people are born with this unfair advantage to believe while others are not.&gt; What evidence or arguments exist compelling belief that No God exists?

You've oversimplified the problem, since this is a proof against a benevolent god.  That said, the Problem of Evil is a plenty good case against any benevolent god.  

Also, do you believe Unicorns exist?  Why or why not? Is it reasonable not to believe this?  If not, why is it reasonable to believe otherwise (ie., that they *do* exist)?  

Answer those questions (honestly) and we'll see if *you're* approaching this reasonably.  

&gt;Per your comments, since God is Spirit (and so is our soul) in essence

Please define 'spirit' and 'soul' so that I can understand what you're claiming here.

&gt;it seems perfectly plausible that God want's us to seek Him in spirit by our free-will.

I've mentioned this many times here, but if you're referring to Libertarian Free Will, you're going to have to define it for me and demonstrate (reasonably) why you think it exists.  If you mean compatibilism, then the problem from above still carries itself forward, since belief is not a choice of our own powers, but a consequence (ultimately) of the situation we were born into.  

&gt;I see why God would NOT impose upon us or become some physical fact that is just there taken for granted.

Are you forced to form relationships with everything you recognize as physical facts?  Then why is it that god needs the special pleading ("if we all knew him, we'd *have* to follow him)?  I didn't see Solomon or Judas or Lot following a much more present god than anything we've been given.

&gt;Why would God imposing himself as some brute fact serve HIS purpose of us FREELY seeking a spiritual relationship?

Because recognizing something exists is not the same as forming a relationship.  James 2:19 (NIV):

&gt;&gt;You believe that there is one God. Good! Even the demons believe that--and shudder.

But lacking recognition makes a relationship *impossible* (can you form a relationship with the easter bunny?).  Failing to recognize this either makes god unjust or incompetent, but either way it doesn't bode well for an omni-x christian god.
&gt;Yeah, it seems they just slap on "necessary" part because they would like it to be so. But really, I'm not sure anything exists necessary. At least, I don't know if I can think of anything.

There's simply no way to prove it nor demonstrate it.  And time after time I ask theists to substantiate *why* x qualities are necessary, and the best I get is an appeal to tradition ("this is the classical definition of maximal greatness"), which tells me nothing and makes no case for its relevancy.  

And actually, it's pretty simple to disprove, even if we're only employing "maximality" given a set of accessible universes, since I can always conceive of a logically possible universe that is utterly lacking in one such quality (thereby removing its necessity, or making its capacity at the "necessary" level all the weaker).&gt; He believed, like most Aristotelians, that the good of something was a feature of its essence and not something dictated by God.

Then I'm not really sure what "wishing the good" of something means, except that a thing be itself...or else that "goodness" is a quality wholly unique from the essence, but characterized *in* the essence.

The former case makes your definition tautological (and removes any god to be considered worth praising), because it implies the things that happen, however they do, are "good".  

The latter case is just a level of indirection from the same problem as before: nothing has been solved.  If "good" is not purely a representation of the essence itself, then it exists as a property, and we are fair to assess when something is lacking in that property in the essence of a thing.  The situation at hand (people going to hell or being annihilated for not *believing*) is one such thing lacking "goodness" to an appropriate degree from a benevolent god.I thought he was a simulationist?  Maybe it is similar... it's all bollocks in my opinion.&gt;Nonsense. The difference between atheism and theism is not God's benevolence.

But the argument presented (from OP) is one against said benevolent god.  Plus, my rejection of a god altogether follows (in part) from the lack of benevolence, since lacking this feature makes any god irrelevant. 

&gt;Really? Then provide exactly why a benevolent God could not have sufficient moral reasons to permit limited suffering in this life? Otherwise, you have no case.

What "benevolent" reason is there for a helpless child in a war-torn village to die, afraid and utterly alone, three days after its parents, from starvation, after watching them get brutally raped and murdered, when nobody discovered the child until long after it, too, had died?  If you want to employ the "mysterious ways" argument, you're going to have to defend how it isn't special pleading.  Otherwise you're the one with "no case".

&gt;Unicorn have no ontological standing or foundation in reality.

That's great.  Neither does god.  What case do you have (besides "by definition") for god having an ontological foundation? 

&gt;Unicorns are physically comprised and located, yet never physically detected

Who said my unicorns are physical? 

&gt;Unicorns have no necessity

So what?  A) That has nothing to do with existence (trees aren't necessary either) B) So far as any case has been made, *nothing* has necessity... at least nothing that actually exists.  If you're pleading to Plantinga's OA, that's the whole problem about his proof.

&gt;Unicorns provide no explanatory power

Neither do trees.... but they exist.  Unless you mean they're superfluous (non interactive), in which case, I have some bad news for your case for god too...

&gt;Unicorns are known to be intentionally fiction....

Did you think it odd I equated god with Unicorns?  Also, this is a relatively new revelation: they were thought to be real for many many years, as well as other fictional creatures.  

&gt;Now what evidence and arguments can you sustain to justify your belief that no God exists?

Your rejection of unicorns can be directly applied to god.  It's on you to defend the differences you claim exist that I pointed out.&gt;Nope. There is no equivalence of evidence for negation. I gave ~~sound evidence~~ __logical premises__ to justify belief no Unicorns exist. ~~You~~ *We* offered a bunch of slop deflections. Infinite bad objections are possible, but you need a ~~valid~~ __sound__ one. (corrections mine)

You really need to understand the difference of soundness versus validity.  I can make valid logical constructions all day about *anything,* it's not going to suddenly change my belief that these things exist.  The problem you, and every other theist has, is the complete and utter weakness in the soundness of the arguments (harken back to the "not a shred of evidence" position).

You lack any and all justification in *all* of the premises you just provided for me (that's why I "sloppily" deflected them).  You seem to either be ignoring or not comprehending what my "sloppy deflections" really were, so let me spell them out for you a little simpler: 

-  "Ontological founding" cannot just be *defined* as such, it needs to be established.  Please establish for me how something is ontologically foundational, without simply (directly or indirectly) invoking definition.  If it depends on a "metaphysical world view" I'm happy to point out to you that even this is not something we can exist willy-nilly.  There are sound metaphysical positions, and unsound ones.  This again needs evidence. 

-  "Necessity" is yet another trait that needs to a) be established and b) be shown to actually be the case.  See, the thing about the possible worlds argument for necessity, is that it must be shown that such a trait is maximally True in *all* logically possible worlds.  Nobody has ever demonstrated why the characteristics of god are in any way modally necessary (because, I think, they can't).

-  "Explanatory power" is the most suspect of them all.  That's literally implying a god-of-the-gaps thinking.  *Especially* since there are plenty of atheistic positions that require __no__ invocation of a god for explanatory power.  What a ridiculous and nonsensical argument to attempt to use. 

&gt;You provided no evidence to warrant belief no God exists.

Here it is, since you seemed unable to see it before: 

That which, in every way, appears and shares the characteristics of something that does not exist, far more likely does not exist itself.  In other words, that which lacks all soundness probably doesn't exist.

&gt;Intellectual laziness and burden shifting isn't evidence.

The fact that you think I was attempting to burden shift tells me all I need to know about how this conversation will carry forth.  How about you go read up on the differences of "validity", "soundness", "arguments" and "evidence," and then come back when you've established how any of the arguments you have for god are actually sound?

edit: Your lack of knowledge on the subject got me sidetracked, I had one final point: 

Do you notice anything yet?  Have you observed any characteristic about the back-and-forth we're having?  I'm raising academic, well-defined refutations to the claims you hold.  That is not the characteristic of "nonreasoned" belief my friend.  Wherever you got the idea that all atheists are blind, unlearned, or incapable of believing because they aren't as duped as you are is simply laughable.  The fact that I can reasonably reject your claims on lack of soundness tells me all I need to know on the supposed god's inability to make itself believable, which once again raises the entire premise of OP's argument.  

Considering that you won't be able to establish any soundness for your arguments for god, what does that say about god's believability, and therefore immorality for condemning a set of people who can't believe it's real? &gt;Not necessarily. If this action would cause this world to cease the best of all possible worlds, God wouldn't carry it out.

Until you can make a case for *how* this would cease to make the world the best of all possible worlds, all you've done is special pleading.  It's not enough to say it's *possible* that this would make the world worse, you need to establish it definitively.  Otherwise, you're using conjecture (read: special pleading) to defend your position.  And any reasonable person shouldn't do that.

&gt;But theists argue that their belief is reasonable - it's the atheists who are unreasonable in not accepting the arguments for God's existence.

That's not an argument, that's a claim.  You actually need to defend that position.  I'll cut to the chase: for all logically valid arguments the theist can produce, not a single one has ever been established as *sound*.  That makes their position very reasonably suspect, while the position of holding out until a *sound* argument comes forth retains the reasonability needed to be acceptable. 

&gt;lel, I thought the burden of proof is on the one making a claim?

They do.  Here's mine:

1.  It is reasonable to reject claims that lack all soundness

2.  Every theistic argument or claim lacks soundness, therefore they are all rejected. 

3.  It is reasonable to assume that something that lacks all evidence or sound argument whatsoever does not exist (lest we also believe in santa claus, leprechauns, and unicorns). 

4.  By 2, there are no sound arguments for god.

5.  By 4 and 3, it is *reasonable* to therefore reject any and all god claims.

C: The atheistic position is reasonable. 

I thought the "no shred of evidence" that we atheists *love* bringing up all the time would have made our share of the burden of proof pretty obvious, but if you need me to spell it out for you, I'm fine with that too. 

Now, refute it.  If your objection is with 2 (I'll bet it is), please read up on the differences of "logically consistent" vs. "sound", and then come back fully prepared to defend how the premises of your logically consistent argument are True.

And before we delve too deep into this rabbit hole, I'll pre-empt (so I can quote this in the future and show that my oh-so-smartiness knew it'd come to this) with the fact that you *need* to establish the premises as *reasonably* True, meaning it's irrational to reject the premise, and that the premise (or the evidence of the premise) is demonstrably True (reasonably more likely to be True) in our universe.  In short, making the case that it's *possible* the premise is True, but have 0 ways of determining whether or it more or less likely to be True than False, isn't enough, so don't waste my time if that's all you'll be able to establish.Don't we all?  I do it just because I love hearing ad hominem and how True it must be because a ~~magic~~ factual book says so.&gt;It's possible to independently come up with arguments for God's existence, although of course not for the Christian God specifically, but certainly for the God of Classical Theism.

You see the problem with this statement, right?  

Here, let me see if I can help you... "It's possible to independently come up with *arguments* for scooby-doo's existence".  

Do you see the problem yet?  You're lacking the *soundness* quality, and that makes your position unreasonable.  Provide for us a *sound* argument for your position, and you'll get us to consider your case as reasonable. Then it's *possible* there's a dickish god out there, but I see no reason to form a religion around it.  Of course, there are plenty of other reasons not to accept deism, etc., but this argument refutes any idea of a benevolent god handily.&gt; I noticed you still have no evidence for your position and I defeated your sloppy objections. All you have is posturing and feigning pretenses.

Either you're not reading my comments, or you're not understanding them, and I'm not sure which is worse.... As I said before, the lack of even a shred of *evidence* or *sound arguments* is plenty of reason to reject any god claim.  It's why I compared god to an immaterial magical unicorn.  There is as much evidence for this unicorn as there is for a god, if you consider belief in unicorns "reasonable", then I suppose that's where you and I will have to part ways. 

Also, I raised at least 3 issues against your "arguments"(?), that you are entirely neglecting (not to mention, you never told me how that dying kid makes this world the "best possible").  Stating arguments that are logically sound according to premises is only as useful as the truth of the premises themselves.  I'm asking you (third time now) to defend these premises you think are True and can be related to a god.  I'm not going to list them again, you can find them in my previous reply.

&gt;Posturing is not evidence or a reasoned justification for your belief position that no God exists.

The fact that you think I'm posturing tells me you actually don't even comprehend what I've been saying.  I might as well be talking to a wall, for all the productivity we've made these past three comments.  Tell me, what is a *sound* argument, and how does it differ from a *valid* one?  Can you tell me why, so far, you've only given me a hodgepodge of premises with no foundation or support?  Until you can actually make a case for all these alleged attributes you ascribe to god (and not a unicorn), you've given me nothing.  You've just listed a bunch of random attributes and called it meaningful.

&gt;Until you can provide such evidence and arguments, your posturing is just noise.

So I'm wondering if maybe you just can't read.  Would you like me to reiterate my position?  My evidence against any god claim is that there is __no__ evidence of god to speak of.  Lacking this, believing in such a thing is as reasonable as believing in magical unicorns.  Since you have an incredibly hard time understanding what I'm saying, let me point out (again), that your list of attributes is not evidence (it wasn't even arguments), but a list of unfounded premises.  To continue the discussion, you need to defend them and explain why these premises are *actually* True. 

&gt;Listen up atheist

Whoa, edgy. 

&gt;Explanatory power and scope are absolute KING in evidence.

Uh-huh... yes...  I don't disagree.  You didn't understand my argument, did you?  Your implication is that *god* is needed to explain certain things, and I'm saying there isn't a single thing that needs to invoke god as an explanation.  Do you understand what I'm saying *now*, or do I need to ELI3?

&gt;They are capable of learning. They are just propagandized into Naturalism, myopic and follow the herd.

That's a really odd view that probably needs some further investigation.  But this isn't the time nor the place.

&gt;I 'got that idea' from about two decades flattening hundreds of atheists in debate.

You did?  Debating about god?  I have a particularly hard time believing that.  Maybe you *thought* you did because you can't understand what we're trying to say (if this thread is any evidence of that).

&gt;I find atheists to be overwhelmingly myopic, intellectually dishonest and lacking proper reasoning skills. I prove it on the battlefield regularly.

And when they aren't?  When they approach the question open-minded but skeptical?  When they ask the questions and come to a contrary conclusion?  According to you, they're either still unreasonable, or else (somehow), not comprehending the argument.  Both are contrived claims that need further support if you wish to tout them about. 

&gt;What claim?

The premises used to argue that god exists.

&gt;Do you understand the difference between beliefs and claims son?

I know at least one of us does...

&gt;What makes theistic BELIEF in God a CLAIM?

The premises used to argue for the CLAIM that god exists.  Do you understand yet? 

&gt;Why is theistic belief a claim while atheistic BELIEF is not a claim or even a belief about God's existence, but a 'rejection of a claim' - that is not a claim.

If you understood the clarification above, you'll see why I don't even need to respond to this question.

&gt;Yes, atheists are incredibly dishonest and intellectually weak.

Nice ad hominem.  Please, now go back, take a breath, *read what I'm __actually__ arguing*, and then address *those* points.  Right now, you have (as I've said many times now) a hodgepodge of unfounded premises, lacking any *soundness* to any of the arguments I predict you'd like to use for your theism. 

&gt;You won't get a free pass with me son. Book it.

How old do you think I am, exactly?What I mean is that, in a vacuum, if this were the only argument against theism, I'd probably be some kind of deist or anti-theist (in a different sense than it means now), because this god is clearly some kind of psychopathic asshole. 

Naturally, I'm atheist for more reasons than just the argument offered by OP.  &gt;Demonstrate anything I don't understand or have not read! 

You haven't replied to my challenge of special pleading concerning the starving child.  You haven't demonstrated that you understand the difference between "soundness" vs. validity.  You haven't defended any of the ad hoc premises you are using to establish that god is unique from a unicorn\u2014you've just stated them.  And all the while, I've been asking for it, you've been pouting and throwing a tantrum.  Let's stay on topic, shall we? 

&gt;a) Your argument is in fact a whopping argument from ignorance. An absence of evidence would not be evidence of absence. 

Ever heard of Russell's teapot?  Do you believe there's a dragon in my garage?  Both of these things lack complete evidence, and I can make logically consistent arguments for them.  Besides, I wouldn't be so crass as to reduce the argument into one simple quip about evidence.  The problem is that the *proposed evidence* that should be there is absent, and as a result, the figure we are seeking is equal in character to a non-existent entity.  When given an entity lacking all characteristics of existing, the logical conclusion is that it doesn't exist.  If you disagree with this, I don't see how you can reasonably reject my "dragon in a garage" claim while accepting a "god behind the universe" claim.  That's just inconsistent (read: irrational). 

&gt;b) Massive evidence of God exists.

It does?  Please enlighten me on the *evidence* of god (read: *sound* arguments or empirical evidence, not "logically valid" statements).  If it's so massive, this should be easy for you. 

&gt;That's why your atheism is a marginal minority belief.

Nice bandwagon fallacy.  To counter your own silly tactic here, I should mention that the secular population is the largest it's ever been, and is steadily growing every year, largely in the educated populations. 

&gt;In fact, I defeated your failed False equivalence between God and Unicorns.

I feel ridiculous having to point this out, but saying it doesn't suddenly make it so.  You have to actually *establish the soundness* of these differences.  So far as I can tell, you've just listed terms you'd like to apply to god to make it a case of special pleading.  Have you forgotten what I asked of you (again proof you aren't reading)?  I need some *soundness* to the claim that god is an ontological foundation, or that god is the best possible explanation for something, or that god is in some way modally necessary.  

&gt;You blundered again claiming a premise is a claim. Premises are propositional, not claims.

Um, what?  Claims are propositions of fact.  A premise is a proposition required to carry forth a line of reasoning.  A premise is a subset of "claims."  

&gt;You need to defeat them. 

This doesn't make any sense.  Premises are propositions.  You need to *establish them* (in other words, they need to be shown to be True).  Otherwise, your "evidence" isn't sound\u2014and therefore not evidence at all. 

&gt;I don't need to.

You do if you want to make your arguments credible and your position actually sound.  The burden of proof is on the one making a claim.  A premise is a proposition that needs to be founded.  Otherwise, I can (as I do now) reject that premise on the grounds that it makes no sense and needs support.  Would an example help?  

Here's a premise: If oranges exist, then god does not.  

Do you reject that premise?  You (hopefully) do, because it's not grounded in reality and doesn't make for a sound argument.  The burden of proof is then on *me* to establish how it would be True.  Naturally, I can't do that because I don't think this is so, but as it is, your list of premises are precisely in that predicament.  You have no basis for making them, and any reasonable person would ask why you propose them to begin with.

&gt;You have failed to demonstrate why God could not have sufficient moral reasons?

What does this even mean?  My answer is that there *is no conceivable* reason for it to be __more__ moral to let a child die like that than to somehow save it or reduce its misery.  What's more, even if there were a conceivable moral reason, the universe doesn't seem to exhibit any indication that god actually would operate that way.  It's on you, the proposer, to come up with a moral reason.  You can't just say, "maybe there is one"\u2014that's shifting the burden of proof.

&gt;You simply don't know what the hell you are yapping about. You are just regurgitating

One of us definitely is.... I don't think I've been asking any complicated questions here, and every time you ask for *further* evidence or reasoning on my end, I provide it.  When, in the last (is it four now?) four comments have you actually gone back to defend any of these ad hoc premises you've used?  When, in the last four comments, have you defended the moral questions, or demonstrated you comprehend the difference between a valid argument and a sound one?  Not once, I'm adding new content with each comment, you're just parroting what you've already said. 

&gt;Nope, I argued God is THE BEST EXPLANATION (not logically necessary), therefore it is evidence for God.

Best explanation for what?  Logically necessary or best, it makes no difference.  A god is not needed in either explanatory sense. 

&gt;Again, you purposefully twisted my explanation to something you know I did not argue.

Allow my clarification above to demonstrate that your choice of "best explanation" changes nothing in the contention.  

&gt;You are doing this to evade admitting the truth about your previous False claim that I have proven to you.

A) You haven't said anything I haven't heard, read, or once believed 100 times over  B) Again with the ad hominem, there's no intentional evasion going on here; you're just bad at defending your position and making clear why you believe the things you do  C) You haven't proven anything.  You haven't even said anything of substance for quite some time.  You keep parroting and trying shift the burden of proof when all I'm asking for is *very* basic: defend the premises you brought up in the beginning, and demonstrate why it's unreasonable to reject them (as I do now, because you haven't given any reason to accept them).

&gt;Typical atheist dishonesty.

Only one of us is depending on ad hominem as part of the argument in this debate, and it isn't me.&gt; Typically we only assign psychological projections to beliefs we know are False. Being young and having an absence of sense data, your brain will attempt to fill the void, this isn't anything unknown. I would group your young god experience as False also do you a tendency to hallucinate. The existence of fake dollar bills does not mean that therefore real dollars do not exist.

But this is bullshit, because if I had been on this site a year ago and explained all of *my* personal experiences with god, you'd have likely rallied behind me.  Anecdotally, I was considered a pillar of faith in my community, a leader, and someone who had their head on straight but "knew" god to be real\u2014hell, my own family was convinced I'd never stop believing, and my friends always recognized me as a role model for someone who carries the faith out earnestly.

You're employing some sort of special pleading here to argue that personal god-experiences can be legitimate, but you need to demonstrate a way by which "real" and "fake" can be objectively determined.  If not, then I'm just going to point out that it's more likely that *every* experience is fake, given that we can explain both brain cause and function, and that personal bias will misrepresent that which the objective data contradicts. It does if it gives any sort of benefit to those who do believe vs. those who don't.  But lacking this would make for a strange god, wouldn't it?  It would be a god that is seemingly indifferent to being known; sounds like it wouldn't matter if I did or didn't believe.Because either it doesn't go out of its way to form a relationship with us (what if you thought your mother was dead and she never bother corrected you?), or it favors us who are more easily convinced of its existence.  Neither aloofness nor favoritism is loving.Anyone who claims eternal salvation or eternal punishment for a subset of people based on belief in a god.&gt; I am saying that the god-experiences are epistemologically sound

In what way are they epistemologically sound other than "I have an experience and I define it to be religious"?  There's nothing sound about calling someone *else's* experience fake when you have no objective standard by which to determine "True" from "False."

This statement: 

&gt;The existence of fake dollar bills does not mean that therefore real dollars do not exist

is worthless unless you have some definition by which we can collectively agree on a *real* dollar bill.  If, by definition, your "real" experiences require supernatural supposition or interaction, then you've defeated your own point, because supernaturalism has to first be demonstrated, and anyone is justified in calling them *all* "fake".

&gt;Had we been on here years ago, you would have had me mocking and calling you an idiot.

Not sure how this is relevant at all.  My point had entirely to do with what was considered a "real religious experience," yours just seems to be referencing the past.&gt; That doesn't seem to be what /u/B_anon[1]  is doing. He's pointing out that the OP's reasoning is based on the genetic fallacy.

I didn't get the impression that the argument was solely about origins.  It seems to me to be one part problematic origins, one part empirical knowledge about human psychological subjectivity (and weakness in interpreting illusion.)

&gt;Likewise, just because all these religions are unjustified and explained by standard human failings doesn't mean that no gods exist

I don't disagree.  But that's not what anon was arguing.  His analogy, "[t]he existence of fake dollar bills does not mean that therefore real dollars do not exist," implies that there are some religious experiences that are therefore real.  If we take the argument in a vacuum, that makes no sense until "real" has been properly defined.  If we are capable of ruling out certain experiences as hallucinogenic, then the metrics must be defined such that we judge one's on claims to "real" experiences as well. 

&gt;Every religion in the world could be wrong for obvious reasons, but that doesn't rule out the idea that there are gods hiding somewhere. To rule that out, we have to use other lines of reasoning.

Again, I think you are giving anon too much credit here (or misunderstanding my point).  This isn't about atheism/theism here, this is about "True" versus "fake" religious experiences, and how, lacking any concrete definition and objective means of determining between the two, it seems more plausible to me that *all* are fake, for lack of failing to show how they are *not* fake.

*Once* that has been established, we can go on and talk about which god, if any, these "real" experiences apply to; but it is a meaningless question until then.&gt; Principle of Credulity.

Just because a guy named Swinburne establishes his idea as a "principle" doesn't suddenly make it epistemologically valid.  Otherwise, I'd like to just employ /u/segFault11235's "Principle of Incredulity."  But in all seriousness, that's what skepticism is about: you consider an option from all angles, and if there's reason to doubt or consider the statement untrustworthy, you apply it.  Which, on the surface, you'd think Swinburne would agree with, but apparently he didn't understand skepticism because he considered personal testimony to be a valid source or explanatory power for a subjective experience.  Any psychologist will tell you why "what x claims to have 'seen'" or imagined seeing will be a very problematic basis for gaining truth (making it.... epistemologically suspect). 

&gt;Not sure what you are trying to say here.

Yeah, that's the problem.  You haven't considered that, in order to equate on your analogy for "fake" vs "real" hundred dollar bills, you need to establish that there is such a thing as a *real* hundred dollar bill first; something you haven't done for religious experiences. 

&gt;a)good consequences: leading to reinforcing a new life marked by virtues such as wisdom, charity and humility

This can be conflated with a change in positive outlook.  There is no implication that this experience is any different than a change in perspective.  Studies time and again have shown that outlook can produce the exact same result.

&gt;b)effect on others

Same problem.

&gt;c)depth, profundity &amp; "sweetness" of the experience

Same problem.  All I need to do is couple the change in outlook with a positive aesthetic experience.

&gt;d)agreement with orthodox talk

No clue what this means\u2014at all.

&gt;e)resemblances to paradigmatic mystical experiences

Given that our brains are all wired similarly and we tend to share a similar outlook on the aesthetic, it stands to reason that we will find similar things profound and inspiring.  Therefore, if, perchance, a religion evolved around aesthetic experiences, it's no surprise that religion *coincidentally* also inspires.  I mean, think about what your faith asks you to do to see god: increase your positive outlook (see the good in others), see the "wonder of god's power" (observe aesthetic creativity/nature), "listen to god's voice" (act charitably).  None of these things are exclusive to religion, and none of these require a supernatural invocation to distinguish them from the very mundane *positive outlook by aesthetic inspiration*.  

&gt;f)consideration of pronouncements of authority, it is not True that the God-experiment will accept every experience as veridical.

Which is absurd.  Because this quite literally means that we are invoking a bias "authority" to determine the veracity of an experience.  What are the odds that most christian "authorities" are going to verify christian experiences but denounce other faiths/secular experiences?  What about zen buddhist monks, or muslims?  This criteria is laughably transparent, and fundamentally questionable.  If it's an *objective* criteria, you need objective resources to determine its veracity.  Including this just weakens your entire argument. 

In short, your criteria is not rigorous enough, least of all because all these attributes can be readily explained in natural terms *in this present day* (or else brought in by an appeal to authority). 

&gt;The experiences are all first hand, the same with ordinary sense experience, how can you justify some experiences and not others without a double standard?

Justifying the experience is not the same as saying that experience maps back onto reality in a meaningful way.  I can take LSD and see flying marshmallows, that doesn't mean that it suddenly can't be refuted if I start saying that marshmallows fly.  People experience emotions and inspiration, that's fine.  The issue I take is by implying it must be religious or god-inspired in some way.  That needs to be established beyond just the claim itself. 

&gt;People interpret experiences in different ways, I don't see your point as relevant.

It's 100% relevant if you want to start making claims about reality.  People interpret experiences wrong *all* the time; that's why we need neuroscientists and psychologists to break down the behavior and perceptions.  If you want to just leave it as "I had an aesthetic experience and I'm deeming it 'religious' because my religion is meaningful to me", be my guest.  But your problem is the implication that we should actually *believe* someone's religious experiences as fundamentally meaningful, *separate* from a purely simple aesthetic experience.  That has some deep flaws that I'm trying to point out to you.

&gt;A number of atheists have come out saying they have had experiences of the supernatural also.

That's hysterically irrelevant, and I'm inclined to call their testimony into question.  Just because we agree about theism doesn't mean that I think every atheist is smart, or knows what they're talking about.  People can be right for the wrong reasons.  

&gt;Re premise 5: organisation is necessary for conscientious, but not sufficient.

I agree, and I'm not sure how someone would shoe-horn that.  I'm not good at bullshitting.   

&gt;And we obviously can't just accept the cosmological argument.

That one was a wink to theists ;).&gt; All sense experiences can only be verified by other sense experiences

This is wrong.  Sense experiences can never be verified.  They can only be comparatively related.  We deem some things more trustworthy by their consistency, but that's about as good as it gets.  If we really want to trust our senses, we need to a) assume they somehow reflect reality and b) use that basic reflection to then use objective facts about reality to determine which senses accurately reflect said reality.  For instance, if I dream that I saw pigs flying, I may be able to relate my senses back to that memory once I'm awake and justify that I was hallucinating.  But if I had that dream every night?  Things get much fuzzier until we employ some sort of objective standard even back onto the only thing we know we have: sense datum.  

(And for the record, the objective standard cannot be chosen willy-nilly.  Presuppositionalism does not work because it does not adhere to the rigorous methodology of logical thinking.  In short it is logically inconsistent, and if we at least trust logic to be objective, that's how we deem our methodology). 

&gt;Are you trying to refer to brute facts that exist outside ourselves?

Not sure what this means....

&gt;Similarly, all religious experiences can only be verified by other religious experiences.

There's many problems with this statement.  I can say: all hallucinations can only be verified by other hallucinations\u2014it presupposes some hallucinations are actually reflecting reality, and can objectively measure other hallucinations.  Or, maybe it doesn't, but then you stating this adds nothing to the conversation.

&gt;I do think the case is strongest and longest traditions - the Judeo-Christian worldview.

This is an appeal to tradition.  We used our "knowledge" of alchemy for hundreds of years and related it back to other knowledge of alchemy.  It was still completely wrong.  Plus, if you're *really* swayed only by tradition, you should become a shaman, since shamanist religions are the longest standing; I'd say start with Shintoism, since it's still considered a world religion.

&gt;It's unclear to me what the issue is with the principle of credulity and I'm on a mobile right now.

It's asking us to be generous to incredible claims.  It's one thing to say: "I had an experience that was aesthetic and beautiful, and I'm calling it religious because my religion is meaningful to me."  I can't refute that because it's simply a personal valuation on a known phenomenon, though I am justified in personally viewing it as just an aesthetic experience.  

It's very different to say: "You should believe me when I say 'God literally spoke to me inside my head' or 'God literally made me overcome with emotion'".  I have very good reasons not to believe that, least of all because I believe god doesn't exist.  What it asks us to accept is that a phenomenon we *know* to manifest itself as personal experience irrespective of religion or creed, is *actually* special and different because the person having the experience claims to know it's from real god (coincidentally the god they happen to believe in).  That's a supremely problematic 'principle'.

&gt;So, how can you verify sense experience without religious experience and not have a double standard?

This doesn't make any sense.  *Every* experience is a sense experience, including a religious one.  When you dream or hallucinate, that too is a sense experience.  I'm not sure how you can meaningfully separate "religious" from "sense" experience without invoking "sense data" in the former.

&gt;If you insist on brute facts, the same could be said of the Bible.

I don't, you just think there's some dichotomy is there that isn't. 

&gt;Your reference to neuroscientist and other professionals relys on their testimony, failing your own framework.

No, it doesn't.  It relies on fMRI data, brain damage studies, double blind population studies with rigorous statistically significant values (that support the findings of the other two resources), which *anyone* has access to and *anyone* can research for themselves\u2014without any special intermediary authority.  This is far from depending on a bunch of people just story-telling or recalling from memory what they think about something.  But once you grant imperfection, the cracks in the flaws come pouring through, because now that weak reason of special pleading (it *has* to be good because god is *perfect*) is now subject to scrutiny. 

In other words, if god is imperfect, he's subject to scrutiny, and anyone with half a brain can see just how much of a fuck-up he is, given the current state of things.  &gt; So you think that omnibenevolent means never allowing any negative to exist?

Except this is a False dichotomy, because the world we live in is clearly not one in which every it of suffering is necessary.  

I mean, I guess you could defend it, but you would have to define (and *soundly* prove) god as omnibenevolent *first* so you can then special plead that all suffering is necessary, and I don't see how you can possibly do that.  See, what I find on here is that most people who argue for omnibenevolence claim it as such because it's a "necessary* trait that must exist.  

Do you believe that omnibenevolence is modally necessary?  If not, how do you soundly demonstrate your claim that god is omnibenevolent, without ad hoc presupposing it to be the case (presuppositionalism is frowned on 'round these parts). Well, we are mostly white males that occupy this site.  It's not like reddit it a nice neat sample slice of the population, especially on debate religion&gt; I just enjoy spanking atheists. I make no bones about it.

Like the last time you [fell off the face of the earth](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3nmbjd/theists_what_do_you_think_about_the_argument_from/cvqky92) (I'm glad I at least had some of your quotes that I referenced in my comments, since you retreated and deleted all of yours) and never even *once* defended the myriad of challenges I raised towards you?  Even after you shifted the burden of proof and I acquiesced, provided *additional* argumentation to my position, and then raised the challenge again?  You really do have an active imagination. 

&gt;Now, I understand atheists are masters at deflection, intellectually lazy and unable to justify their position, so they want to start squabbles among their opposition.

Bravery level: so. 

&gt;However, the difference between atheism and theism is not the difference between whether Crest or Colgate is best. The difference is between whether toothpaste exists or not.

You spent lots of words saying nothing new.  We all know this.  The point is, if you can discredit colgate and discredit crest, then neither of those should be defending their positions, should they?  They should be arguing for either a) some *other* kind of toothpaste that does exist or b) that the idea of toothpaste makes no sense (to strain the analogy).

edit: [I like to think it was you who was spanked.  Again, we'll let the readers decide](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3nznkh/theists_which_of_you_is_right_and_why_are_other/cvvglir)&gt;I think if He existed and he could admit His faults to us, that would strengthen our relationship.

Well, for one, it would prove he's real.  And secondly, depending on how those faults were justified, we may or may not be able to forgive his mistakes.  But in either case, I agree 100%: an aloof miscreant makes for much less inspired devotees than a present, honest, imperfect being does.&gt;You are lying. I deleted nothing and have no reason to retreat after smashing you in debate.

Wow, this is amazingly sad.  [Here's](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3nmbjd/theists_what_do_you_think_about_the_argument_from/cvpszxn) a link to the beginning of the conversation. 

[Here's](http://imgur.com/a/EkYZF) a set of screenshots of our back-and-forth from just the other day.  Just in case you decide to delete those comments too.  

I mean... if you're going to be wrong, at least be honest about it.  This is tragically sad my friend.  It's got all the semblance of a troll.

&gt;Demonstrate anything I argued that you defeated. You cannot.

You failing to read or understand my argument is not the same thing as you actually defeating anything (except maybe your own credibility at understanding your own position).  

&gt;Which challenge can I NOT defeat?

Read [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3nmbjd/theists_what_do_you_think_about_the_argument_from/cvqky92), to revisit where you failed before.  Actually read it this time, why don't you?  Since I know you won't, here's *one* of the challenges you failed to defend: 

&gt;&gt;You keep parroting and trying shift the burden of proof when all I'm asking for is very basic: defend the premises you brought up in the beginning, and demonstrate why it's unreasonable to reject them

Remember now? 

&gt;Get ready to be exposed again son.

Oh, we're all *very* eager to see how this plays out.  Come join me.  Much fun will be had, I guarantee it.

edit: don't bother deleting this time either.

[Here's what you just said, in case you try to retreat again](http://imgur.com/a/HYqww).  I'm going to be your best friend by the end of this.Why what?  Why the imbalance in samples?  Probably because reddit is hipstery and only semi-famous and permits freedom of speech which likely gets it banned in many places.  It also caters to english-speakers. &gt; If a being proved to us that he was more powerful than all of us, but he wasn't perfect...he may not need our forgiveness. We'd still have to do what he'd say in order to be rewarded and not punished.

Only if you want to bow down to a tyrant.  IMHO, I'd say "fuck that guy" and take the punishment like someone who bears the sense of deciding one's own destiny.  After all, that guy made me that way anyway. &gt;I think it's difficult to argue for omnibenevolence with people on the internet, since their idea of "good" is not necessarily the same as mine.

You can very readily do what any reasonable philosopher has done for ages: define it, see if it's an acceptable and well-defined idea, and then actually make arguments on it.  I don't see what's inherently difficult about that. 

&gt;I usually argue for it in terms of authority.

Care to be more specific?  Without a rigorous definition you'll be accusing me of attacking the wrong thing and I'll be accusing you of retreating with vagueness.  Without a rigorous definition, it also makes your position very dubious, since it sounds like special pleading to something that doesn't even make sense. 

&gt;God is that than which there can be nothing greater.

Greater is a comparative term.  I'm not entirely sure what you mean by this.  Does that mean is the "greatest" at being evil?  What about lying?  Deceiving?  Is god the greatest at being the worst?  I don't think this definition is sufficient, because "greatness" has to be defined.

&gt;He is the highest authority in existence.

Authority is fine, but I'm not sure how this ties into our definition of "good" yet.  You also need to actually *demonstrate* that god is the highest authority, for one, because it's entirely possible that there is *one* thing that is the highest authority of x, and *another* thing is the highest authority to *y*.  Encompassing all things into one entity needs justification, and then clarification.

&gt;Morality is subjective to him in the way gravity is subjective to him.

Again, it's fine if you want to assert it, but it needs some form of justification as well.  I'm also not entirely sure what you mean by this... gravity *wouldn't* be subjective to god, it would be a parameter (that's objective) that he created. 

&gt;To say that God is answerable to some standard of morality would require that morality exists independent of God, and is more powerful than any physical force.

So if I can glean anything between the "authority" definition and this statement, it's that you subscribe to a Divine Command theory, am I wrong in this? 

In the future, it would be helpful to both of us if you just started out rigorously defining the ideas you had.  We could have saved some time and started the conversation about how you plan to *soundly justify* the idea that god is omnibenevolent according to these definitions.  But as it is, I'm still not sure what you even mean by "greatness" or why it must be a necessary component of god, and of a *single* god, for that matter.Yes.  There's a whole set of hipstery redditors, and a whole set of neck-beards, and the list goes on.  Even if you don't personally subscribe to these subreddits, hipster qualities have been a foundational pillar of reddit's user base for some years.&gt;In fairness to him, it doesn't look like he deleted the comments. There's a mod message that they were deleted for being personal attacks. Not that this rescues him in any way.

Fair point.  It does still raise the question why he couldn't have written something that broke mod rules, but that's not really my biggest issue with him.&gt; I have in fact deleted no comments. They were deleted by mods.

I see, so you wrote comments that were so attacking that mods felt it necessary to delete them... this redeems you, how, exactly? 

&gt;I'm sure an apology for your dishonesty is forthcoming?

Did I hurt your feelings? 

&gt;Now, with that settled, Demonstrate anything I argued that you defeated. You cannot.

I'm not going to placate to your illiteracy.  I've asked too many times to justify with sound arguments (you can still read them, plainly written out; as a hint, they're the bits where I asked to do something for me) why your premises are to be reasonably acceptable, and you seem incapable of comprehending what I'm asking, so go forth and live in ignorance I guess.

I've already told you that without justification, anybody is *reasonable* for rejecting ad hoc premises.  My work is done, it's on you if you want to defend your ideas.

&gt;Which challenge can I not defeat.

Justify this premise: "God is the *best explanation* for x".  Please provide what x is and why god is the best explanation. 

Justify this premise: a necessary entity exists, and god is that necessary entity.

Justify this premise: god is ontologically foundational, and nothing else can be ontologically foundational. 

Justify this claim: we live in the best possible world, and a child dying needlessly 3 days later without anyone's knowledge is still necessary for this condition, even if said child could have died 3 days earlier without any changes in the universe.

&gt;Show me your evidence to justify your atheist belief position.

I've already stated it and you ignored it.  Here it is again.  Entities lacking all evidence and sound argument are reasonably considered non-existent.  Without some form of evidence to demonstrate the existence of something, we are left to russellian teapotism and might as well believe in magical immaterial unicorns.  There is not a __single shred__ of *evidence* for god.  There are, at best, personal testimonies and logically *consistent* arguments.  Lacking any **soundness**, this prevents them from being reasonably acceptable.  In short, the jarring lack of any sound evidence for a god is evidence that said god is either frustratingly aloof and indifferent to our knowing it, or (more likely) nonexistent. 

&gt;Until you can man up and demonstrate anything, you were among the spanked. Denial is cheap.

Do you notice how each time you ask for something, I actually deliver?  Even when it means repeating what I've already stated, since you never address it?  When's the last time you actually addressed any of the questions I've asked of you?  Rather than answer that question, just go back and answer the questions, please.  &gt; As predicted, you claimed to have won a debate, yet you failed to demonstrate a defeator to anything I argued.

I did?  And why are you so obsessed with "winning" and "defeat" here?  Why not leave that to the people assessing the actual content (of which, you have provided little to work with)?  

&gt;You have failed to demonstrate anything you challenged that I cannot defeat.

How is this supposed to work, exactly?  Is this some sort of "nuh-uh" tactic?  I'm not even sure what you're talking about.  There's a whole set of points I keep handing to you on a platter to address, and you keep looking right over them. 

&gt;All you have offered is another distraction tactic shifting all intellectual burden away from yourself.

Somehow this feels ironic.

&gt;A WHY behind contingent existence. Argument from Contingency.

The argument from Contingency is extremely problematic for two reasons: 

1.  Things that are contingent upon one another never *require* a necessary entity; it is entirely possible that *everything* is contingent (read: random, happenstance, etc.).  

2.  Even if we grant that contingent entities *require* a necessary entity, how do you determine what is contingent and what is necessary?  Definitions?  That won't do any good for the **soundness** requirement I listed earlier.  As it is, it's entirely possible to argue that the universe itself is, in fact, necessary.  After all, the quantum fields appear to have existed eternally. 

Do you see how you've provided content and now I'm addressing it?  That's how debate works.  Now it's *your* turn to defend your argument from Contingency by providing some sort of defense against the two issues I raised above.

&gt;I argued a necessary entity exists.

No, you stated it.  That's not an argument, that's a proposition. 

&gt;Ex nihil nihilo fit is why.

And (I believe you meant to say) *ex nihilo nihil fit* is a problematic proposition as well.  The proposition "of nothing, nothing comes" suffers two fundamental issues: 

1.  Scientifically, we know that the universe did *not* come from nothing (not in the sense that ex nihilo nihil fit metaphysically implies).  In fact, our best theories suggest that the big bang may have originated from some sort of interaction in the quantum fields (which have eternally existed) to bring about the universe as we understand it today. 

2.  David Hume, some 300 years ago, made a respectable philosophical inquiry into the nature of causality, that has since been held in high regard as a reasonable refutation to claims *about* causality on extra-universal ideas.  That is, causality itself may not be existent, but a pattern *of* the universe we observe.  Given this, we are inclined to commit the Composition Fallacy in assuming causality of *material* is similar to causality of *form*.  Now, I'm one to propose that the cause of the universe was one of *form*, seeing as it was likely to have been an event in quantum weirdness.  But the issue with accepting this is that it does not require an external maker or source, because causes in form are mundane and internally consistent.  However, should you take the metaphysical position of nothing bearing the definition of lacking *everything*, then you've committed the composition fallacy by presupposing that one material requires a cause.

Same as before.  To refute this, you either need to provide a *sound* argument as to why we can apply causality to a concept of particulars we have never observed, and why this idea of ex nihilo nihil fit actually applies to our current cosmological research.

&gt;I argued the attributes of God are necessary: Timeless, spaceless, immaterial, intentional.

Again, these are statements, not arguments.  Timelessness is not a necessary component.  And as I alluded to above, material that brought about the universe is also timeless (quantum fields).  Why is "spaceless" a necessary entity?  If anything, all we mean is that the cause did not exist in our *own* space.  That's a far cry from "spaceless" altogether.  I raise the same issue with immaterial: the cause of our universe could simply be material; nothing in cosmology requires an immaterial entity, so I'm not sure where you got that.  

Intentionality is the most suspect of all.  What about the universe, at all, requires intentionality?

If I may be frank, this set of statements (not arguments) sound a little old hat.  These are the classic christian apologetic premises that have been considered, raised, and countered (in my own lifetime) for a considerable time.  I am fully prepared to continue engaging on this topic, but don't be surprised if nothing you say astounds me.  After all, I was *once* a student of apologetics myself\u2014not only did I bother to understand these "arguments", I fully embraced them, until I was more mature and properly educated on reasonable thinking.

&gt;I also argued why.

Please quote where you did.

&gt;&gt;Justify this premise: god is ontologically foundational, and nothing else can be ontologically foundational.

&gt;Why? I never argued that.

[As per your previous comment](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3nmbjd/theists_what_do_you_think_about_the_argument_from/cvpiolq): 

&gt;Unicorn have no ontological standing or foundation in reality

Implying, conversely, that god does.  Is your contention with the framing of my challenge?  Feel free to reword exactly what it is you meant by "ontological standing or foundation in reality," I was using the only set of premises you've raised thus far to interpret what it is you're trying to say.  It there's been a misinterpretation, please correct it, then justify why you believe it to be sound. 

&gt;&gt;Justify this claim: we live in the best possible world, and a child dying needlessly 3 days later without anyone's knowledge is still necessary for this condition, even if said child could have died 3 days earlier without any changes in the universe.

&gt;Why? I never claimed that. You failed to provide any reason to believe God could not have sufficient moral reasons....

Your response was conveniently lost in the deleted posts.  Allow me to again raise the question posed to you, so that you can state what you *actually* claim, then: 

&gt;&gt;What "benevolent" reason is there for a helpless child in a war-torn village to die, afraid and utterly alone, three days after its parents, from starvation, after watching them get brutally raped and murdered, when nobody discovered the child until long after it, too, had died? If you want to employ the "mysterious ways" argument, you're going to have to defend how it isn't special pleading. Otherwise you're the one with "no case".

From an objective standpoint, this scenario increased the suffering of the child and the net suffering in the universe, at no advantage to anybody.  Yet this happens *all the time* to children.  With no observable gain in "goodness" you're in a very tight place to argue that this would be the best-possible world god could have created.

&gt;1) Really? You are hanging your hat on argument from ignorance? Shabby!

Not ignorance; lack of any reason to believe an unjustified, unsound claim.  Allow me to ask how it is that you don't believe in unicorns?  Ignorance? For shame!

&gt;2) Is a lack of evidence for gold elsewhere in the Universe, evidence that no gold exists elsewhere in the Universe?

If (hypothetically) gold has never yet been observed, and assuming we lacked all knowledge in chemistry, the reasonable position is that gold does not exist, *until* it has been found elsewhere in the universe, **or** sufficient evidence presents itself.  It's how we treat alien life-forms as well. 

Again, let me ask you: is a lack of evidence for unicorns here in the universe evidence that no unicorns exist anywhere?  Then why don't you believe in unicorns?

&gt;3) I provided you massive evidence that you failed to defeat.

Each time you say things like this, I am more and more convinced you don't understand some very basic concepts of argumentation.  A statement is not an argument, a premise is not an argument, logically valid arguments are not evidence *alone* (they must also be sound), and all premises must be soundly justified in a basis of reality.  Nothing you have provided so far has been evidence whatsoever; you've thrown at me a bunch of arguments that I was (fortunately) able to understand because they've been used a million times on this sub.  To make them *evidential*, the arguments (or premises), need to be defended and shown to be *actually* True.

&gt;You are really losing badly.

One of us is concerned with addressing content, the other seems overly obsessed with "defeat" and "winning" and "losing".  We'll let the readers decide.He's actually quite fun.  He reminds me of a shitty, anime-dubbed villain who is obsessed with *victory* and *defeating enemies*.I saw 500 people witness it.  They all told me; sadly, many have died since yesterday, but I can probably dig up a few names if anyone wants.  Of course, ask quick!  Because I'm losing internet and all forms of verification in 13 seconds.  

It's probably better just taking my word for it because it's in writing.&gt;&gt;Would you accept my claim that there were 500 witnesses?

&gt;yes, i think so.

Let's be clear here, he's not saying 500 hundred people actually saw the event.  He's saying, would you believe "I claim there were 500 people there".  It's a subtle but very important difference.  In other words, the only basis for assuming 500 people saw it is the person making the claim, not an actual set of 500 people we can go ask.And verily, upon the end of the 6th eve of October, /u/nerfjanmayen's social security was reinstated.  "He is risen!" says all who witnessed the event.  

- Gospel of /u/segFault11235 

(You need to add that ambiguity and believable variation there)The gift that keeps on giving.And *obviously* they have different motives, but still came to the same conclusion! &gt; It's funny isn't it, the hallmark of atheism online is to declare your opponent defeated regardless of what fallacious reasoning is being used. 

Nice bandwagoning ad hominem.  Two-fer.

&gt;which fallacy is it when you claim a victory because someone doesn't have time to respond?

Laziness.  And inability to address the questions.  And, not that you'd see it this way because you seem to love us vs. them mentality, but it took at least 4 comments just to get an answer out of the guy.  He apparently doesn't read or can't comprehend when I ask direct questions to address the content. 

&gt;I get on threads that are 70:1 or so, the sheer number of angry teenagers would stifle someone getting paid just to do this 50 hours a week.

How very brave.  How many teenagers do you really think are on here?  Also, I too was once in a 70:1 world, but I got banned in *your* sub for calling Aristotle's Four Ways antiquated nonsense (how representative of one's confidence in their ideas).  &gt; He did say that he liked to win, I prefer content but whatever, you guys are just bickering, but honestly, this is literally the response we get out of majority of the atheists, I'm kinda glad you are getting a taste of your own medicine.

Someone's especially butt-hurt this evening.

&gt;Hey look! Your fallacy of composition argument is on the top ten worst objections to the Kalam!

There are just so *many* ways I want to respond to this.... ok let's stay academic and cordial.  I'm going to ignore the fact that you actually completely missed what I was arguing; and fail to see how "beginning to exist" means something very different than the way Craigy like to use it for his argument. 

Here's my first question: Craig says that he applies "everything that begins to exist needs a cause" because of "ex nihilo nihil fit" (it's his first response).  How do you justify *ex nihilo nihil fit*?  Is it because he applies his daily observation to mundane things in his immediate proximity?  

Interesting, and what makes it possible to then *extrapolate that as a principle to everything altogether?*  It's not a scientific principle, so how did *he* establish it? Sounds an awful lot like an indirect fallacy of composition.  Craig is classic for this technique, and it's so transparent it's embarrassing he's using it in his formulation.

Second question:  What does it mean to "begin to exist?"  Have you ever seen anything begin to exist in the way the universe allegedly does?  Let me cut to the chase a little: bread coming from wheat is not "beginning to exist" in the same way Craig uses it for the universe.  The former is a case of "beginning to exist by *form*" (a *formal* cause, if you will).  The latter is supposed to come about via brand new material that didn't exist before (a *material* cause, if you will).  The problem is, we have no justification for material causes\u2014we've never observed one, and have no way of knowing if causality can even be applied here. 

Third question: Why is it that Craig then *directly* applies the fallacy of composition in his own response?  He talks about eskimo villages and horses "popping into being" and declaring it impossible (inductively, I might add, since it's possible this happens incredibly rarely, and not in any proximity to our observable universe).  But, again, what makes that True of the universe itself?  He goes *right back into applying the thing he's supposedly saying he doesn't do!*

Fourth question: Do you really believe science confirms the truth of premise 1 in the way Craig uses it?  Do you really?  Please, be my guest.  I'm *begging* you to go over to /r/askscience and ask them whether "everything that begins to exist requires a cause" is scientifically justified.  When you've had enough of their laughs, come back here and we can reject that response altogether. 

I'll spare you my opinion of Bill Craig, but suffice it to say that citing him as your response will get no respect from me, even when you *think* you've responded to my position; even when *I've* listened to just about everything the guy has ever said or written. 

&gt;I would also like to argue here on unicorns that the experiences with them are of short traditions, not the lengthy long tradition of Judeo-Christian religious experiences.

Literally a blatant appeal to tradition fallacy in it's full form.  Let me remind you that Shamanism is even older than Judeo-Christian experiences, so you should probably convert to Shintoism on the spot. 

&gt;We have good reason to be suspect of them.

Of anything magical or supernatural, really.  You're lacking that *extraordinary* bit of evidence for that extraordinary type of claim.&gt; Well, you are back to the charade.

What charade?  This cracks me up to no end.  Who do you think you're debating here?  Am I sitting in a dark corner with a black cape on? 

&gt;You have no demonstrated the slightest defeator or anything of relevance I cannot defeat.

But did I defeat the most defeatist part of your defeatable defeat? 

&gt;You offer a shotgun blast of obfuscation, deflections and rabbit trails.

The fact that you think my comments are obfuscation tickles me to know end.  I suppose the one flaw of a debate thread in public forums is no requirement to be intellectually honest enough to understand the argument.  Can you cite for me where I was intentionally obfuscatory?  Is it that you need me to spell things out to you in even simpler language?  I genuinely don't understand what you don't get if you don't tell me. 

&gt;However, as is my policy when dealing with chattering atheists, I'll pluck the first objection off the top and defeat it, sooo

Because that's how intellectually capable humans address glaring issues raised about their stances.  

&gt;The first cause cannot be contingent.

This is completely irrelevant to what I'm saying; to the point that I'm convinced you've been carrying on your entire life parroting basic apologetics.  Seriously, what about any of this statement addresses my position that it's *possible* that *everything is contingent?*

&gt;Rationally impossible. 

This needs justification.  Nothing about my position, nor the definition of contingency, makes this impossible.  Look it up. The *formal modal definition of contingent:*

&gt;&gt;if and only if it is not necessarily False and not necessarily True (i.e. possible but not necessarily True).

Nothing about that definition requires a necessary entity.

&gt;Ex nihilo nihil fit (out of nothing, nothing comes). 

Thank you for repeating a position I have already pointed out as problematic.  Naturally, I'm going to point out (again) that the problems with this claim are listed above, and if you are capable, you can defend the idea.  But until then, your position is demonstrably flawed. 

&gt;Something NECESSARILY (non-contingently) exists as causal prime.

Again, you're just stating things, not supporting the claim.  Nothing about this premise has been demonstrated to be True.  What thing is necessary?  Care to demonstrate its existence?  Care to point out how this necessary things is also a god? 

&gt;It is absolutely impossible that something not self-exist uncaused - or nothing contingent could possibly exist now.

Sure it is, our universe may be one such example.  And again, you don't seem to understand the proper definition of contingent, from which the argument from Contingency is derived.  Do you have any formal training in logic?

&gt;Futher, you don't even understand the point of the argument from Contingency. It's about WHY (implies intention).

I get the strong feeling I understand the argument better than you do.  Least of all because I actually know the definition of contingent, and how the claim that contingent things require a necessary entity is an unfounded premise.  

&gt;I don't need to. The necessary entity is not contingent. 

You still need to demonstrate that it's *actually* necessary (you know, how it would be *impossible* for that thing not to exist\u2014without using the definition as your citation).  Declaring it so doesn't make it so.  It's that whole "defining into existence" problem. 

&gt;What evidence do you have for eternal quantum fields?

 [Science](http://www.nytimes.com/2012/03/25/books/review/a-universe-from-nothing-by-lawrence-m-krauss.html?_r=0), [Books](https://books.google.com/books?id=rcrf0P8DSe0C&amp;pg=PA170&amp;lpg=PA170&amp;dq=qft+eternal&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=ilsfDXoONx&amp;sig=5x5ejpcEMn_uEaRQwUw5MQt0Fxs&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CDcQ6AEwBWoVChMI3-PGyLe0yAIVUC2ICh1jww5o#v=onepage&amp;q=eternal&amp;f=False), [Articles](http://www.colorado.edu/philosophy/vstenger/Timeless/08-timeless.pdf).  

Ask [Sean Carroll](http://www.preposterousuniverse.com/blog/2014/02/24/post-debate-reflections/), a renowned physicist who debated WLC.  [Here's](http://soi.blogspot.ca/2014/04/the-essential-quantum-field-theory.html) a 101 forum on it.  It points out that the fields are not time-dependent.  [More stuff](http://phys.org/news/2015-02-big-quantum-equation-universe.html).  Ask /r/askscience, I'm sure they'll be happy to elucidate more.

We'll start with that. 

&gt;How do quantum fields create contingent dimensions that are not necessary (exist infinitely in the past) - absent intent?

You aren't understanding the position if you think that infinite quantum fields means that *other* things must also be timeless.  They simply are not time-dependent.  Things that *are* time-dependent (the known spacetime of our physical universe), *is* time-dependent, which is what you may be inclined to call contingent.  QFs themselves are not contingent.  

Did you hit 'reply' too early?  If so, I'll address your edit in a followup comment.&gt;Well it's True, your arguments aren't always bad, they have good content usually, but your friends are not so smart.

But you see why lumping us all together affects the credibility of your argumentation, right?  I'm sure you also have good content to say, but when you pull out ad hominem, it just devalues your own credibility to argue objectively. 

&gt;You really shouldn't attack Aristotle bro, I am positive that all the garbage in philosophy is a result of leaving key principles of reasoning

Except there *isn't* garbage in philosophy.  There's a ton of well-reasoned, respectable philosophy out there *because* it depends on our scientific knowledge and refined form of reasoning. 

&gt;it's taken up till Kant to get a foot out of the mud created and the post modernists are just trying to get us back into it.

...Kant was almost certainly an agnostic by the end of his career, and just about any philosopher since Kant has either built upon his ideas, or addressed issues they find problematic.  He literally transformed the game, I'll give him that, but we need to recognize that philosophers all around *respect* him for that, and even use his arguments as inspiration for new ideas.

Kant also noticeably recognized Hume as "awaking him from slumber" when Hume famously questioned the principles of causality (including the notion of ex nihilo nihil fit). &gt; You didn't listen to the video did you? 

My headache would like a word with you.  Seriously, listening to him gives me aneurisms, but I do my diligence.  I watched intently\u2014that's how I formulated my questions.

&gt;There is a difference between an efficient cause and a material one.

I don't disagree, but I was describing a *likeness* to efficient and material causes.  Efficiency misses the mark quite a bit, since I'm referring to causality of form (ie., permutations in the quantum field).  It's a reordering of the same stuff, different than making *new* stuff.

&gt;You are arguing that there can be no material cause to the universe,

Not exactly.  I'm saying that there doesn't *need* to be a material cause.  I'm also saying there doesn't need to be an efficient cause, least of all because efficient causes make arbitrary distinctions between the same fundamental entities.  What I'm arguing is what I said: we observe "beginning to exist" by way of reconfigurations of existing stuff, this is different from the idea of "beginning to exist" in terms of *new* stuff.  Ironically, I'm of the opinion that the universe came about by means of reconfigurations of existing stuff (the quantum fields), but the interesting thing about reconfigurations is that they require no agency\u2014it removes all dependency on a god-cause. 

&gt;I imagine you would, he comments that this is his favorite bad objection to the Kalam.

Probably because he quite clearly doesn't see the issue in his formulation.  After all, fallacies of content are harder to identify, and the mistake here is notably subtle.  I do fault him for not taking the effort for bothering to comprehend the problem, however. 

&gt;There is a great cumulative case for for religious experiences in our worldview at it is far more prevalent than Shintoism.

This is bandwagoning, and it is equally problematic.  We've been carrying on the debate with religious experiences elsewhere.  Needless to say I take an issue from using testimony as a primary source for making an extraordinary claim.  If I recall, I wrote the last reply to you, so feel free to continue the discussion of this topic there. 

&gt;I explained there are good reasons we are skeptical of unicorns.

But none of those reasons are unique to unicorns as opposed to god.  Which is why I draw the equivalence. 

&gt;Such skepticism is emphatically NOT how we come to grips with the mysterious world in which we inhabit.

It 100% is.  Without it, we risk Salem Witch Trials and superstitious murders.  It's been how we get to the bottom of truths for nearly 300 years.

&gt;We could never learn more if we just dismissed everything because it doesn't jive with what we already know.

This isn't skepticism, nor was it the reason I reject the posited extraordinary claims.  I reject the posited claims because they lack *sufficient* evidence.  

&gt;Hume only considered the intrinsic probability of a miracle and not the explanatory power which leads us into all sorts of crazy conclusions about black swans, ice and whatnot. But using Bayes' theorem we can do a more acurate calcuation.

We've talked about this before, but as a reminder, the utilization of Bayes' theorem still causes problems for theistic claims.  If you actually apply the variables correctly (I should know, I took entire courses on probability theory), you actually see an inverse relation between the rarity of a miracle and the probability that it actually happened.  In other words, it's deviation from the norm means it requires an equally rigorous statistical significance, one that is lacking in the theistic evidence at this point in time. 

&gt;What is the probability that people would tell the Native American islanders that there was ice, if there actual was ice, compared to if there was in fact no ice? Was it a conspiracy to fool the islanders into thinking that there was ice?

I'm not sure what this analogy is trying to demonstrate.  We can stick to Bayes' Theorem and Hume; I'm fairly versed in both subjects. 

&gt;This is what we implicitly are doing when we hear the lotto numbers, the chances of hearing those particular numbers is statistically impossible, but we believe the reports of the numbers.

Again I'm not sure what this is saying.  How is a report related to the probability of an event?  These are orthogonal issues... 

&gt; Eh, were all prone to being human.

But we do have time to read our comments before we hit reply... It's not really an issue to me, it's just something that will make your own position more respectable.  The one badge I'll grant WLC is that he knows how to be cordial.  If the entire debate was based on manners, then WLC beat Krauss in that debate. 

&gt;Well reasoned poo...that's what I think of post modernist and radical skeptics.

Which are laughably in the minority of modern philosophical groups...

&gt;Ok, but he just realized that the world "out there" was just a bunch of data, our bodies are what turn it into what we understand.

You misunderstand me.  That "awake from slumber" is a literal direct quotation of Kant, in the *direct* context of Hume's causality ideas. 

&gt;Kant pulled us out of the idea that causes were just data points as Hume suggested.

I'm unaware of this argument.  Any links or quotes from the papers themselves? 

&gt;Granted, that's just one foot out of the mud, Aristotle never had the problem to begin with.

Aristotle's problem was that his causality does not reflect reality.  Not just because it doesn't jive with modern science, but also because the four causes demonstrably condense into a *single* cause in just about every example we observe.  It turns out his definitions were largely dependent on human-subjective instantiation of objects.

&gt;The way we understand things includes all four causes, regardless of how we would like to compartmentalize it into data points.

I'll refer to my final sentence above. &gt; Still no defeator. Just lots of noisy minutia hoping to obfuscate.

I still have no idea what you're talking about.  It's pretty plain english to me...

&gt;QM is very metaphysical and many interpretations exist.

QM is absolutely science.  There's nothing metaphysical about it: it's very much established and confirmed science.  Ask any physicist.  Hop onto /r/askscience and ask if they think QM is "metaphysical."  I've actually studied some (basic) quantum mechanics; the science is as rigorous as classical physics. 

&gt;You are even alluding to them as timeless.

That's because the fields are not time dependent...

&gt;You are speaking about a non-physical / metaphysical dimension which you label 'quantum.'

No I'm talking about the very concrete scientific notion of a quantum field and what that entails.  This may be new science to you, but it's well established stuff.  If it weren't we wouldn't be spending billions on the kind of research going into CERN. 

&gt;Claiming Quantum fields in a particular way is just silly.

No idea what this means. 

&gt;I KNOW nobody understands QM and I KNOW that nobody has any way of avoiding the physical beginning - Carroll / Chen Model included.

You're kidding right?  Even *I* understand the basics of it, and I'm not even a physicist. This is just ridiculous defensiveness against a concept you do not understand.  I'm happy to engage in honest debate here, but seriously, when you start trying to discredit *established* scientific knowledge, I don't know what I can even do for you....

&gt;This is rank speculation and does nothing to avoid physical beginnings.

It's absolutely not.  But the fact that you think so demonstrate just how little you understand on the subject matter.  Are there theories *surrounding* the known science of QM?  Sure, but the "timeless" portion is well-established, it's a fundamental part of the physical model.  Not sure what else to tell you here, but you're disagreeing with experts who know way more on the subject than you or I...

&gt;Support your claim that quantum fields exist and avoid time?

I gave you nearly 6 links explaining just that.  For one thing, quantum fields do exist, that's just science [101](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quantum_field_theory).  And before you start raising issues about it being a "theory," I'll point out that it's as much a theory as the theory of gravity.  They're the basis for quantum mechanics, and it's through that scientific understanding we came about discovering the Higgs particle, among others.  This is tried and True stuff.  The timelessness comes about through not being time-dependent.  They're fields under which change exists as permutations under various fluctuations.  Even I have a tentative grasp on the subject matter, but you can look up layman articles written by the likes of (PhD physicists) Carroll and Krauss to get at what's meant here.  Or you can read the large list of links I posted just for you. 

&gt;I already explained why something non-contingent must exist. You ignored the proof.

Except you didn't explain it.... you declared it...and then declared that it's impossible otherwise.  That just isn't a rigorous defense.  I can readily point out that non-contingent existence is possible (perhaps *this* universe is one such example).  It takes more than making statements to argue your point, you actually have to justify it.

&gt;Now you need to explain how everything can be contingent and no causal prime exist to escape the necessity of causal prime (self-existence as a non-contingency).

You seem to not be understanding what I said before about contingency... Contingency (under the formal definition of modal logic) just means that it is neither necessary nor impossible.  That is, it may or may not exist.  Under this framework, it's trivial to point out that, there is really only *one* entity to consider: the universe itself.  Given that we don't know about it's origins, there is no reason to suspect its contingency is not dependent on a necessary thing (that would be something *you* have to prove if you want to make that claim).  As it is, we are reasonable in considering the universe as contingent, and coincidentally in existent in this case. 

Part of your problem seems to be that you're asking "how" (which presupposes causality), when that question may be meaningless.  After all, if it wasn't caused, then "how" is a meaningless question.  Your assertion that "how" must be answered presupposes the answer you'd like: a dependency on something else. 

&gt;You are a master of bluster and shifting burden.

I'd like to think I shifted 0 times in our back-and-forth.  In fact, I'm pretty sure I've answered your questions even when it was on *you* to defend them.  Please quote me where I'm shifting, would you kindly?

&gt;You have no demonstration where I am wrong or defeators.

You need a new word besides "defeat," it's killing that word for me forever.  You also don't seem to understand how argumentation works.  This isn't about defeators, it's about coming to a consensus about the truth.  That involves attempting to understand the opposing position and then finding where it is acceptable or questionable.  

&gt;You just make a lot of noise and demand proofs of proofs and deny obviously solid premises without any more plausible alternatives.

Forgive me for not accepting your ad hoc statements as "rock solid proofs."  Of course I'm going to ask for proofs of proofs of proofs right down to the very bottom\u2014that's how I reasoned to where I am now.  After all, if you don't do that, how can you be sure you haven't built your knowledge on an incorrect assumption?  

Secondly, nothing about your premises are obvious or solid.  They're ad hoc and play right into the position you want to seek, but they don't reflect reality and they come across as well-established whatsoever.  

Plausible alternatives: 

Causality is a property *of* the universe, it is an observed behavior that need not be applied universally.  The origins of the universe are completely unknown\u2014it is unknown if the Big Bang was even the actual beginning at all.  Ontology is only meaningful under metaphysically justifiable frameworks.  Metaphysics are not ad hoc world views, but established positions based on one's best analytic and synthetic reasoning.  No evidence has ever presented itself that requires a creator or a mind in any meaningful way\u2014and believing this is equivalent to believing Russell's teapot.  

Not sure what other alternatives you're after, but there's plenty for any of the premises you've provided.I'd get used to it ;).&gt; Not in the soft sciences (postmodernists)

I'm not sure what you mean here.  Science is science through and through.  Some fields have revolutions when new discoveries or methodologies are deemed more reliable.  Postmodernism is a movement, primarily characterized in art, culture, and literature, not science. 

&gt;Yes, Kant was very confused (his earlier writings show) up until he came up with these concepts, as were most the philosophers, Hume made a mess of things.

I still don't think you get what I'm saying.  Kant *appreciated,* *relied,* and *built upon* Hume's work.  He didn't discredit it, he valued it.  And the later years were when he became increasingly agnostic.  I'm not sure what you mean by saying Hume made a mess of things.  He's still regarded as a well-respected and influential philosopher.  Besides Kant, he's one of the philosophers that have arguments that are often still addressed to this day by modern philosophy.  I'm really not sure what you mean by "messing up" other than you happen to dislike what his thinking meant for certain theistic mindsets. 

&gt;The Critique is where his work is, but it's enough to make professionals brains hurt.

He has more than just the Critique... and what I was asking was why you think Kant argued that causal events were more than just "data points" as you describe Hume of arguing.  Data points are a more modern concept, so I'm not sure what you're comparing to from the works themselves. 

And for the record, philosophy is usually not about being "open to interpretation."  It's about conveying clear ideas after establishing rigorous definitions.  Kant definitely aimed to do this, so I don't think we can just say, "well *I* think he meant this..."

&gt;Kant said that we have a priori conceptions of things, like time and space, that things change, which we interpret via the senses and can't be reasoned to.

This is in response to Hume's strong Empiricism, not his argumentation of causality.  Kant wanted to believe that we could argue everything in reality from the arm chair (pure reason), but realized that some knowledge came from synthetic or a posteriori knowledge, and thus his Critique came about.  But in either case, I'm not sure what this argument bears in relation to causality, the topic at hand. 

&gt;I disagree about Aristotelian metaphysics, but that's a whole nother debate.

You disagree in that you think it reflects reality, or that you also think it doesn't make sense?  The problem with Aristotle's metaphysics is that it's not rigorous and doesn't provide us any new information or insight.  It's, in a way, Freudian in that it can never be wrong\u2014seek a pattern and you will find it.  The problem arises when we realize that this framework doesn't actually have a sound justification, nor does it give us any new insights into what we can learn from studying the universe (aside from the things the four ways can "make up").

&gt;Wait, what? You have condensed all causes to a material one, but that's not how people understand things in daily life,

No, all causes are condensed into a *formal* one.  That's what quantum field theory tells us.  At the base of all of reality, all matter and energy is space *and* time is expressed in the permutations of the quantum fields.  This is descriptively formal causality, and it encompasses literally everything we observe anywhere.  The *only* possible exclusion would be the creation of the Universe itself (assuming the fields were actually created, which cosmologists seem to think goes against the current science)\u2014a material cause.  But such a cause is never actually observed, so we can't really prescribe such an idea of causality in the first place! 

&gt;they tend to think of efficient causes and more importantly final causes.

But common sense is not a justification for sound reasoning.  Common sense tells us that we can't dilate time, and that particles can't behave like waves *and* particles, but both these things are True.  Whether people construct particular significances for particular events is independent of whether physically or metaphysically these things are actually distinct.  As an example, we distinguish coal and diamonds, but their difference is only in configuration.  We distinguish it because a particular form exhibits different traits that we describe on one entity vs. another.  But that their fundamental level, they're just carbon atoms, and carbon atoms are just quantum fluctuations.  As a result, their *True* causality from coal to diamond is formal.  

&gt; We tend to think there is some purpose or direction to life, an ultimate goal.

Again, common sense is not a sufficiently rigorous methodology to get to the truth of things.  Our passions are often directly influenced by our surrounding culture and instinctual compulsions.  Desiring to have a purpose is not a bad thing: it instills a need to survive and thrive.

&gt;Ya, our natural state of being, let's not reason our minds away though.

It's still a far cry from radical skepticism or solipsism. &gt; Well I take this as an argument that the universe is eternal, which seems against the scientific consensus.

Except it isn't.  Watch the Craig v. Carroll debate or the Craig v. Krauss debate.  Both are very well respected cosmologists and both propose completely viable eternal universe theories.  You can even read on the Carroll follow-up from the debate, where he elaborates more on the concepts.  Craig naturally disagrees with this, because it deconstructs Kalam; but science can't be chosen or picky, it follows from the best evidence, and the best evidence points to possible eternal theories. 

&gt;And I will ask why you believe scientists.

I don't trust scientists (scientists don't even trust scientists; we're all our biggest critics of one another), I trust *science*.  The methodology is the most rigorous, grounded in philosophical logical thinking, and has demonstrated time and again to be the most trustworthy way to comprehend our universe.  Science also doesn't require that we trust scientists: data and experimentation is a requirement for any scientific process, and anybody can pull up and interpret the data for themselves.  

Unless you can provide a *better* methodology for establishing *objectively* the truth of something (you'd be hailed as a revolutionary, I might add), science is the best way we have to understand the universe we observe.  Philosophy supplements this with being able to question science *and* determine the questions of which science provides the data. 

&gt;I explained previously, the traditions are short, they are not as frequent certainly of a religious tradition as vast as Christianity.

Now you're special pleading.  If you reject unicorns according to the length and frequency of tradition, I'd kindly point you to Hinduism, which existed for far longer *and* has been exhibited by more people on earth than Christianity.  The bigger point is that this is an untrustworthy metric.  People all over the world lived in societies where women were considered property, or at least inferior to men, do you consider this position to be more acceptable because it's a longer held tradition by the majority of humankind? 

&gt;I get what you are trying to do, but it's painfully obvious that they do not exist.

But to someone who's applied rigorous thinking to the evidence for god, he or she may see them as the same in credulity.  I, for one, am inclined to think so. 

&gt;This objection was about extraordinary claims, you went on a tangent here.

I think you missed my point.  The Salem Trials depended on an extraordinary claim (these women performed demonic witchcraft) and, because the claim was easily embraced, were murdered or punished because of it.  That's the danger of being overly credulous. 

&gt;How much would be sufficient?

Well, *any* reliable evidence, for a start.  But realistically, something objective and demonstrably revolutionary.  I'm not really interested in unpacking all of the historical issues of the Bible, or the fact that we depend on testimony alone (of maybe four to five authors, no less) for the entirety of this evidence.  

It's hard to say if any historical account would convince me.  I suppose if any of the sanhedrin or Roman officers would have written about the events, that would at least get me thinking this *might* be True.  But really specifics are difficult, the best I answer I can give is: sufficient evidence to account for it being the *best possible explanation.*  The historical evidence, as it is, is superbly lacking on that front.  And the evidence for the existence of god is altogether absent.  

&gt;Even Dawkins has said that the second coming of Jesus wouldn't be enough.

Who cares what Dawkins thinks?  I'm not Dawkins.  

&gt;I think you need to take in how extraordinary the events would be if naturalistic reasons were the cause, hallucinations of massive amounts of people etc.

You're taking for granted the *claim* in the bible that massive people witnessed this.  Historically speaking, there isn't sufficient evidence in the documents to provide a positive consensus on this claim.  You're assuming up front that the Bible is painting a completely accurate picture, and then assessing the best explanation based on this narrative.  But the initial problem is that the narrative itself is equally targetable for scrutiny, and including this, your position is really: "these handful of people claimed an extraordinary thing *and* it really *did* happen, because they said it did, according to themselves and the people they say saw it too (but we have no way of verifying with)"

&gt;The indians would have believed the words about ice, because we tend to believe reports of groups of people as not lying typically

But that says nothing of the *truth* of the statement, see?  You're talking about our human inclination to accept things when said by authoritarian figures or groups.  That's precisely why skepticism is important\u2014it mitigates this over credulity.  Masses of people believed Joseph Smith, and big crowds now testify to the miracles; do *you* believe Mormon claims?  If your only reason you don't is because we have other historical information that says otherwise, then see my response above to the claims your faith makes. 

&gt;We need to consider the explanatory power, not just the intrinsic value.

I'm not sure what you mean by this. 

&gt;The odds of them being the numbers extremely low, if we used Hume's method we could never believe the numbers. But that's just the thing, we do, we know that the likelihood that they are lying about the numbers is ridiculously low.

Bayes' theorem isn't about the claims (nor is Hume's argument of miracles).  The whole point is that it's about the probability of the *event* occurring given the *evidence provided*.  So the point is, *even* if we suspect that the people writers themselves thought this thing occurred (the only evidence we have), plugging in the numbers still gives a really low probability of the event actually occurring.  I should know, I tinkered with the probability equation for quite some time. &gt;What kind of science? Is it a physical science? A physical science without time, space and matter? A physical science about conditions causally antecedent to the beginning of physical existence? Exactly where did these quantum fields exist in no space? Looks very metaphysical.

You're joking, right?  Quantum mechanics isn't just a physical science, it's *physics.*  Physicists study quantum mechanics\u2014it's a specialty in their field.  Just google it, you'll save yourself the trouble.  This is a laughably absurd statement you're making. 

&gt;QM is metaphysics. Of course, it affects physics in certain ways such as photon and wave behavior. It's a dimension that is poorly understood. I don't need to ask physicists.

These statements demonstrate just how little you understand about the science.  Pick up a book on it or something, but I don't need to argue against claims that defy *facts.* 

&gt;My own father is a Nuclear Physicist and I understand the landscape.

Then either you don't understand your father, or he's been out of the industry for nearly 100 years. 

&gt;Anyone who claims to understand QM well is a fool. Nobody does.

This is a pretty blanket statement.  Nobody stands *everything* about QM, but the basics are pretty understandable.  I can give you a very brief synopsis of quantum indeterminacy, but you seem disinterested in actually understanding the science, and I'm not really interested in wasting my time.  I'm also not convinced you know much about physics in general, and I'm not really interested in giving you the full tour. 

&gt;It appears to be an abstraction layer operating in parallel, but transcending our own dimension. Some attribute it to the metaphysical dimension of mind. 

Thanks for the word salad.  None of this makes any sense.

&gt;Quacks like Lawrence Krauss 

Sorry, "quacks"?  Krauss is a recognized theoretical physicist and cosmologist, and a professor of the subject matter at an accredited university.  Carroll is a physicist and *research professor* at *Cal Tech*.  I think they know what they're talking about when it comes to physics.  Who are you, exactly?  

&gt;claim it exists as energy field that are 'Nothing' and somehow create Universes via infinitely improbable finely tuned fluctuations - even though none escape BGV proofs of a physical beginning of even these speculative Multiverse generators.

I'm sorry but the scientific ignorance here is starting to get overwhelming.  Please read up on what you're saying, you have no idea what you're talking about.  

The Borde-Guth-Vilenkin Theorem is a mathematical theorem that describes known patterns of expansion under *mathematical models.*  First, it works under the assumption of classical spacetime (something we have known not to be the case for over half a century).  Secondly, contraction/expansion models\u2014equally respectable ideas in the cosmological circles\u2014completely undo the BGV Theorem.  BGV depends on a notion of infinite expansion, but this concept is unproven and respectably disagreeable. Thirdly, the BGV doesn't even imply that the universe had a beginning: what it says is that near the point of singularity (assuming there is one), classical physics breaks down.  We've known that for a long time, that's why QM is so important. 

[Here's](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=X0qKZqPy9T8) a link where WLC demonstrates just how little he understands about Cosmology and the BGV.  I don't trust you'll be able to objectively watch it, but at least the material will be bouncing around in your brain from now on.

&gt;Demonstrate a QM based model that escapes BGV? No BS obfuscations, just do it.

Any and all [expansion contraction models](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cyclic_model).  
Since this is a debate sub.... *do you* support the death penalty? The fuck does that mean? 

Fair enough... Assuming cost weren't an issue? These sound like very political responses... 

Philosophically (not pragmatically) is it so much better that the death penalty should be banned, or do you believe it should be legal?  If legal, should it be enforced (and when)?&gt;I suggest if we debate in the future we keep one subject matter at hand.

It's easier to do that when we don't depend on numerous premises that need to be first established. 

&gt;It's easy to jump around with uneducated people but we both know this is going to result in what amounts to a term paper.

I'm not sure who you're referring to, but all of my points were taken directly from education resources.  

&gt;Anyways, thanks and let's nail some stuff down in the future.

At some point we'll nail down something with a consensus.&gt;LOL. Expansion and contraction (oscillation) models have been falsified since the 1970's due to thermodynamic entropy (heat decay) across any prospective cycles.

Thermodynamic entropy you say?  Let's hear what you think Thermodynamic entropy means in you own words?  Let me give you a hint: it doesn't demonstrate what you think it does.  If you had watched the Craig v. Carroll debate, you would have known that.  Then again, your scientific background seems pretty lacking, so maybe it's just easier to parrot WLC (who, by the way, *isn't* a cosmologist).

My suspicion is that you found the first sentence you didn't like, then jumped on it without reading the whole article.  From that same wikipedia article: 

&gt;&gt;This puzzling situation remained for many decades until the early 21st century when the recently discovered dark energy component provided new hope for a consistent cyclic cosmology.[2] In 2011, a five-year survey of 200,000 galaxies and spanning 7 billion years of cosmic time confirmed that "dark energy is driving our universe apart at accelerating speeds.

How outdated is your cosmology that you think expansion/contraction is still debunked?

&gt;Below is a link to Lawrence Krauss getting caught lying to the audience on this very subject (escaping BGV), in debate with Dr Bill Craig. Your atheist stooge Krauss gets caught red-handed doctoring an email from Dr Vilenkin to reverse the intended meaning. He should be fired. Krauss is an academic fraud - a very dishonest little man.

This is hilarious.  Do you only get your sources from reasonable faith and apologetic websites?  [Here's Krauss, publicly verified on Facebook, citing Vilenkin as affirming Krauss's summary of the email was accurate](https://www.facebook.com/permalink.php?id=54809333509&amp;story_fbid=10151721132708510)

In any case, between the two, I'm more interested in what Carroll has to say.  Krauss is ill-tempered in general.  And for the record Billy Craig is equally notorious for cherry-picking and misrepresenting quotes.  Here's [Carroll's mentioning of it in the past debate](http://www.preposterousuniverse.com/blog/2014/02/24/post-debate-reflections/):

&gt;&gt;Next, he tried to claim that our model violated unitarity (conservation of quantum information), which is flatly wrong. He supplied two pieces of evidence, in the form of quotes from Stephen Hawking and Chris Weaver. But the Hawking quote was completely out of context; he was talking about the fact that he no longer thought that wormholes would lead to violation of unitarity in black-hole evaporation, nothing to do with cosmology. 

But don't my word for it.  Watch the actual debate between Craig and Carroll.  Craig tries to use book quotes to prove his point, Carroll has direct quotes from the actual physicists explaining how he's mistaken.  That's what happens when you have apologists (and laymen) trying to interpret scientific information that requires years of study to fully appreciate.  You seem no exception to this observation. 

&gt;Really? We know block theory is correct and no tensed time exists?

Your reading skills are very bad.  My comment had nothing to do with block theory.  It had to do with a *classical view of spacetime* (read: lacking quantum systems).

&gt;Except all falsify due to thermodynamic entropy, so no escape.

Again, you definitely have no idea what thermodynamic entropy actually means... I sincerely recommend you read up on the papers and actual information before you start spewing uneducated nonsense.  Better yet, just watch the Carroll v. Craig debate I linked you earlier.  Thermodynamics are discussed there; thermodynamics do not demonstrate that the universe necessary *began to exist*.  

&gt;Ludicrous. Here is Vilenkin's explicit statement on the matter.

And you missed his point entirely.  He's not talking about a lack of eternity, he's talking about how the universe as it *currently exists* could not have an *eternal past* (employing the current framework of time we live in now).  There's honestly only so much I can do to help you here.  My best recommendation is to read up on what Sean Carroll and Lawrence Krauss *actually* stated (not just in the staging of a debate) and bother to understand what their positions are.  You're definitely not a physicist, so trying to use layman comprehension and seedy email exchanges as the basis for your argument are going to be laughably shortcoming.  Even your example of a doctored email was shown to be irrelevant, since Vilenkin himself agrees with Krauss's interpretation more than Craig's.

I'd like to take this shallow reply as an admission of defeat.  Allow me to return to your initial claim, that you "spank atheists" and point out exactly why this was an absurd proposition. 

1.  You clearly don't understand science.  Between questioning what sort of science quantum mechanics is, to failing to demonstrate your knowledge of thermodynamic, cosmology, or physics in general, I'm sure any person (excluding your deluded self), would agree that your grasp of the science behind your argument is tentative. 

2.  Your comprehension of your own arguments is tentative.  You call my responses "obfuscatory," but everything I have said has been in plain english.  I've provided links to every statement I've had, you've listed one that I then debunked with a direct quote from the physicist himself.  You either completely ignored or blatantly dropped contentions I raised with some of your premises, and though I've asked direct questions time and again, you've seemed to miss what a question mark means. 

3.  You don't seem to understand basic principles of argumentation.  You call my tactics "burden shifting" but I have addressed every single one of your challenges, even when your "challenge" was an evasive toss-back to contentions *I* raised.  You don't know the difference between sound evidence and a premise (or an argument, for that matter).  And you definitely don't understand that claims require sources, and then further defense when those sources are shown to be faulty.  

4.  You clearly have no interest in understanding new things.  You are set in a particular way of thinking, and rather than consider that your position may be wrong or misinformed, you'd rather sit happily in your ignorance with a thin wall of contrived defenses that have been addressed by counter-apologetics for ages.  Your insistence on "defeators" (hint: that isn't a word), and your complete lack of interest in asking questions of even pretending to know what is being discussed demonstrates your interest in just parroting ridiculous, antiquated arguments that are laughable in the apologetic and atheistic spheres.  

In short, enjoy your brash, embarrassing ignorance.  I wish you the best in coming to understand the real material one day\u2014the world of science is so enriching and wondrous I cannot even describe to you the mystery and awe that understanding can inspire.  But you don't have to chase it; you are welcome to hide behind your screen looking for "defeators" and dying dumb, misinformed, and missing everything wondrous about life.  

I leave that choice to you.  Not sure if you're blind or an idiot, but I already addressed that video in the comment before this (remember that facebook link?).  Vilenkin himself attests that the email summary is an accurate representation of the content Krauss was explaining.

I'm not wasting my time with someone so ignorantly stubborn that they don't even realize when their content has already been addressed.  Feel free to reply about "defeators" again (still not a word), I'm going to just pity your inability to comprehend objectivity.Totally read that in Mike Birbiglia's voice with an emphasis on "zany"&gt;I enjoyed exposing you.

Not an argument. 

&gt;Lying about the Vilenkin email Krauss doctored doesn't help. 

Not a lie.  Go back and read my comment where I linked Krauss *directly addressing this issue* and where he *directly quotes Vilenkin* as agreeing with his email.  Not my fault you can't or won't read.

&gt; None of those examples Krauss represented as escaping BGV, escape BGV.

That's because there's plenty of other science that completely brings what Craig raises from BGV into question.  Also, not that you'd understand, but there's actually *two* prominent physicists who disagree with the implications of BGV... Krauss is just one.  

&gt;Krauss deleted the pertinent facts and got caught red handed.

You seem disinterested in facts.  I already addressed this.  Beating someone over the head with this misunderstood point just makes your position look weaker.

&gt; Vilenkin in fact confirmed WLC was correct in an email to WLC.

He didn't, he said he "represented the material well," only to later attest that *so did Krauss*, but since this is your only weak defense, I can understand why you hug it so tightly.  Never mind the overwhelming body of evidence that isn't in the least bit controversial.

&gt;You are simply dead wrong and dishonest about the facts. You got caught with your pants down. Deal with it.

As proof to my statements before, this is not an argument. 

&gt;Don't pretend my ability to defeat you was an inability to comprehend you.

That's funny; you're good.  This was also not an argument, and you definitely have no idea what you're talking about (as evidenced by ignoring all my sources, dropping the *vast majority* of the contentions I have raised with you, and your uneducated understanding of the science).&gt; Are you claiming Krauss did not doctor the email?

He summarized it.  Go back and look at the FB link I cited where Krauss is confirmed to have done a *correct summary* __by__ Vikenkin himself. 

&gt;Why did Krauss doctor Vilenkin's email?

For laypeople (such as yourself) who would lose the content in the thick of technical detail that neither you or I could parse. 

&gt;What was ommitted?

According to Vilenkin, nothing of substance.

&gt;Are you claiming Krauss honestly represented Vilenkin's conclusions that none of the proposed models escaped BGV?

Yes, because Vilenkin said so. Read about it [Right. Here.](https://www.facebook.com/permalink.php?id=54809333509&amp;story_fbid=10151721132708510)

&gt;You lied segFault - and we both know it.

I think you're just illiterate.

&gt;Your attempts at obfuscation and appeal to the liar (Krauss) who was caught red-handed lying to a public audience in an international debate is just silly.

That's a fine misrepresentation of the facts.  Not that I'd expect you to know fact from fiction.  I especially love how you keep calling my tactics obfuscatory.  What was obfuscatory about posting the **direct link** to Vilenkin and Krauss's response?  Do big words just bother you?  Or do you really know that little about science. 

&gt;Now you are reduced to ad-hoc appeals to specualtions 

Speculations are not the same as theories.

&gt;about some hypothetical immaterial, timeless, spaceless dimension where quantum fields exist

"Hypothetical" is not as rigorous as a theory, either.  Poor word choice.  And for the record, your hypothetical scenario is a completely inaccurate depiction of what quantum fields are.  They don't "exist in a dimension."  I'm not really interested in educating you on the entirety of a science you fail to comprehend.  Just read one of the *many* citations I provided before (I'm sure you know how to scroll?).  In case you don't, here they are *again*: 

 [1](http://www.nytimes.com/2012/03/25/books/review/a-universe-from-nothing-by-lawrence-m-krauss.html?_r=0), [2, you'll need to do some searching](https://books.google.com/books?id=rcrf0P8DSe0C&amp;pg=PA170&amp;lpg=PA170&amp;dq=qft+eternal&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=ilsfDXoONx&amp;sig=5x5ejpcEMn_uEaRQwUw5MQt0Fxs&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CDcQ6AEwBWoVChMI3-PGyLe0yAIVUC2ICh1jww5o#v=onepage&amp;q=eternal&amp;f=False), [3](http://www.colorado.edu/philosophy/vstenger/Timeless/08-timeless.pdf).  

Ask [Sean Carroll](http://www.preposterousuniverse.com/blog/2014/02/24/post-debate-reflections/).  [Here's](http://soi.blogspot.ca/2014/04/the-essential-quantum-field-theory.html) a 101 forum on it.  It points out that the fields are not time-dependent.  [More stuff](http://phys.org/news/2015-02-big-quantum-equation-universe.html).

Failing all else, ask /r/askscience (there's no reason not to do this), I'm sure they'll be happy to elucidate more.

&gt;in NOWHERE IN SPACEbut have the capacity to actually create our physical Universe from no physical material.

Thank you for again demonstrating your science illiteracy.  Read the links above and actually bother to learn the material before spouting this nonsense, please.  It's embarrassing to watch.

&gt;Which oscillation models avoid the fatal problems of accumulated entropy or development of multiple singularities during contraction that render them incapable of sustaining bounce phases through cycles?

[The Baum-Frampton Model is just one, for example](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cyclic_model#The_Baum.E2.80.93Frampton_model).  

There's also [Loop Theory](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loop_quantum_cosmology) and [The Big Bounce Theory](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Big_Bounce). 

By the way, you seem fixated on oscillation models, I only provided those as *one set* of competing theories to Craig's cosmological ideas.  If you watch the Carroll debate (watch it, until you do I'll address this no further), you'll see there's a lot of assumptions Craig isn't permitted to make, but does about cosmology.  There's, in fact, *many* competing theories all respectable in their own way. 

&gt;I'm still waiting on a plausible escape from Contingency and KCA.

You haven't demonstrated anything about Contingency.  I already pointed out the argument is flawed from the beginning, because the formal MODAL definition of contingency does not require a necessary entity.  Have you studied modal logic?  My guess is, no.  

KCA is based on tons of misinformed assumptions by a religious philosopher trying to do PhD grade cosmology.  I've been trying to tell you that your science is seriously lacking, and you seem to pull out the same outdated responses that physicists have addressed for quite some time now.

&gt;You have utterly failed to provide a POSSIBLE escape from anything much less a MORE PLAUSIBLE alternative necessary to defeat the premise

Every one of the theories I've linked are well-vetted and respected cosmological theories that are *still actively debated* in today circles.  The fact that you think there's one solid theory that's "most plausible" demonstrates how little you understand about the ongoing discussions in the field.  You've cherry-picked a phenomenon that sounds good, called it "more plausible" because it sits will with your world view, and then think you know anything at all about anything.  It's very child-like to be honest. 

&gt;Also, I'm still waiting on your proof arguments and evidence that atheism is correct.

I've already told them to you (you really don't read my comments).  In the absence of any sound evidence, the more reasonable assumption is that the proposed entity does not exist.  It is reasonable to believe that unicorns do not exist because there is no evidence whatsoever about them\u2014the same can be said of a god.  I suggest you read up on Russell's Teapot to better understand that "absence of all evidence is evidence of absence" is a philosophically and logically supported claim.

There's also no *proofs* here, in either direction.  We live in a world where only one thing can be certain: "I exist."  Anything short of this is symbolically proven, or empirically demonstrated with the best possible evidence. &gt;You are simply dishonest. 

Facts are dishonest?  I genuinely don't even know how you'd think that, when all I've done is link objective sources...

&gt;We both know Krauss deleted the qualifiers from Vilenkin's statements that in fact reversed the conclusions 180 degrees.

Vilenkin doesn't seem to think so, read the FB post.  Are you saying you understand BGV better than the guy who thought of it? 

&gt;Krauss used deceit as a pretext to deny BGV held True against the models Krauss fraudulently represented as escaping BGV.

You sound particularly offended that the facts disagree with your perception of reality.  I mean, are *you* a cosmologist?  He (and Vilenkin) seem to be of an agreement of Krauss's interpretation.  I don't know how many ways you can reword the same thing you seem to be beating yourself over the head with, but we have a direct quote from Vilenkin himself, end of story. 

&gt;Krauss purposefully deceived the audience to a conclusion opposite of Vilenkin's True conclusion.

Take off the tinfoil hat and look at this objectively.  

&gt;This is a demonstrable fact

Then demonstrate it.  All you've done is linked to an apologetics site that shows that *Craig* (a religious philosopher) thinks that Krauss is saying something different.  As I've showed you now (maybe ten times), Vilenkin explains that Craig is incorrect in this assertion, and that Krauss had performed an accurate summary.  If you disagree with *evidence*, then to claim your "fact" you need to shoulder the *burden of proof*.  The fact that you don't seem to grasp this is very telling.

&gt;You remain dishonest in defiance of proof.

To be in defiance of proof you need to have proof.  I've already discredited your ridiculous article by a *quote, from the founder of the argument __itself__, explaining how Krauss has done no wrong*.  I'm not sure how many more ways I need to spell this out for you, but I'm sure you'll get it eventually.

&gt;Why are you are prostituting yourself for atheism?

I'm not sure what you mean by this.  Atheism isn't a movement, it's a belief.  And I'm not sure how one can prostitute themselves to a belief.  Do you have some examples, maybe a diagram? &gt;I was just reading Bertrand Russel's criticism of Aquinas the other day and he said basically the same thing...

Damn, I *need* to read this.  Which work?  Do you have a source?It's not that philosophy isn't equipped to deal with it (many philosophers these days get second degrees in physics or neuroscience, etc.), it's that philosophy isn't about ignoring the facts, and has to adapt to new acquisition of information. 

I'd say there's still plenty to digest in a philosophical sense from what we know today, but we can't just hold on to antiquated notions that defy facts, so Aquinas is out.&gt;However, you must check your premises. In order for a chain of contingencies to begin, it's beginning must be contingent upon something

I think you're misusing the definition of contingent here.  There's basically two definitions, but they are *vitally important* to be distinguished depending on the context.  When we're talking modally, my understanding is that contingent means "possible, but not necessary."  In other words, in some accessible worlds it will hold True, in others, False, but it is not necessary nor impossible. 

Now, the second meaning seems to be the one you're employing: "contingent things depend on something else to bring them about".  But that's a bit hasty, isn't it?  After all, to accept this claim means we need to accept a universal notion of causality, and that all things must be caused.  I take issue with this leap.  Yet, without this, then we are happy to accept some contingent things as just happenstance, and that's perfectly valid.  

Once we parse these two meanings, it becomes abundantly clear that the "argument from contingency" really depends on an argument for causality, of which there are many problematic premises (Hume had much to say on this).He'll tell you it's all in these books that he can't summarize or provide theses for, but that you're mistaken according to the books.  Are you convinced now? &gt; The likelihood that someone could have worked out the nuances of quantum mechanics without actually conducting experiments is stupendously low.

I don't disagree.

&gt;It could be argued that "philosophy" of sorts could be used to formulate hypotheses to test, but it is a philosophy that is constrained by the evidence of science...so pretty much just science.

I think we're talking about different things here.  Philosophy isn't in the place to make scientific claims, that's why they're different fields.  But that doesn't mean philosophy has no place using the information acquired by science to produce new ways of thinking and observing problems in the human condition. Rather, philosophy is in the business of answering different questions than science, or in ways in which science is currently unable to answer.Oh shit, a whole dedicated chapter from one of my favorite philosophers; I'm going to eat this up.I prefer "wooey"&gt;I didn't say philosophy was no longer equipped to handle anything...just that it is no longer relevant in the endeavor of understanding how the universe itself works and what it's made of.

By and large I'm inclined to agree here, though I do think at times philosophy is still needed to parse metaphysical positions (eg. neutral monism vs. materialism vs. physicalism).  &gt;So you're saying that a contingency is not the same thing as a causal relationship? 

Yessir. 

&gt;Also, could you explain more about "some accessible worlds?" I'm not sure what exactly you mean by that.

Accessible worlds is terminology from [modal logic](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Modal_logic).  A branch of modal logic is called "possible worlds theory" which is often used in modern adaptations of the Ontological argument.  An "accessible world" means a world that in some way can map back to us, in basic terms that means all "logically possible worlds," (though there are mappings that are stricter than this).  This excludes things like married bachelors, invisible colors, and immaterial material, but allows for things like parallel universes.  If something is "necessary," it means that it is True in *every* possible world, no exceptions (clearly that makes "necessary maximum beings" a questionable notion).  "Impossible" means it's *False* in every possible world. 

In these terms, "contingent" just means it's not impossible and it's not necessary.  Or more basically, that it's True in at least one world and False in at least another.

Note that this has nothing to do with dependency on anything else (beside the truth value in other worlds).  Modal logic does not require an assumption about causality.

&gt;Thanks for your response, by the way.

Sure thing.It's not just that they think it stopped, they *refuse* to listen to actual philosophical issues raised against him.  It's like he's bullet proof because they know he's the thin veil between their argument and delusion.
&gt;The discourse of ethics is also not scientific (regardless of what Harris incorrectly says using an overly broad sense of "science")

I agree.

&gt;and the majority of philosophers are also moral realists, so ethics is still a big component of philosophy that science can't ever handle.

Also True. 

&gt;It is extremely important, but it has not usurped the positions that metaphysics, epistemology, and ethics- amongst other fields in philosophy (such as aesthetics, or philosophy of mind)- hold.
Science is bolstered by philosophy, but philosophy is certainly neither irrelevant, nor replaceable.

Exactly right.  &gt;Through thorough study of history and philosophy

What about it do you respect, exactly? 

&gt;I personally believe Christianity to be a system of "slave morality", basically teaching you to forget all the joys and wonders this life has to have in hope for a possible one in the next. What do you think?

I don't think Christians see it that way (as an ex-christian I know I didn't).  If anything they view their life as more enriching for having temperance and a goal greater than themselves.  I can respect these positions in and of themselves.  

That said, I think the bigger problem is the way of thinking.  When you believe that there's a god who governs the universe and knows all things, you (typically) respect religious authorities on matters that are not really in their sphere.  Ol' Billy Craig is one who comes to mind\u2014he's a religious philosopher with an *appreciable* understanding of Cosmology, but nowhere near sufficient enough to be making the arguments he does in the debate sphere.  What this amounts to is believers holding a particular world view about things (prison reform, choice, civil rights), that is too heavily dependent on unqualified spokesmen in lieu of objective thinking.  It sets back human progress and, in terrible cases, actually causes a substantial amount of harm.&gt;I think your comment evidences a conflation of "objectivity" with "things that can be scientifically verifiable."

You've already read far too into my comment then.  I would have said science if I meant science.  That said, I do think science is a valuable tool and often provides a lot of information to make judgments that we normally wouldn't have, but I wouldn't dream of implying it's the only objective thing out there. 

&gt;The religious voice in relation to two of the three matters you cited\u2014abortion and civil rights\u2014is not an expression of science, per se, but rather of moral and ethical reasoning.

I wouldn't have tried to argue against that. 

Also, "choice" was not specific to abortion, it was about the notion of free will and moral accountability.  If you believe in LFW, then you believe that all people's actions are of their own accord, if you do not, then at some point we must recognize that there are ways to positively change a person's behavior other than beating them over the head with "you need to change." 

&gt;Objective thinking in such matters cannot be limited to the application of the scientific method, precisely because science tells us what is (at lest in part), but philosophy and theology tell us what ought to be

I agree, but I think philosophy does an adequate and sufficient job, many times in direct conflict with what religion has to say on the matter. 

&gt;Many Christians have eminently defensible philosophical reasons for taking the positions that they do on moral issues,

Then they're using philosophy, not religion, which is still objective and still not based on religious thinking, which is what I was calling dangerous. 

&gt;advancing indeed the view that there is such thing as an objective morality that is accessible not through the scientific method but through an appreciation for those principles that we know intrinsically as human beings.

Philosophy adequately addresses this, so I don't see where religious thinking has even come into play.  It sounds as though you agree that secular thinking (philosophy and science) *together* complete an adequate picture without religion, so I again maintain that religious thinking does nothing but cloud this objective way one can think. &gt;It has a better track record than most other religions, specifically the Catholic Church.

I can't forgive the CC for the Spanish Inquisition, the Crusades, and child molestation protection.  The "best" is still a really low bar that isn't worth respect, IMO. 

&gt;It helped boost science, it helped end slavery, it started Universities, and it has the largest amounts of charities.

These things are nice, and it's nice the faith coincidentally got us to this place, but this isn't a strictly *Catholic* thing.  We could have fully reached this same place without religious backing from the start.  I'm just not sold yet that this means they deserve some sort of respect. 

&gt;I never said I don't see the appeal of certain doctrines. I personally find it distasteful.

Which is fine.

&gt; Even if it were True, I think we live in a terrifying reality.


Terrifying and exciting all in one.
Thank you kindly!&gt;The Crusades was a defensive war against Muslim aggression.

That depends on who you're asking. 

&gt;And as for the molestations, while terrible, were not as huge as many people think.

It's not about numbers, it's about the blatant disregard for justice.  These are accused men who have sexually abused children and are giving them legal asylum despite all evidence and due process.  

&gt;The Church are dicks for covering it up, but nothing in the Catholic doctrine encourages child rape, the problem wasn't what they believed, it was that they were fucking kids.

But you've uncovered a double standard: either it's the institution or the doctrine that we give credit for.  If it's the institution, then we have a clear problem.  If it's the doctrine, then I'm not sure what about the doctrine we can really credit for scientific and philosophical advancements.  It seems that the CC has at least 300 years of regression in the doctrinal sense working against them. 

&gt;I think it's pretty intellectually dishonest to ignore their historical contributions.

I'm not ignoring them, I'm asking what they should be accredited to.  Seems to me we could have done without the CC and still made this, if not more progress.  So what about this should be accredited to the doctrine itself? This is actually a pretty good response for me to mull over.  I'd have to do the historical studies myself to see if this assessment really lines up with reality, but that said, there's some good points here to consider.

My first concern, however, is that history has not necessarily shown that doctrine applied to institution always brings about a net good.  For instance, the opposition to birth control and gay marriage, the violent crimes of the dark ages, the near theocratic power the pope adorned himself at various points in history.  While I can't deny up front the benefits you've proposed, my hesitation with crediting the catholic doctrine with the outcome has to do with a spotty and inconsistent past.

In other words, this inconsistency has led me to believe that some of these were advances of blind luck, rather than intentional advancements for the sake of what those advancements bring.  Some were certainly brought about by thinkers under the *umbrella of catholicism* without necessarily being tethered to its doctrine to bring about the change.

I guess my bigger issue is that, if we give doctrine the catalyst angle of the institution, the doctrine itself, while at times beneficial, does not consistently bring about this benefit that a direct conscious effort for it would.  It's sort of like moving to a new country but failing to adopt the culture, but telling oneself they have good intentions.  At times you may succeed in being polite, but other times your intention (the doctrine) will be off-the-mark.  &gt;But you specifically cited the notion of objectivity in your earlier top-level comment, and I deny that philosophy can arrive at any sort of objectivity vis-\u00e0-vis moral standards unless it ventures into the realm of natural theology, which is an extension of philosophy that attempts to investigate the transcendent without specific reference to revelation

This is a curious position to me.  What is it about moral inquiries that requires natural theology?  It seems to me many moral components come from evolutionary advantages and rational thinking in terms of what best benefits the self (in a contractarian and empathetic sense).

&gt;However this is not appropriately "secular" precisely because it is an inquiry into God, who natural theology would posit is the standard by which morality is objectively evaluated.

I'm wondering if you think this requires natural theology because moral philosophy often requires a "does this sound actually right to me?" which isn't as rigorous as something more objective.  However, it seems hasty to suppose that objectivity requires divinity in this case.  After all, we may all perceive "red" differently, but it's still the same wavelengths that are hitting our eyes, and to me "red" doesn't require a divine source. 

&gt;Without reference to such a standard I do not see how philosophy and science can together form a comprehensive moral framework that can be properly considered 'objective.'

Naturally I disagree, but at this point it's hard to object because I'm unsure why you think moral philosophy requires a natural theology.  From what I've studied, there's never needed to be an invocation of any god, and I have a relatively normal set of morals. Hasty generalizers are my favorite!  This should be fun.

&gt;You say this, but I have yet to see a single instance where an 'agnostic atheist' type person actually attacks Aquinas rather than their own misunderstanding of Aquinas

Lucky for you, I don't agree with the term "agnostic atheist," nice generalization though\u2014I'm just an atheist.  Sounds like you're about to make a new friend.

Also, I've had numerous discussions on the topic, and I've done my own independent study.  Name the Aquinas argument, and I'll tell you precisely why I disagree.  (Hint: the arguments lack soundness).

&gt;You've decided in advance God is a delusion!

Considering I'm an ex-theist who studied apologetics and lost my faith many years later, *while still studying apologetics,* I find this hasty generalization delightful.  If you actually care about the opposition, I'm happy to share with you what makes the arguments problematic, but don't resort to ad hominem again, it doesn't help your argument look stable.

&gt;round these subreddits there's these vague mutterings like Aquinas &amp; every cosmological argument have been soundly debunked, yet nobody can actually say why.

Let me solve that problem for you: the Cosmological arguments (in all their forms) are unsound.  KCA suffers from bad scientific evidence, as well as unfounded premises, for instance.

&gt;Most of the people saying this havne't even read them.

I have.

&gt;People think they can have an opinion on this while not understanding the difference between soundness and validity.

I do.  Is this going to be a discussion about why you think logically valid arguments are sufficiently reasonable?  Because if so, I'm going to ask why you don't believe Russell's Teapot is really out there in space. 

&gt;I mean holy shit there are legitimate ways to disagree with Aquinas but the overwhelming majority of the time, around these parts, the disagreement is just a mix of bias and confusion.

I see a fairly heterogeneous mixture. 

&gt;Generally some reading has to be done in order to understand something.

I've done it.  But you can't just leave it at that.  It's also on the defender to be able to justify their position.  Every time I've engaged here, I leave on a sour note because the defender of the argument just leaves with "it would take a book," which is absolute bullshit (and I'll call anyone on it if he or she devolves to this).  Even tomes with tremendous chapters have theses and summaries for what the content is about.  Then when things are unclear, they get unpacked, and things that are agreed upon, are agreed.  

To cut to the chase with Aquinas, his premises are prescriptive, not descriptive.  So naturally you'll see the patterns of causality (eg. Unmoved Mover) because they've already been prescribed.  That's not how to justify a sound argument, however.

&gt;I'll settle for maybe someday people at least not attacking the Kalam while thinking they are attacking Aquinas.

Lucky for you I know the difference. 

&gt;PS: If you hadn't, to use the top of this comment chain's word, presupposed that belief in God is delusional you might realize that not agreeing with you isn't actually the same as refusing to listen.

And *your hurt feelings* has clouded your judgment and led you to a False generalization of me.  I didn't say I reject the arguments because the belief is delusional, I simply said I find the belief delusional (and that theists depend on Aquinas's arguments to maintain a supposed reasonable position for god).  I disagree with the arguments for entirely different reasons. That's just because he's referring to the prime mover argument (or unmoved mover), which is also problematic for different reasons.Don't bother, he's an idiot.&gt; Where does this fact fit into your worldview?

I agree that he doesn't know shit about philosophy and has a poor attitude in general, which is why I only ever cite him when I'm talking about physics.  

edit: So what's your point?&gt;Here is Vilenkin's unambiguous quote

You've completely forgotten how I already addressed this, and how Vilenkin was talking about an __eternal past__, which is *different* from a __timeless__ entity (such as quantum fields).  But since your dumb dumb brain seems unable to grasp what I've been trying to tell you, let's play devil's advocate for a moment.  Let's pretend that what you *think* Vilenkin is saying is what he's actually saying.  He is quoted saying this in 2006.  Guess when the Facebook post Krauss wrote confirming Vilenkin's support of his position was written.  __2013.__

Even if we granted your quotation as being relevant (which would require a significant degree of scientific ignorance), you'd have to accept the fact that, *since then*, Vilenkin has admitted that Krauss's interpretation of the argument still allows for what he was positing.  I don't know how else to get the fact that you're wrong across to you, but here's hoping stooping to your level of ignorance will get us somewhere. 

&gt;You are lying outright to claim Krauss was 'saying something different' by butchering Vilenkin's email to completely reverse the conclusions. 

I don't know how a post by *Vilenkin himself* can be lying, but I'd be interested to see how you aim to prove that.  

Does adding it here somehow make you accept it more?  Here: 

&gt;&gt;"In response to the noise regarding the use of an email communication between the two of us in a dialogue with William Lane Craig, there are two relevant points we have decided to make.

&gt;&gt;1. we both willingly agreed to the request from Dr. Craig to have the full email, which had been edited on the powerpoint slide simply to save time during a 15 minute presentation by Krauss, as there was nothing in the full correspondence that either of us were concerned about sharing.

&gt;&gt;2. we both agree that the edited version does not distort the content or ideas expressed in the original email at all. Those who are claiming otherwise, including apparently Dr. Craig, are mistaken.

&gt;&gt;Lawrence Krauss and Alex Vilenkin"

[Confirmed facebook post, 9/24/2013](https://www.facebook.com/permalink.php?id=54809333509&amp;story_fbid=10151721132708510).

&gt;You have lost this debate on the merits.

This is not an argument.  Nice opinion though.

&gt;Of course, you can keep shoveling BS to deflect and obfuscate from the fact you have lost badly, but you are just prostituting yourself for atheism.

I'm sorry, but I just can't help but find it hilarious that plain-english quotes __with citations__ and scientifically backed statements are "obfuscatory" to you.  

You never explained what prostituting myself to a belief was, but I'm interested in what you think that means.

&gt;Pretending you don't know what I mean and asking for diagrams is just more dishonesty. You know exactly what I mean.

I sincerely don't.  These are incoherent particulars.

&gt;Now go back in your hole atheist.

This is not an argument (in case you haven't been able to figure that out yet). &gt;You have failed to demonstrate Bill Craig is wrong.

I'll quote Vilenkin for you (again, 4th time now): 

&gt;we both agree that the edited version does not distort the content or ideas expressed in the original email at all. *Those who are claiming otherwise, __including apparently Dr. Craig__, are mistaken.*

From [here](https://www.facebook.com/permalink.php?id=54809333509&amp;story_fbid=10151721132708510).

&gt;You were defeated badly and exposed as ignorant on these topics. 

It's funny to me that you think that, since I still have a whole list of contentions from way above that you never addressed.  Not that this one was adequately done, but there you go.

&gt;In fact, it was your atheist brethren Krauss who was exposed as misrepresenting science, committing academic fraud, and being caught red-handed lying to audiences in international debates.

Do you just not read my comments?  I must be talking to a bot, because Vilenkin (you know the V in B__V__G) seems to think there's no misrepresentation going on. 

&gt;How dare you pretend Dr Craig's understanding is insufficient when not one person can present a defeator to his premises in Kalaam or Contingency or Fine Tuning....?

I'll say this: Bill Craig is one of the worst apologetic debaters I have ever heard.  Not that I'm incredibly impressed with Plantinga and the like, but damn, at least they know what the hell they're talking about.  Literally none of Craig's arguments have ever held a candle to a rational objective observer; it makes it pretty clear when you're so willing to kiss his ass how un-objective your thinking is.  And before you start equating me with Krauss, I don't think he's a great debater either; and he's equally misinformed on subjects outside his forte.  But at least I have the decency and honesty to admit that, and look to others for philosophical understanding. 

edit: Also, "defeator" really isn't a word.  I'm not sure where you came up with it, but it's not in the english dictionary.  This is telling as to how thoroughly you read my comments, since I've told you this 3 times already.

&gt;Of course in typical atheist fashion, you'll respond with deflections and obfuscations that answer nothing to avoid ever having to take responsibility....

What obfuscations?  Cite some please?  I think it's pretty clear what my position is and where I got it from.  I've linked you to at least 10 different resources by now to get you started.&gt; Rather, I am saying that any moral system that makes the specific claim of objectivity\u2014which you explicitly brought up in an earlier comment\u2014requires an appeal to a universal, transcendent, objective standard against which all morality is measured, a standard usually called "God."

I think you're pidgeon-holing "objective" here.  Things can be objective without requiring an ultimate source.  Examples are mathematics, principles of logic, what it means to be "hungry."  The latter-most example I find the most interesting, because in one sense, there's a subjective component to it, but it is nonetheless objective in the manner in which we can observe the phenomenon.  

In any case, I don't really subscribe to an "objective" moral framework, I subscribe to a universal [inter-subjective standard](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Intersubjectivity) for morality, which leaves humans accountable to one another (and able to reason upon ethics), but doesn't lend itself to some ultimate source.

&gt;In other words, accepting that evolution has resulted in certain pro-social behaviours will only get us to the point at which we can say that an action is good relative to the reproduction of genes and sometimes more broadly to the propagation of the species itself.

Almost, but reproduction isn't the only factor evolutionarily that determines if something might be good.  Game theory has shown that cooperation yields a net benefit to everyone, so it stands to reason that we also evolved to be cooperative and empathetic.  We're also rational, and recognize that codifying behavior means those guarantees are reciprocated back to us.  In this sense, "goodness" can be perceived as the culmination of this evolutionary advantage, and in fact brings us pleasure because we know it also benefits us.

&gt;These are philosophically respectable systems.

There's also virtue ethics and contractarianism, to name a few more.

&gt; But they do not arrive at the same level of objectivity that a theistic moral system does precisely because the standard against which they measure is really only the social well-being of other people

I agree, but I'd raise the question why the degree of objectivity you're seeking is necessary or should even be considered.  If we are at a place where we can hold one another accountable, then surely we've reached a sufficient place that emulates the way we behave in the *real* moral sphere.  It's as if you and I were playing a game of chess.  We know the rules and agreed upon them; now we can talk about whether a move is valid, and which moves yield a better result, but the rules in and of themselves are only objective in that we set them up and agreed upon them ahead of time.  Yet, this is all that is necessary for a fair and consistent game of chess.

What is the significance of being metaphysically good or bad (and I'm not sure that atheistic models can't adopt some framework under which this is still True), besides begging the question to a deity? 

That's why I only care what he has to say about science.  When Craig attempts to make arguments that depend on science, I'm looking to the expert.  Craig's arguments are philosophically weak as well, but I use different sources for that consideration.Actually I was hoping you'd give me more.  I love seeing that grin on your face as you smack my ass and whisper "defeators".Good on you, you're setting a great exmaple.  I'd say an even *more* important thing we can all do (and it's free) is to encourage everyone to get off their asses for the democratic primaries.  Hillary's supporters tend to be institutional democrats, usually across the board, which means they tend to outnumber younger voters (Bernie's demographic).  

But if the guy can get a record-breaking 24,000 people in Boston to a rally, we can sure as hell commit to putting his name on a piece of paper just *once* in our life.Yes, then Time Warner (owner of CNN) called and said they "better fucking clean up this mess" or so-and-so is out of a job, and now you see the current headlines. Shit, I had no idea reddit has 200m MAU.  How are they getting that number?  If it's just by cookies/apps, then we can consider a decent number of duplicates, because I access reddit from my phone and my laptop, and my phone's browser (and my gaming laptop). 

I'd say the number you raised give it enough noise to make the numbers at least a little uncertain, but as others have mentioned, the influx of page likes, across the board polling with similar numbers, and the set of undecideds in CNN's own sample group lead me to believe at least some of that poll difference is significant. They should do one with Webb: Hank Hill + Christopher Walken.I have to say, a Sanders/O'Malley ticket would be pretty freakin' sweet. 

I don't hate Hillary, but after last night I'd have to say I definitely would prefer O'Malley to HRC. &gt;You cite the proven liar Krauss's facebook propaganda claiming more stuff from Vilenkin.

It's literally what Vilenkin wrote alongside Krauss, but it sounds like nothing from Krauss will convince you (nice unbiased stance there buddy). 

Ok, so you won't believe what Krauss says, what about Caltech renowned research professor of cosmology and physics, Sean Carroll, who said the following in *his* debate: 

&gt;&gt;So I explained what every physicist who has thought about the issue understands: that the real world is governed by quantum mechanics, and the BGV theorem assumes a classical spacetime, so it says nothing definitive about what actually happens in the universe; it is only a guideline to when our classical description breaks down. Indeed, I quoted a stronger theorem, the \u201cQuantum Eternity Theorem\u201d (QET) \u2014 under conventional quantum mechanics, any universe with a non-zero energy and a time-independent Hamiltonian will necessarily last forever toward both the past and the future.

Carroll also had an exchange with Alan Guth (the G in __BVG__), guess who also thinks the universe didn't have a beginning in the way you'd like it to?  [Here's](https://vimeo.com/85373249) Guth talking about our misunderstanding of time in reference to "infinite pasts".  

How about a quote from Vilenkin himself, from the book *Many Worlds in One* (which you quoted earlier): 

&gt;&gt;Theologians have often welcomed any evidence for the beginning of the universe, regarding it as evidence for the existence of God \u2026 So what do we make of a proof that the beginning is unavoidable? Is it a proof of the existence of God? This view would be far too simplistic. Anyone who attempts to understand the origin of the universe should be prepared to address its logical paradoxes. In this regard, the theorem that I proved with my colleagues does not give much of an advantage to the theologian over the scientist.

Still burying your head in the sand?  More Vilenkin: 

&gt;&gt;[T]he state of \u201cnothing\u201d cannot be identified with absolute nothingness. The tunneling is described by the laws of quantum mechanics, and thus \u201cnothing\u201d should be subject to these laws. The laws of physics must have existed, even though there was no universe.

These are all directly from the guy who wrote the theorem itself\u2014no word play or misdirection you can employ by claiming "email doctoring" (even though it was just summarizing).

&gt;Until you can defeat an argument from WLC, your opinion is trash.

Here's the thing about Craig: he isn't a scientist.  He doesn't understand physics and he doesn't comprehend when he's wrong.  He cherry-picks scientific statements without the full-context, and then applies philosophical interpretations on them to try and make his point.  The problem is, both the philosophy and the science as he employs it are incorrect.  

You can bow down and worship the guy, but all you're doing is showing a complete blindness to the facts. 

&gt;Dr Craig is a first rate Analytic Philosopher doing top shelf work in Philosophy.

No, he isn't.  Even my layman studies of philosophy are enough to recognize when his application of philosophy is extremely problematic.  Where are his articles on the Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy?  Why can't he argue well against Stephen Law, a *real* philosopher?  

&gt; He maintains a highly disciplined life of intense study, writing and lectures.

If he had any actual new arguments from debate to debate, I might actually consider what you said, but he hashes out the same disproven arguments time and again to every debate he attends.  His studies are lectures are largely to those who already share his opinion (that's not academically rigorous), and his publications are largely recognized in only christian spheres.  

&gt;Quite frankly, Krauss is not fit to lick Craig's shoes. Krauss is nothing more than a classless atheist tool - a real stooge.

This is not an argument, this is a claim.  Not that I care, because Krauss isn't necessary to debunk Craig's KCA.Exactly my thoughts as well.  Also, I wasn't sure if O'Malley was just parroting lots of Sanders's talking points, but they both seemed to have a vested interest in the people, which is why I think I gravitated towards him as a good runner-up.I don't think it was the tool they were discrediting, but the sample group (which is bullshit, because why even host the poll if you think it isn't going to be reliable?)Isn't that, at least, indicative of the type of person Bernie is (and his support), to mobilize such crowds?  Whether we want to talk about intentional spamming (which is possible, though I only knew of one poll at the time), it's interesting to see what sort of eagerness people have for the guy.Why weren't the other candidates encouraging people to participate in the polls?  If it's really a matter of biggest voice or crowd indluence, only one candidate seems to be asking the people to be engaged.  &gt; None of the candidates were asking for you to go vote online for them, that'd be pathetic. 

I'm aware, but none of them (besides Sanders) seemed to ask us to even assess how we felt the debate was going.  

&gt;It's incredibly easy to get a large number of people from the Sanders base, who it's no secret have a much larger internet presence than any other candidate

That's sort of my point.  The average internet user isn't a white liberal male anymore.  We have all demographics all over the world, and it's not like Facebook is a difficult site to maneuver.  Yet only one of the 5 candidates had a body of supporters active enough to mobilize their followers.  I mean, it's not like they were asking us to even step away from our computers.

&gt;to follow a link and click a button regardless of his performance because they already like him.

Now I do agree it's disingenuous to ask someone to just vote "Bernie" because his name is somewhere, but it's not like we had to vote that way.  I was almost tempted to vote for O'Malley myself, since I thought of the three, he earned the most respect from me this debate.  

&gt;It in no way makes it an accurate reflection of what viewers of the debate thought.

I recognize this, my point was broader-strokes.  The fact that Bernie is *capable* of such a movement is indicative of something, and we can't chalk it all up to internet literacy. &gt;The zone where the constants work together to create situations compatible with life.

No that's not what I'm talking about, please carefully read the distinction I'm making. I'm talking about the sample space of the *possible* values *compared* to the range of life-producing values. If the sample-space is infinite, it's unintelligible (the PDF is undefined), so you need to actually define a probability density function over this range.  If you can't (which is my guess, because I'm not even sure how anyone *could*), then you can't really say yet that our universe was *finely* tuned.   

Let's say we're talking about universal constant *x* and we want to determine the probability that it actually is finely tuned.  We need two things then: 1, the range at which the value attains life (R(life)), 2, the distribution function over which the *possible* values *x* could have been (R(possible)).  This leaves with three possibilities: 

    (i)
    ...........|_____x_____|........ R(life)
    |_______...(huge)..._________| R(possible)

    (ii)
    ....|______x______|..... R(life)
    ..|________________|.. R(possible)

    (iii)

    .....|________x______|..... R(life)
    ............|_______|............ R(possible) 



Clearly what you want to say is that (i) is the case.  Namely that the range of possible values x could have been is large compared to R(life), but still intelligibly defined. But unless you can properly provide the PDF of R(possible), it's equally plausible that either ii (life -capable universes are common) xor iii (life-capable universes are guaranteed w.r.t. *x*) are True instead.  

__My guess is you'll want to opt for (i) being the case, but my question is, why should I believe you?__

&gt;As I've pointed out, we actually can simulate what happens with various values for the constants, and see what kind of universe we get.

Also not what I was talking about from before.   &gt; Because I want a better reason to change my belief than solely arguments against other beliefs.

Is that what you think atheism is about?  Like any other belief, atheists are (or at least can be) solely interested in arriving at the truth to come to their conclusion.  And truth, I think we will both agree, is what keeps us rational, healthy, happy.  This is not some crusade against other ideas, this is an exploratory venture into questions that many find unsettling.  

The typical response is that each argument alone does not get us to judeo-christian god. Rather the collective, likely in supplement with other arguments like modal OAs get us much closer.  For instance, if you end up accepting the argument from motion, then you admit there must be a necessary being.  Well one of the first premises of Plantinga's Modal OA is that a necessary being possibly exists.  Had you accepted the argument from motion, you'd no long be justified in rejecting this premise for the modal OA, and as a result the case would continue to snowball against atheism, deism, or anything wholly different from the classical  judeo-christian description.

 So which of Aquinas's arguments do you think are sound? You just said you applied the soundness requirement to Aquinas.

(here: I certainly do.  Something is reasoned to be True if there is a sound argument behind it, not just because Aquinas says it.)

I'm curious what your conclusion is.&gt; I said that I don't assume that Aquinas is right just because he says something. If I think he's right, it will be due to sound arguments, not because he says something. But this doesn't mean I think he's right.

I understand what you're saying, I'm asking a separate, but very clear, question: Do you think Aquinas is right?&gt;Alright then. What's an argument for atheism?

The argument is as follows: 

1.  Given: Being rational is preferable to being irrational (there's more to this, but let's agree it's a shared assumption)
2.  Given: To be rational means to hold beliefs in accordance with what the evidence says ("evidence" being body of facts that support a claim; again, there's more to this but I think it's a pretty reasonably shared assumption). 
3.  Given: the term "God" here applies to an interventionary, omnipotent, omniscient, *possibly* omnibenevolent being. 
4.  Claim: The evidence for the existence of God (capital "G") is reasonably exceeded by the evidence against this God (by virtue of the philosophical arguments for god being more reasonably rejected than accepted, and the evidential arguments against an intervening force).
5.  Therefore, if we are to be reasonable and rational, we must conclude that God does not exist.  

I emphasized God vs. god because "god" is not a thing one can disprove.  If the definition does not include "intervening" (perform(es/ed) miracles), etc., then we're left with a nebulous definition that doesn't bear much meaning in the first place. After all, we cannot inductively disprove a thing, but we can falsify things that has arguments or facts that allegedly point to the existence of this thing.  

This is not a controversial definition of "atheist," either.  The SEP points out that the common term of atheism applies generally to judeo-christian like God (or other world religions), for instance.  Even Bertrand Russell, a prominent atheist philosopher, stated that he is agnostic w.r.t. "god" but atheist under the better understood definition pertaining to "God".&gt;I don't know. I haven't committed to anything. All I have are live arguments on the table which I consider.

Interesting, would you say you're an agnostic then? Got it, thanks.&gt; Your first comment said "this is not some crusade against other ideas", and yet your argument is entirely against one idea, with no alternative idea being presented to argue for.

It's arguing for being rational.  Wasn't that obvious from the premises?

Or put it this way, suppose we disagree on whether a certain brand of ice cream exists (call it Snide and Larry's).  Suppose I say it doesn't exist, and you say it does.  Your current complaint against atheism is equivalent to "but you're not arguing about any *flavor* of Snide and Larry's!"  Well... yeah, because I don't think Snide and Larry's is a real brand.  *What would it even mean for someone like me to argue __for__ something about Snide and Larry's?*

&gt;Besides which, I wouldn't classify "atheist" as a belief system on its own, not on the level of religion.

Well because once you accept that Snide and Larry's is real, there's a whole set of other questions about which flavors are real, which are better, etc.  So obviously atheism is less comprehensive in this regard, because we state that Snide and Larry's isn't real at all. 

&gt;After all, you probably have more metaphysical beliefs than "the Judeo-Christian God doesn't exist."

"Judeo-Christian God doesn't exist" isn't really a metaphysical belief necessarily.  It's sort of a separate category that can bleed into metaphysics once said belief has been established.  In any case, because of this, atheists obviously don't share in metaphysical beliefs across the board\u2014but neither do theists.  Some are idealists, some are dualists, etc. 

Me, I'm probably a neutral monist.  At least, that one makes the most sense to me. 

&gt;For instance, do you agree or disagree with this statement?

&gt;"The natural universe is all that exists."

Assuming by "universe" you mean "Universe" (which possibly allows for multiverse theory, etc.), sure.  Not all atheists would agree, however. 

I'm not sure Aquinas's arguments are really evidence either... Part of the precondition for it being evidence is that it is a body of *facts* or known information that inform a decision. Arguments, by virtue of the fact that they are simply a formulation of reasoning on propositions, are not evidence necessarily\u2014they must also be sound to count.

Aquinas's arguments are far from factual, and I'd go so far to say that they are also more reasonably rejected than not.&gt; His arguments are not inferences to the best explanation.

I know.

&gt;If the premises are True, the conclusion follows necessarily.

Yes, I'm saying what makes Aquinas's arguments fail as *evidence* is by virtue of the fact that the premises are questionable at best. For instance, the argument from contingency depends on the PSR (a strong form, no brute facts exist) being True, but most today reject such forms of the PSR.What about it? 

It's largest objections surround an anthropic look at how events occur (beginning, middle, end are arguably arbitrarily defined), there's a possible contradiction in the premise that whatever is moved must be moved by another (how can there therefore be an unmoved mover?), the argument fails to account for the possibility of eternal existence wherein everything has always been in motion (and in fact, this is a perfectly plausible state of things), etc. 

My biggest issues with it are the clear emphasis on the anthropic principle for defining actuality/potentiality as well as (should we recognize that the argument is atemporal) again depending on the PSR to carry the weight of refuting the possibility of an eternally "moving" universe.

It's pretty clear that if we can rationally raise objections to the premises, they certainly aren't facts that can make for a sound argument (and therefore again fails as evidence).&gt; There is no contradiction, the argument itself establishes that nothing can move itself.

Sure.

&gt;You can't just say everything was in motion without a mover because that is exacty what Aquinas is arguing against so you can't just assume that.

But it's certainly possible *prima facie* for the universe to actually be this way (physics certainly supports this idea), so Aquinas can't just say, "well, ignore that bit, I'm saying it simply can't be, let's move on with the argument". It has to be justified why eternal motion isn't an acceptable counter-example. Aquinas aims to do this by proving infinite regress of essentially ordered series is impossible, but this depends on the impossibility of brute facts (the PSR) which would have allowed for an accidentally ordered series from existing without "cause" or "source".

But the contradiction is still present regardless of the other criticism I just raised.  If something in motion cannot move itself, it seems then it must be said that the unmoved mover is not in motion (or "doing" anything).  Otherwise, something *can* move itself, and we have a contradiction of the premise as you worded it.  I'm not saying there aren't responses back to this, but I don't think I've seen an adequate response that isn't deceptively somehow circular.&gt; Are you suggesting that Gaussian or Cauchy curves aren't infinite tailed? They literally have an infinitesimal probability at at one point.

Are you prepared to define a Gaussian or Cauchy like curve that represents the *actual* probability density function of possible values of universal constants?  I'm saying it can't and hasn't been done.  And the broader point still is that Gaussian or Cauchy like curves are not uniformly distributed, they approach statistically significant probabilities (anomalies) very rapidly with respect to an *infinite* uniform distribution. 

&gt;Consider the hypothetical case of where life is only possible if constant a is positive and b is positive. This defines a space which is a quarter of the infinite space despite each point having an infinitesimal probability.

Sure, it takes a quarter of the *space*, but it's not a quarter of the *space of probabilities*.  You can't get around leaving the question of "what is the probability that x should be within the sweet-spot range vs. not" unanswered.  Density, for instance, can never be negative, so clearly it's insufficient (as we both should know by now) to frame the problem without the PDF of the possible values attainable for each constant. Because, if both a and b are density functions, then even though there's *conceivable* values in the other 75% of the space, the only possible values are the very ones in which (a, b) inhabits. Leaving us an *actual* 100% probability of it being a "fine-tuned" result. 

&gt; Prima facie, sure. But in the argument he goes on to show that that is impossible.

That can't be. If it were True, Aquinas could have been said to disprove the PSR.  As I said before, his attempt at proving it is to show infinite regress is impossible, but this argument largely fails *because* it's possible for this eternally moving bodies to be factually True as a matter of brute fact.

&gt;Yes! The unnoved mover is not in motion of course. It is unmoved.

But lacking motion means also not changing, which means this mover therefore (paradoxically) *can't* move, think, feel, etc. To call it an *unmoved mover* directly conflicts with premise 2, because if it was unmoved, it can't be said to be in motion, but to not be in motion means to also be incapable of causing motion at all. Since, as any good thomist will posit, things not in existence cannot bring about themselves, then the existence of the action that brings about motion from this unmoved mover cannot be brought about except for a thing *in motion*.  Well it's interesting because I'd actually like to defend, a bit, the attack on theism as a source for violence while simultaneously defending against returning the favor back onto atheists. 

When an atheist condemns the actions of theistic atrocities, the usual thinking behind it is that the worldview motivated the action.  More precisely, an unfortunate byproduct of most holy texts is that they encourage violence in one way or another.  Even more generally, the general discouragement of challenging religious authority makes it more difficult to peruse the moral sphere under religious dogma. The person on attack then lists atrocities that seem clearly religiously tied, whether because of theocratic involvement, or religious motivation to prevent positive change. 

The theist, in response to this criticism, has two methods of attack: 

1. She can attempt to redirect the attack onto the individuals, not the worldview itself.  The very fact that our present-day theist condemns the past actions indicates that it's not *necessary* that religion bring about violent action.  What's more, the theist will argue, it's *because* of her religious conviction that she now opposes these atrocities. 

2.  She can try and put the shoe on the other foot, and point out atheist leaders who also committed atrocities. 

Option 2 (the one you mentioned in the OP) seems categorically misplaced.  It misses the forest for the trees, insofar as the criticism of the religious attacks were not just "religious people doing bad things" but "religious people doing bad things *because* of what their worldview tells them to do/think".  Atheism is permitted a free-pass at this criticism, by virtue of the fact that atheism does not, by virtue of accepting it, produce a new set of moral, philosophical, and practical rules that one must follow because of it.  Theism clearly does, or else it seems to (arguably) provide nothing of value.  __So with respect to your actual question, it seems you can point out to the theist that they are misunderstanding the criticism by pointing out "bad atheists" as a counter-argument.__

This leaves the theist with option 1. I think there's more opportunity to make a better case for herself, but even here I think the defense falls short of swaying.  After all, while we can attempt to provide alternative motives for the Inquisition or the Crusades (perhaps it was political, etc.) the fact remains that (i) religion was used to *justify* these actions and (ii) the alleged religious authorities used the same texts and institutions currently in existence to enact these atrocities.  The atheist may be justified in questioning how we can trust that the "good theist's" position is more religiously correct compared to the "bad theist's".  After all, both in theory use the same text and reasoning to come to their conclusions: what's to stop the theist from making the same mistake at a later point?  

And perhaps a better criticism leveled against option 1 is that, at least by historical accounts, religious moral thinking seems to not really have brought us closer to a "good world".  In fact, some have argued that it is the secularist's response *to* religious thinking that has even brought us to our current moral lifestyle.  I don't know how warranted this claim is, but it certainly puts pressure on the theist to make the case that religious thinking can bring us to a *better* place than without it, given the clear costs that this way of thinking has in the past, permitted.&gt; How would you divide atheists?

Well in the case of Stalin vs. Dawkins, for instance, their political and philosophical ideologies seem like a meaningful distinction. &gt; Bringing these up in arguments is used to emphasise that people do bad things, that is in the nature of humanity, regardless of belief in a religion.

But supplemental to this is that theism was used as the catalyst to the bad behavior, whereas atheism (in and of itself) did not.  There are plenty of religious verses and authorities that support violence and subjugations of certain people.  Atheism (in and of itself) has no such authority.  And yes, it is True that under both frameworks, someone can *reason* to being good or bad, only under one system (namely theism) is the encouragement of bad behavior seemingly institutional to the framework.&gt; ........
&gt; The argument if successful shows that an infinite regress of essentially ordered causes is impossible. The exact thing you say is possible.

It's only impossible for infinite regress if the PSR is True.  That's the whole point of the criticism. edit: the general response to deniers of the PSR is: if brute facts are possible, then it's possible for an infinite chain of accidental causes (by virtue of it being brute fact).  This can be simplified by saying that the existence of everything (ie., "why is there something rather than nothing?") does not require an explanation.

&gt;True. This isn't a problem for the judeo-christian God who does not move and is all knowing so does not "think".

That seems contradictory to the God who considers Abraham's prayers to save Sodom and Gomorrah. 

&gt;The UM is not material. It doesn't need to change to be able to change other things.

If a different state is needed to be obtained for something to take place (including the willing of something into being), then change certainly does seem necessary. 

&gt;Have you actually gone through the threads in r/cosmologicalargument?

Yes, I debate with hammie very, very often.&gt; However, I do believe that atheistic ideals can support violence and murder, as well as compassion and kindness. 

There's no such thing as atheistic ideals.  Atheism is strictly the position that God does not exist. 

&gt;Stalin's persecution of Christians was certainly atheistically motivated, as was, to a large extent, the attacks of French revolutionaries on France's religious.

No, it was philosophically or politically motivated. Atheism does not produce a motive (insofar as the definition is concerned) for anything other than to say "I deny that God exists".  Perhaps these philosophies were derived in absence of a religious authority (they can be said to be secular), that doesn't mean atheism compels such philosophies necessarily (some secular philosophies are also quite good, *better*, in fact, than many religious ones). The converse cannot be said of theism, whereby a direct authority is clearly implemented.

&gt;Yes, their political ideals propelled their overall movements, but their atheism propelled these particular previously mentioned aspect.

I'm not sure how you plan to make this case, but I'm going to simply redirect to my comment that atheism does not inform anyone of anything, other than a rejection in the positing of a God.  At best you can say that secular philosophies are not kept in check by religion, but this is circular if your whole point is to prove that religion is the "good" source.&gt; That distinguishes them as people, but that doesn't describe a difference in their atheism - which is the kind of distinction OP seemed to be going for.

But atheism doesn't inform us of anything with respect to a particular belief.  It would be nonsensical, and worse, distracting from the actual motives of these individuals.&gt; But it's clear that the fact that these movements were inherently atheistic is what lead to the attacks on religious members of the communities.

What do you mean by this?  How can something be inherently atheistic?  The movements were clearly anti-religious, but anti-theism does not stem from theism, it stems from quirky philosophy or political ideology, which is my point.

&gt;If the movements were Christian movements, the attacks would certainly not have occurred

Well nobody is going to attack themselves if they're driving by the belief that they're way of thinking is correct.  But that has nothing to do with the issue *I* raised, which is that religion, in part, seems to be blamable for atrocities since its institution can be used to justify them.  Atheism (in and of itself) does not afford this, but requires *additional* rationale above and beyond the simple rejection of deities. 

&gt;Again, using this reasoning, atheism cannot produce a motive for good, kind actions.

I recognize this.  But the point is that it opens the door for free thinking, where, I'd argue, secular philosophy is the best source for good. Religion claims an ultimate authority of moral standards (or, at least, mandates that a certain way of thinking be superior). Atheism does not inherently restrict in the same manner. 

&gt; If this is really the case (and I'm not saying it is) would an atheistic society really be desirable?

So, going back to your previous sentence, *atheism* can't be a source for good, but secular humanism quite clearly is, so my answer would be "yes".  Secular humanism can't happen if the people aren't secular or must ultimately confide in some other authority.

&gt;I, unlike yourself, do believe that atheism can produce a motive though. "God does not exist" can easily lead to "religion is bad" which can, in turn, lead to atheistic extremism.

But this is slippery slope thinking.  It's not equivalent to saying something *inherently* leads to these sorts of conclusions.  Religion very clearly takes a stance on ultimate moral authority.  Atheism leaves the question open.  Whether some people then take atheism to then consider "religion is bad" (which I do, for mostly separate reasons), this still does not lead inherently to extremism.  And extremism on this front would have to be justified externally, because it's not inherent to atheism itself, whereas it arguably *is* for certain religious authority. 

&gt;The religions themselves, all major religions anyway, condemn violence.

But this wasn't always so.  And the same text you say does this was used to affirm it in the past.  Furthermore, even if physical violence isn't inflicted, certain ways of thinking seem clearly harmful.  The condemnation of homosexuality, for instance, or the subjugation of women, or the justification of slavery, etc. When the authority of one's morals is a text that gives the possibility of these things being permissible, quite clearly, bad things happen under valid pretexts.

&gt;It's misinterpretation used as justification for political ideas that leads to violence.

But you see the problem in this statement, no?  Right now IS is calling moderate muslims as the "misinterpreters" and vice-versa.  When the text is ambiguous that both sides can use it to support your position, that alone should tell you there's a problem. 

&gt;Religion certainly does keep secular philosophies in check, and that can sometimes be a good thing,

But secular thought can do this with equal, if not more effective, ability.  

&gt;as some secular policies can be dangerous, just as religious ones can be.

I'm not sure what a "secular" policy is, unless you mean a policy derived from secular thinking.  But again, in this case it is not secularism (which is not an institution), but the poor reasoning under a secular framework that drew the policy.

&gt; I'm not really interested in debating basic logical foundations. If you are unable to give me good reason to doubt PSR, then the PSR is definitely more probably True than not

There's plenty of good reason to reject the PSR (I'm actually surprised you aren't familiar with the plethora of arguments against it). Van Inwagen's argument of modal fatalism, for instance. Rowe strikes a similar attack on the supposed necessitarian commitment that must be made by accepting the PSR, and what that would mean of a god who "wills" anything. Or take Hume's immensely influential arguments against deep realities of causality. Or Kant's argument about the limitations of what can be said to be known about (that which is experiential) which thereby limits us from committing to a *True* PSR. In fact, I'd say most philosophers consider a strong PSR reasonably dead.

Della Rocca offered an argument recently to try and resurrect the conversation (and even he admits it has fallen on quite hard times), but it hasn't been well received precisely because it fails to address the biggest issues of the PSR.  Pruss tried to argue into a strong PSR via a weak PSR, but there seems to have been some pretty big weak points in the formulation as well. 

&gt;But even if they were God knew Abraham would pray anyway. The will of God does not change.

If God's will never changes, what is the point of prayer?

&gt;I don't see willing something implying change. What would change in God if he wills something into existence?

He hadn't willed it into existence prior-to.  That is, at some point, he hadn't yet willed it, and it didn't exist, and then he did, and so it did.  Unless you want to make the case that the universe always existed, but that seems contradictory to an idea that god is required for an explanation of the universe.Hm, that's interesting. Most classical theists on here actually accept the PSR, and then produce an argument such that god, in a way, explains itself.  The issue in those cases is the use of the PSR to get to it.

The important thing to recognize is, without the PSR, many theistic arguments can't get off the ground (Aquinas is no exception).Well the general idea sort of follows from Aquinas's arguments of infinite regress.  Basically it goes something like this: if everything needs to be explained, then it makes no sense that we have an infinite series of explanations\u2014otherwise that whole chain would need to be explained\u2014therefore it must be the case that there's something at the "bottom" that explains everything else, and this thing is necessary (if you think as Leibniz might, it "explains itself"; we can see how one can make this case if there *must be* a bottom, that bottom *is* the explanation for its own existence). We call that thing "god" and then explore what necessary traits must be there (the argument gets progressively hairy IMO).

Now when put this way it seems quite a simple argument: clearly it depends on the idea that everything must be explained to even get off the ground, and even once we get there, what does it mean to "explain itself"?  Much has gone into the formulation of the latter compared to the former.  But if we don't accept the idea that everything must be explained (which is a very reasonable thing to do\u2014as we have seen the PSR is under heavy scrutiny), this argument has failed before it even has begun.

I'm not wholly convinced even the latter necessarily succeeds (though a much better case can be made for it), but since the former is already far and away controversial, I don't divest too much time debating the latter.Sure thing!&gt; The real challenge comes from asking why there is this eternal substance in the first place.

It can be a brute fact. Asking *why* is only necessary if you subscribe to the PSR. 

&gt; A potency is a possibility of being different. 

But it seems we can accept this definition and still allow for a simple fundamental force (like quantum fields). After all, we don't know if the parameters of the quantum fields really *could* be otherwise. It seems there's a risk for equivocation on "possibility" here that needs further explanation.  It's one thing to say something is *logically* possible, but such logical possibility seems to allow for a god lacking or containing a different set of features than those we argue for. It's another to say that something isn't *actually* possible (modally accessible to an actual world), which is where the "possibility" of god being otherwise seems to not obtain.  

&gt;Now let Aquinas show you why something that has no potencies must have all the divine attributes.[1]

What I found interesting with this is that these qualities could be exactly equivocated on the quantum fields.

&gt;For example, if it were composed of matter

Technically, the quantum fields *aren't* composed of matter, they're the basis *for* matter.  They are, in every meaningful way, *immaterial*, though they *express* the material.&gt;Damn, bested again by a denial of the PSR.
Totally blanked on the concept of "brute fact".

It almost feels like an unfair refutation at this point because it prevents the argument from getting off the ground, and it certainly is a powerful one, but it merits discussion when we demand explanations where they may not be warranted. 

&gt;They're kind of spooky and bug me for some reason but I'm not sure why.

How so?  It seems Hume's criticism on causality paints a good picture of a world that isn't spooky and yet leaves the possibility of a brute fact.  And of course, if the answer to the question "why is there something rather than nothing?" is the only brute fact, I hardly see that as particularly spooky realization.&gt;Hence, the distinction between various types of act and potency

So which type of "potential" do you mean when you say that god has no potential but the quantum fields do?

&gt; Quantum fields are all-knowing, all-powerful, and all-loving...? Ok then.

Where in your link did Aquinas argue for love or knowledge?  And certainly quantum fields are as "all powerful" insofar as anything material is dependent on it's essence.&gt;Passive.

Sorry, not sure where "passive potentials" are defined.  Aquinas talks about passive *intellect,* but how can you say that quantum fields don't express passive intellect (as aquinas means it)?

&gt;&gt; Where in your link did Aquinas argue for love or knowledge?

&gt;20 and 14.

All I see is an argument against a body (20)\u2014this definitely can be argued for QFs by the way\u2014and a chapter about using remotion to reason on it. There's nothing in either chapter about love, and this "knowledge" being reasoned here is not the kind the general person considers it to be.  It's such a kind that, as I just said, seems to be equally applicable to QFs.&gt;I'm don't quite see how Hume on causality is related - if I recall correctly he denied that we could justify claims about causality because we can't justify the "necessary" part of "necessary connection". What am I missing?

The [SEP has a nice summary of the problem](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/sufficient-reason/#PSREigCenGerIde): 

&gt;&gt;Hume's critique of causation presents an important challenge to the PSR. In his Treatise of Human Nature (I, 3,3) Hume considers several arguments which attempt to prove the \u201cgeneral maxim in philosophy, that whatever begins to exist, must have a cause\u201d and finds all of them wanting. Hume argues that since the ideas of cause and its effect are evidently distinct, we can clearly conceive or imagine an object without its cause. He takes the separability of the two ideas to show that there is no necessary conceptual relation between the ideas of cause and effect insofar as conceiving the one without the other does not imply any contradiction or absurdity.

At minimum what can be said of Hume is he makes the case for brute facts as a *prima facie* truth.

&gt;I think one issue I'm finding with them is that they can seem a bit ad hoc at times - "Oh, no, I can't explain X because it is a brute fact." I'm not sure how we could justify something's being a brute fact or not.

Hm I rather dislike that characterization.  I think it's a common one to deniers of the PSR, but I think it's a little misplaced.  Many times people say something akin to "how can you be rational?" but denying the PSR doesn't mean we turn to brute facts at the first chance.  [A better explanation can be what a previous redditor, oneguy2008, calls *defeasible* PSR, which is of the same spirit as methodological naturalism.](https://www.reddit.com/r/askphilosophy/comments/30ktja/is_there_a_sufficient_explanation_arguing_for_or/cpts9na)

Namely, defeasible PSR is "for each thing (object, state of affairs, or whatever) that exists or obtains, we have defeasible justification to believe that there is an explanation of its existence, there is a reason that it exists". 

This definitely reflects the spirit of Kant's "proof" of the PSR, that was limited to knowledge we can actually experience. What I particularly like is that it reflects the demand to be inquisitive, but not to defect to a law that seems to have been constructed inductively (if we equate "brute facts" to "black swans" I think the problem is clear) and therefore overly stringent. 

&gt;Their connection with necessity and possibility was bugging me too - mainly the question of whether or not they're necessary.

I think the general acceptance is that they are contingent. Pruss would certainly like them to be, and I imagine his attempt to resurrect the PSR at least strongly suggests they are all contingent (though this was a response to Van Inwagen's BCCF, so perhaps neither thought too much on *necessary* brute facts).  We can ignore all this by simply saying that brute facts appear to be akin to propositional variables, so it's clear that (P v !P) leaves both open.

&gt;Their negations, if possible, would have to be brute facts as well but that doesn't seem that problematic. This part isn't that bad but it bugs me out a lil'.

Well, for *anything* contingent the negation is still contingent\u2014in this case, the contingency is just "nothing".  If you've ever studied State machines, brute facts can be said to be states with nondeterministic entry points as a part of our bigger BCCF. Or just think about propositional variables, if that helps.  All we're saying is that brute facts are propositional variables that are entailed by nothing. Clearly, then, all that can be said is (P v !P), and then *a posteriori* we can determine the truth or falsity of this value (by definition, it being a brute *fact* means we know it to be True).

&gt; But our epistemic access to the bruteness of a fact seems shaky.

Well, naturally, it would have to, because there is nothing further to reason on.  But this is not as problematic as it seems.  If, as Kant justifiably argues, there are things by which we may *never* know the truth on, then the epistemic question of bruteness is just a subset of the bigger problem of epistemic accessibility. And, as I said before, we readily accept this as possible under more mundane circumstances.  As with Nondeterministic Finite Automata, we consider states with incoming variables that are unknowable and undeterminiable (or really, None).Text wall, but I want to finally unpack the ridiculous claim that "/u/segFault11235 was never a christian", because I, too, find it offensive (and pretty stupid). 

The argument of "you were never really a christian" is fundamentally irrational, and here's why.

*How are we to determine who is (was) a Christian and who never "truly" believed?*

__1. By Properties__

Under more general circumstances this question is utterly mundane.  How do we know which doctors are real or fake?  Well one obvious way to tell is by their knowledge of medicine, their MDs, in theory their successful history of medical research or work in the medical field. We'd like to apply this equally to "Christian/Muslim/Jew/etc.", and it seems on the face to be pretty simple criteria for doing so: accepts Jesus as Lord and savior, acknowledges the resurrection, repentance, fruits of the spirit, actively seeking God and praying, knowledge of the scriptures, baptism (helps), consistent faith over some period of time. 

It seems, then, under these circumstances, the person calling out the ex-theist as "never a True believer" is utterly inconsistent with their usual method for determining "who" someone is.  Because quite clearly, *I* was, at least, once a Christian by this criteria.

But press still, they will.  And therefore they must provide another reason why it must be that ex-theists were never True believers. As we shall see, this is still problematic.

__2. By Outcome__

I'm sure we've all heard "if you truly believed, you would have never turned away." At first glance, the theist will certainly feel they have a rock-solid explanation to prove the atheist irrational (the atheist clearly disagrees), but a close look reveals blatant hypocrisy. 

After all, the accuser has limited out *criteria* as the determining factor, it seems then that they are forced to say that True Christians are only those who believe until the end.  But this seems absurd.

As a minor criticism, doesn't this make God unjust? After all, if a man, young in years, accepts Christianity but would have lost faith by the time he was 80 had he not died at 30, does he go to heaven?  If he does, then God is unjust, because he is *by his hand* sending people to hell who once believed but were given the time on earth to deconvert.

As a stronger point still, if we say that he *still* sends the 30-year-old to hell (because God knows one day he would have lost faith), then every Christian should be terrified about their own salvation\u2014after all, who is to say they may lose faith one day?  It seems, that **no** Christian can see the future, and no Christian can say with any degree of certainty that they will always have faith (my certainty to my own faith is proof of that). 

But, clearly, we don't see Christians sweating bullets every day, trying to figure out if they'll be going to heaven or hell if given sufficient time on earth.  They, quite reasonably, seem to apply the principle of *criteria* (1) to themselves.

__C:__ Therefore, if they justify that they are Christians by (1), the same must be said of others, and we __must__ conclude that ex-theists who previously met the criteria of "Christian" were, in fact, believers at one point in time. 


________________________

Edit: So, anyway, to the OP.  If we readily assess that "Criteria" is the more reasonable method of determining a faith of someone, then, arguably, it seems we can readily split "extreme X-ists" from "moderate X-ists" by what they believe and practice.  Naturally, they will call *each-other* non-believers, but from the outside looking in it's clear we need to simply look at two separate groups almost as different religions but with the same name. 

Now, that being said, there is still an argument against religion that can be made, but to stay on point, I'm just saying that it is intellectually honest to say "all Muslims are the same" etc.&gt; Passive potency = the ability to be affected. Active potency = the ability to affect other things. See e.g. divisions of act and potency.

And why do you think QFs have passive potency?  This seems to be a misunderstanding of what they are. 

&gt;Argument against body is in 3, not 20.

[Your first link posted](http://dhspriory.org/thomas/ContraGentiles1.htm#15) makes a pretty clear argument about "body" in 20.

&gt;That it doesn't have area, or length, or width, or composition, or substantial or accidental properties?

Absolutely.

&gt;I don't know what you're reading, because love is, as I said, chapter 20.

The previous link you provided (see above) was different.  That's what started this goose-chase. 

Now that we have the actual links...

Concerning love (chapter 20), the argument depends on Aquinas's formulation of a necessary being explaining itself and willing something else into being (being the first actor).  However, OP's formulation does not commit himself to these additional requirements, so the argument for "love" on the QFs falls apart. 

Concerning knowledge (chapter 14), the argument seems to depend on the idea that immaterial =&gt; cognitive.  That seems fundamentally mistaken.  I'm not a thomist, so it could just be the terms are representing other things here, but as it is they seem poorly done to prove that the fundamental source of substance must have love and knowledge. 

&gt;&gt;this "knowledge" being reasoned here is not the kind the general person considers it to be.

&gt;That's True, hence the very important distinctions between analogical, univocal, and equivocal language.

This comment was addressed to a response to what I thought was the "actual" answer, but now see is not.  I'm not sure how relevant it is to the topic of knowledge, so we can abandon it. 

&gt;I don't think any physicist is going to agree that QF is intelligent, willful, loving, etc.

Great, so now that we end the goose-chase, the "intelligence" I thought previously argued for is not the one your *actual* chapter 14 does.  I agree that QFs aren't "intelligent, willful, loving, etc." but where I disagree is on your suggestion that Aquinas's arguments for these traits of god can be applied to OP's conclusion about a fundamental substance source. &gt; I admit - it's an extremely fine line to walk, and the bleeding hearts liberals 

I have to say, my wife is probably the most bleeding-heart liberal you'll meet.  By extension, I'm probably not far behind.  We both unabashedly admit that the panhandling in major European cities is out of hand and problematic. 

For one thing, it greatly detracts from the experience.  I have, in my head right now, a memory of a sweet Japanese couple, one brisk April evening in Piazza San Marco, getting coerced to buy a "rose" from one of those twats because he "dropped" it and she picked it up to hand back to him.  I think every day about how I should have gone over there and scared him off, but who knows what sort of problems that would bring? 

All I want to do is think about the magic of the music, dancing, art, and language of these cultural meccas, but instead I have a bunch of memories of assholes with their "boingy" plastic toys, shitty roses, selfie-sticks, etc. that don't hear you when you say "no" to the guy 5 feet in front of him, and block your path down every street you want to take to get somewhere.

At minimum, Europe should consider the impact it has on tourism. 

Absolutely agree. Still two problems though: 1) it raises the escalation bar\u2014how long will people need to say "fuck off" before "fuck off" is the common response, and the assertiveness gets raised further, 2) for people who aren't inclined to say "fuck off" to strangers, what an incredibly uncomfortable and disillusioning moment in what may have been one of the most awe-inspiring moments of their life. 

I wish I could say my memories of seeing the Eiffel Tower at night were pure magic, but I can't when I also have, to memory, an asshole with rotten roses interrupting my and my wife's romantic moment. Even if sending them away was a simple "fuck off", an "I love y\u2014hey fuck off, guy\u2014where was I?  Oh yeah, I love you" doesn't quite ring as sweetly. Still has to be enforced though.  Have you been to Europe lately?&gt; personally I needed personal experiences to convince me there was anything to God

How can you say you trust your personal experiences, insofar as you also know the source of them? &gt;You need more than "he claimed things I don't believe" to make such a proclamation. There need to be signs other than just ideas you disagree with.

This doesn't make sense to me.  If a guy says "hey, I can fly" then proceeds to plummet to his death, I think we'd both agree he was delusional.

The judgment of one's delusion is directly related to how accurate the subject's claims are with reality. 

Unless, is your criticism that saying "he claimed god exists" isn't quite as fair?  Fair enough, I'd still say the fact that the resurrection was far more likely myth than history answers the question of delusion quite readily.&gt; we are the ones who validate his Messianic Claim.

How do you validate this?  It seems your answer is: 

&gt;because we have seen something of God in the life Jesus lived and the relationship he had with the God he knew as Father and those around him

But this is unsound, because we could readily attribute this meaningful experience to plenty of other things as well. In other words, correlation does not imply causation here.&gt; You need to have proof that he couldn't, in order to be justified in saying he is delusional.

This still doesn't make any sense.  A person who thinks they're president of the US but isn't *could* be president, they just clearly aren't. 

I'm not saying the resurrection was *impossible* a priori, I'm saying it almost certainly didn't happen *in retrospect* (based on all the evidence), so it's clear Jesus thought something that wasn't True: that's patent delusion. 

It feels like you want  to say that we can only say Jesus was delusional if it was *certain* that the resurrection didn't happen, but this is absurd, because we cannot prove nor disprove anything empirical with *certainty*.  We must take the evidence and reason to informed beliefs, and the evidence suggests the resurrection didn't happen.  Given this, if someone posits that Jesus said "I will rise again" we can confidently state that he was delusional for thinking this.I don't mind so long as we can start our own conversation here :). 

So let's unpack this a little bit, but I'm going to start by indicating my general model of criticism that will string throughout.  The key point I'd like to bring up is that we should remember that correlation does not imply causation.  That is, given a set of expectations we cannot say they obtained *because of what we think it was* unless we can *rule out* all other possible explanations.  And this ruling out depends a lot on the power of competing theories.  I'll leave it at this for now and address your comment: 

&gt;1) My experiences were informational. The Holy Spirit taught me stuff I didn't know about God, and when I read the Bible I found these teachings affirmed. I recognized the similarities between how the prophets understood God after experiencing Him, and how I felt.

So here is a perfect example of possibly stronger competing theories than "the Holy Spirit."  For one thing, if we conclude that humans are logical, and have, at least, a somewhat logical formulation of god, then it comes to no surprise that you would have been able to intuit features about this god on your own\u2014even unconsciously. I would go so far to say that (since the question of god's existence is the question on the table), given the two competing theories (god exists and taught you things vs. god does not exist but theology is at least somewhat logical), the latter is almost certainly more plausible. 

&gt;2) The Holy Spirit fundamentally changes you as a human being. It is a personality, worldview, foundational, value-changing shift.

But we must parse a "change of heart" from "a change of heart specifically from the Holy Spirit."  After all, as a perfect counter-example, I once felt very transformed and liberated upon acknowledging my faith in Christ.  It would seem I reached new-found heights of charity and good-will towards mankind.  Then years later I deconverted, and the transformative power of cognitive liberation was even more empowering.  With the advent of secular humanism, I feel even more moral than before: no qualms about supporting homosexuals or women's rights; I've even undertaken vegetarianism for it's seemingly obvious moral high-ground. 

Beyond anecdotes, it seems obvious that change of mindset transforms people in all sorts of mindsets.

It seems, then, what can be said here is that your *changed outlook* far more likely transformed you, than *specifically the Holy Spirit*\u2014and given that the question of god's existence is on the table, we must consider the most plausible answer irrespective of what claims are made *about* god's power. 

&gt;3) The Holy Spirit is not vague, it's not just feelings. It's an experience with a Being.

Well my problem with this statement is that it's not really clear by what the distinction is.  That said, in my christian days I would have certainly agreed with the affect you profess, so on that front be comforted that I understand what you mean and we can progress from there :).  

In any case, there's two problems with this statement: 1) Experience with a "being" does not lend ourselves to Christianity necessarily\u2014after all, nearly every religion on earth claims to have said experiences, and many of them so different it would make a "same source" explanation very jarring to say the least.  2) It has yet to be shown why we must rule out "experience with *myself* (where my inner dialogue is that "being").  As someone who's been on both sides of the fence, I can say that these odd moments of intuition you are sure didn't come from you, the wisdom, encouraging voice, etc... they don't go away when you deconvert.  I'm inclined to say they are just our own voice in our head, and since this is used by you *as evidence for god*, I'm inclined to say it's far more likely that it's just us, than a deity\u2014especially when considering what sorts of other intrusive thoughts I can have from time to time, etc. 

&gt;4) God telling you something is True (and of course I understand that this holds no water to anyone who doesn't already believe in God, so this is kind of a "people who know what I'm talking about will understand" sentiment) is unmistakable. The closest thing I could compare the experience to is waking up.

I believe we call this a "eureka!" moment, and it doesn't really go away after deconverting either. When parsing the source of moments of clarity, you must demonstrate why it can't be our own intuition and *must be* God who provides them.

&gt;5) With my experiences, it was not entirely subjective. I was with other people during the majority of my encounters and they observed what was happening. My girlfriend was also an anti-theist, but she was tripped out by what was happening that she now is a sort of deist.

I'd need more details of the experience, but personal testimony is far and away the weakest form of evidence one can provide\u2014especially as evidence for a god. Group-think is a real effect, and people in crowds under similar emotional and physical states will often have "shared" experiences.  If this was *unique* to church, I'd be more inclined to agree with you, but we see this in all sorts of environments, including Wiccan seances, so it doesn't lead me to believe that it was *god* who caused this. 

&gt;6) Consistency. There is a consistency between my experiences and those I've seen with others who are 100% convinced of God's existence due to personal experiences. I did a lot of searching through testimonies of conversions through spiritual experiences, and there really is a strong pattern. 

Well testimony synchronization is another True thing.  Our memories are reliable for recounting on so far. Many studies have been done to show that people mis-remember things, can be convinced things happened when they didn't, etc.  But more than this, why *wouldn't* we believe that people who want the same thing, have very similar beliefs about the same thing, would find the same patterns? This seems like patent confirmation bias.  

As a counter-example, consider 9/11 truthers.  They all see the same pattern we don't, and they would all say the patterns they see have come about "independently" from other sources.  Yet we still don't believe them, so how can this be?  It seems obvious that what informs these "independent" conclusions is the *dependent* fact that they share a set of beliefs and have a certain set of expectations to what should come of them.  

This doesn't let us get to "god" either. 

&gt;7) God lingers! Once God is in your life in a major way, the relationship becomes tangible. Perhaps other Christians on the board can illustrate what I mean here, but one of the gifts the Holy Spirit provides is discernment. God literally teaches/trains you to hear Him, and once this "clicks," you can observe God in your life in a major way. Answered prayer becomes the norm. God is hidden, but He can be found! He does not stay aloof to everyone.

Well this sort of ties into everything I've already said, so I won't belabor the point.  But as a supplement, consider that I would have agreed 100% with you assessment back in my believing days, but now see it as a patent form of confirmation bias. The things I once believed were "self-evident" and "only from god" most likely were not. 

&gt;Well, the Bible says that demons and Satan do not and cannot profess Christ is Lord, and that was pretty much the first thing the Holy Spirit taught me. But I guess that can be thought of as circular reasoning.

Sadly, it's viciously circular, making it a wholly empty point. 

But to more broadly address the criticism, the question is: given that *experience* is what informs your belief in god (which *then* informs your trust in the Bible, etc.), how do you know this *god* isn't deceptive or evil? &gt; By this I mean, we're the ones who grant weight and meaning to Messianic claims made by a carpenter who lived and died 2,000 years ago.

So why should we? 

&gt;Well, yeah. I don't know of many Christians who would say the only experience you can have of God is that found in Christ.

Not just of "god" but of anything. I'm saying that a perceived meaningful experience cannot be attributed to a god *ad hoc*, you need further justification beyond *having* an experience as to *why that experience must be god*. 

&gt;However, some of us would say we see something in Jesus that fully encapsulates what we understand God to be, and that's what we mean when we say he's the Messiah.

And how do you get to the idea of what God is understood to be, if your personal experience is what gets you to "god exists" in the first place?  That seems circular to say the least.Actually we don't know that it was even a singularity.  Our best maths have gotten us to *close* to a singularity, but that's where the classical physics breaks down and QM comes in makes everything a mystery (since we don't have a unifying theory yet).

So actually, not even a singularity, just *close* to a singularity.Sure thing!&gt;Pretty much all modern cosmological theories assume a singularity and don't offer any dimensions only a 'point' which contains all matter.

I don't know where you got the assumption that most cosmological theories still assume a singularity, [quantum mechanics](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Initial_singularity) makes any strong position of *singularity* concerning the first moments very dubious.

&gt;Our math doesn't break down in assuming a singularity, it breaks down in our early models of those first few fractions of a second.

It's not the math that breaks, it's what we *know* physics does when we get to these levels of proximal interactions.  It's that the math doesn't apply because the previous equations no longer make sense in terms of QM.&gt;It is standard fare for inflationary models, it was in Guth's early model and remains in the models put forth in popular literature such as Hawking's A Grand Design and Krauss' A Universe from Nothing.

Yes, *models*... which have been recognized as problematic because they are incapable of addressing the problems of QM. A singularity is used as a concept to produce the initial conditions for the expansion that can then be modeled under general relativity.  But the singularity itself is a placeholder for "we don't know" because quantum mechanics and quantum gravity make any such idea of "what happened microseconds before our general relativity model breaks down" unascertainable. 

In other words, the models have placeholder (the singularity) because, in actuality, they break down when we start approaching quantum levels. &gt;Yeah, a singularity is an inductive conclusion, but it is wrong to say "we don't know" or that it could be something else.

But that's exactly why we have competing theories: because *we don't know* and it really could *be something else.*  When we're talking about what happens after our models break down, then of course we can't posit ideas with any sort of speculative explanation and start calling it factual.

&gt; If you're going to say it it has dimensions, you'd need a supporting model,

The point is, *we don't know* if it did or didn't have dimensions.  The models *can't and __don't__* inform us of either.  See the problem?  

&gt;That inflationary cosmologists themselves all toss around the term singularity shows such needless skepticism isn't warranted.

No, using a term in discussion has no bearing on its acceptability.  Again, the singularity is a *placeholder* for the explanatory gap in expansion models, but is not supported from known physics at that level. Guth describes an infinite expansion model and never mentions singularity, theories of quantum foam, etc. all provide explanations that do not depend on a singularity that general relativity implies, so saying that all theories back it or that all experts in the field *use the term* is entirely out of context when discussion the reasonability that it is *actually* the case. For one (set), theories involving [loop quantum gravity](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loop_quantum_gravity). 

Then there's Big Bounce theories. 

But the bigger point is that even in models *with* singularities, the [point in contention is that there's a singularity at all](http://physics.stackexchange.com/a/136861), since it defies what is known or modeled in real physics.  As I've been saying all along, singularities are conceptual placeholders for what is known to be an uncertain barrier and where the math starts to disagree with the physics.&gt; Well LQC theories are bounce theories

Right, I should have said *other* bounce theories (and further, other cyclical models separate from the big bounce).  

&gt;so they're the same.

They're not the same. LQC is one of several means meant to explain a possible oscillatory model.

&gt;They're also widely fringe.

I have no clue where you got this idea from, but it simply isn't True.  Peer reviewed, respected, research and evidence based papers concerning oscillatory theories come out every year.

&gt;Urgh, he's making a semantic argument.

Yes, I'm aware of that, that isn't the point I was raising.  More specifically, I was referring to this point from his response: 

&gt;&gt;The Big Bang is a singularity, and most of us don't think singularities actually occur in the real universe. We expect that some quantum gravity effect will become important as we approach the Big Bang.

Which is reiterating what I've been trying to tell you: the math and the physics do not coincide meaningfully as we approach the singularity. 

&gt;But to say this means there isn't a singularity is False, a least for virtually all definitions and conceptions of a singularity as commonly understood.

No, this is gap-reasoning all over again.  As I've been trying to help you understand, the problem is about the math pointing to a singularity at all\u2014most physicists do not believe a singularity adequately models what happened at the point of expansion.  It's not even possible to falsify or say veridically (yet) that the big bang started with a singularity, because no known physics adequately describes the system in that state.  We have *mathematical* models from general relativity to arrive at the singularity, but it's apples and oranges at that point.  It's akin to modeling relativistic interactions in with classical physics. 

&gt;Hence why virtually everyone on the field refers to a singularity.

Again, the reference to the "singularity" is that it's a point of mystery in the model\u2014where the math makes sense but the physics isn't adequately reflected.  I don't know how many different ways I can describe this to you.

&gt;That he points to Fred Hoyle as an example of those who reject a singularity is problematic given that Hoyle rejected Big Bang Theory entirely, not simply the semantic argument of a singularity as origin.

He points to Hoyle as an example of the first contention concerning singularities, and a contemporary theory that avoided modeling in a singularity at all.

&gt; The question still remains, why are there quantum fields rather than complete emptiness?

This is begging the question, because you implicitly assume there's at least some answer to begin with.  For instance, "What color is democracy?" assumes democracy can have a color to begin with, when in fact the question is really unintelligible. 

You'd have to adequately establish that the question of "why something vs. nothing" is at all meaningful, and that has yet to be done. &gt; Right, in terms of explanatory causes they are different, but in their alternative to singularity models they are near identical, they merely interrupt the collapse/expansion to/from a singularity.

Yes, which is exactly the problem every physicist faces when confronted with the singularity in cosmological models.  The point is that there are theories that don't require a singularity to present a justifiable expansion model. 

&gt;Yes oscillatory models have been improved and refined, but still fail to gain traction.

Citation needed.

&gt;They're far more likely to come up as explanations of fine-tuning.

Not sure what you mean by this. 

&gt;You seem to be confusing "our models of what happens as a singularity is approached are flawed" with "we don't know what happened, so we'll just stick a singularity there"

In this case they are identical statements.  The models inform the concept, but we know the models are wrong (upon reaching this point), so we stick with what the model says, without committing to the details.

&gt;And which Hoyle dogmatically refused to budge on despite a deluge of evidence proving it False.

Yes, concerning the *expansion of the universe*, not the singularity itself.  Most physicists still agree that the idea of a physical singularity seems unlikely.  Where they diverge from Hoyle was his resistance to any idea of expansion.

&gt;Probably not the best example to be using to argue against singularity models.

You've missed the forest for a single tree here.  The reason Hoyle was mentioned at all was because he was against the idea of a singularity since it makes no sense from a physics standpoint\u2014it's only a mathematical representation for the bit that we haven't been able to figure out at all.  The reason for citing Hoyle was that the need to move away from a singularity as a part of a model has been realized from the outset: it's an inherent problem in the model that makes it physically suspect. Total sidenote, but:

&gt; For example, if you could save every life on earth by killing one baby, what would be the moral action?

Actually, even from a secular standpoint, the answer to this is "not necessarily."  If anything, I'd say at best this action would be morally *permissible*, but certainly not morally *right*.Could they have been conflating KCA with CAs in general?  KCA takes a distinctly scientific position, which would inspire the likes of Krauss and Carroll to engage, whereas if it were blatantly philosophical, as older CAs tend to be, they may have never even engaged to begin with.&gt; Depends on your moral framework really. In mine it would be morally right with the question as phrased.

Right, just thought I'd make it clear that it's not necessarily an objectively morally good thing, even under various secular positions. 

&gt;Anyway, the point was to show that the premise was uncertain so the conclusion, "God in the OT is morally incompatible with a good god" didn't follow.

That much I understood, my point was entirely just a tangent I thought worth mentioning. This seems largely directed to only biblical literalists.  Naturally (most) Christians on this sub will simply point out that the rib story is a metaphor about the interconnectivity of man and woman (Plato's *Symposium* has a similarly styled metaphor), and thus is not incompatible with the position that god created something from nothing.

I don't disagree that there are potentially sexist undertones/implications in this origins myth, though. Do you mean like the worm aliens in Prometheus?Part of it may also come from believing that your faith has given you a joy to which none can compare (which is commonly claimed in most religions).  It's a bit disheartening/mind-blowy to see people who shared in that ideology now going about their lives, seemingly happier than before. 

More than willful disregard, I think it's a pretty clear example of cognitive dissonance. Contractarianism, Utilitarianism, Virtue Ethics, etc....&gt; I rather obviously think the universe had a beginning. It tends to be atheists here who really want for there to be an eternal universe so they can avoid the consequence of what a beginning implies.

No... This is a terrible understanding of cosmological expansion *models*.

&gt; What they're investigating is what they can determine (if anything) about before the Big Bang.

*Including* an eternal past.  The Big Bang only refers to the rapid expansion after the planck epoch where quantum gravity no longer factors in (where general relativity and known quantum physics are understood).  The Big Bang says nothing about whether this planck epoch arose from a prior crunch, quantum foam, or something else entirely.What? Where are you getting all this bad information?  [Fred Hoyle was an atheist, and *never* accepted the Big Bang](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fred_Hoyle#Rejection_of_the_Big_Bang).  

&gt; BB is rapid expansion from an already existing singularity.

Correction: we don't know for certain that it was a singularity.  All models that employ a general relativistic mathematics lead to a singularity, but physicists dislike this conclusion precisely for that reason.  A gravitational singularity tends not to sit well with what we know about physics (massive particles have a minimum wavelength).  

It depends on who you ask concerning the Big Bang, but some will say it only refers to the rapid expansion once general relativity actually works, and what happened prior to the planck epoch is entirely unknown.&gt;1, the Big Bang theory is not the first atheistic cosmological idea.

What in the world is an atheistic cosmological idea?  Cosmology is a science, there aren't atheistic-science anythings... it's just science.

&gt;2, it's not an atheistic cosmological idea at all. It was proposed by a priest, endorsed by the Pope, and atheists were among its staunchest critics, because it went against the Steady State theory[1] .

Steady state theory didn't arise until the same time the term "Big Bang" was coined because they both came from the same guy.  Also, the reason *cosmologists* and *astrophysicists* take issue with the big bang is that *certain models* require a reduction into a singularity of spacetime.  That's it.  The singularity makes sense mathematically, but not what we know about the physical universe, so our best knowledge tells us these models are wrong.

There aren't "atheistic cosmological" theories trying to reject the big bang, the rapid expansion post planck epoch is well-accepted.  The difference is that physicists don't find the idea of an object of infinite density very plausible, which is where oscillatory and quantum foam models arise.  See, to me that just represents the traditional definition of "agnostic". I'm not sure where "atheist" would take part in this analogy, since hypothetically you'd think it equally likely that the jar be even or odd.&gt;I was referring to how OP contrasted it to "supernatural explanations."

That doesn't make the Big Bang "atheistic."  I'm still not seeing how you go from supernatural origins to "the Big Bang is atheistic."  The Big Bang is just a scientific theory intended to describe the interactions of the universe at the earliest knowable point in our history. 

&gt;Really? You're saying that evidence shows the Big Bang is wrong? Could you give me a link for this?

Nope, I'm saying the cosmological models that follow the Big Bang to it's fullest conclusion (a singularity of spacetime) are considered incorrect or questionable for moments prior to the planck epoch.

In other words, cosmological models w.r.t. moments after the problems of quantum gravity and reflect the expansion described in the Big Bang theory: well accepted.  Conclusions drawn about what happened prior to: highly dubious. 

That's what cosmologists mean when they say the Big Bang doesn't imply a "beginning," because the Big Bang does not rule out oscillatory models (among others) that allow for an eternal past.&gt; OP is the one trying to paint it as such, not me.

The contraposition of supernaturalism is naturalism, not atheism, which is why I'm uncertain why you keep calling it that.

&gt;Why? What evidence is there against it?

Not sure what you mean by "evidence against it." We have *no known model* that accurately reflects quantum gravity, so any affirmative position about what there was prior to the planck epoch will be pure speculation.  The singularity is a conceptual placeholder (from mathematical extrapolation from general relativity) for what is currently unknown pre-planck epoch, and as a result, the correct response to "did the universe begin?" is "we don't know".

To say the universe "began to exist" is wildly speculative at this point. In fact, one major goal of cosmologists is to derive a theory that undoes the dependency on a singularity, precisely because from a physical standpoint it makes no sense.I'm aware of the distinct systems, but I'm uncertain what utility you gain out of the 4-type system you mentioned above.  After all, what can you really say you are "gnostic" about anyway?  What do you gain by appending "agnostic" to anything, given that we aren't truly certain of much at all? 

It seems to me that "agnostic-x" becomes a redundant statement.

&gt;An agnostic atheist in the 4 type system would be either an agnostic or an atheist in the 3 type system.

So just to clarify what you said: from the 4-type system, "agnostic atheist" maps back to either atheist or agnostic in the 3-type system, yes?  Then what does that make agnostic-theists?  It seems to me they, too, can be either agnostic or theist in the 3-type system, in which case it's unclear to me how one distinguishes a certain subset of "agnostic theist" from "agnostic atheist." It would be morally permissible, it's not the same as morally right (under many moral frameworks).&gt; On this sub, atheism and naturalism are typically one and the same.

But the distinction is very important.  Conflating atheist with naturalist in the terms of scientific inquiry places an unwarranted bias-blame on scientific inquiry.  

&gt;Then why, in this comment, did you say that "our best knowledge tells us that [models with a singularity] are wrong"?

Because they conclude a singularity, which simply cannot be the case.  It can be better phrased that said models are *incomplete*, but incomplete in what regard and how much is also entirely unknown, which means we're ultimately agnostic about what the model informs us (excepting what we can say about the expansion itself). 

&gt;Why doesn't it make sense?

In terms of QM, it's fairly recognized that particles have a minimum wavelength.  An infinitely small point (singularity) does not respect this, and as a result, our basic physics models break down and become unintelligible. What differentiates "I don't know" from "I don't believe"?  To me "belief" and "know" differ only in degree of certainty (ie., knowledge is a more certain belief).&gt; Reading from what I linked about the 4 type system, an agnostic would say we can't (either currently or ever) know whether or not god exists, i.e. that the claim is (currently) unfalsifiable.

This makes sense, but I'm not entirely sure how you would then apply it.  Are you saying that you believe that all claims about the existence god are unfalsifiable?  That seems contrapositional to certain theistic claims about miracles and answering prayers.

&gt;The chart in the 4 type system reads the agnostic theist position as: "I don't think we can gain knowledge of god, but I choose to believe in one anyways". This would place agnostic theists as theists in the 3 type system.

But this is what confuses me.  It seems to me from this example that what you really have are all agnostic atheists really map to *agnostics*, whereas all gnostic atheists map to atheists.  After all, I don't think you would say that you just "chose" atheism on a whim (given an unfalsifiable claim).  Rather, you'd say that unfalsifiable claims require justification, and lacking any, are more likely to be False.  That's a form of falsification about unfalsifiable claims themselves, so wouldn't that just make you an atheist (in 3-type)? 

&gt;I should have clarified: Most agnostic atheists do map to agnostics in the 3 type system.

This much makes sense to me. 

&gt;The ones who map to atheists are ones who can't claim knowledge of anything, simply because they've defined knowledge as 100% certainty, which they have every right to do.

Right, but then it's still unclear to me what we gain from the two-form phrasing.  (A)gnostic theists seem to lump together into one indistinguishable group whereas (a)gnostic atheists seem to conflate what is clearly a neutral position (agnosticism) from a contraposition (atheism) via *at least some form of position taking*.  [I should hardly think so](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/knowledge-analysis/#KnoJusTruBel).One says you *should* do this, the other says, "it's not wrong for you to do this," but that doesn't mean it's the right thing to do either.  

Examples of morally permissible actions are white lies and meat consumption (arguably).&gt;I don't see the difference. If you have to kill a child in order to save everyone else on earth then you should kill the child and it is not wrong to kill the child.

Probably because you ascribe to a different moral theory than I do.  But think of it this way: is it morally *wrong* to smoke a cigarette?  It sort of depends, but clearly we don't think so across the board (after all, it is generally uncontroversially legal).  Does that therefore make it morally *right* to smoke cigarettes?  Clearly not, we're not shaming people for not smoking cigarettes.  What this middle ground is called is "morally permissible," which basically means "not wrong, but not right either."  

Killing a baby is morally wrong, saving mankind is morally good. I think it's a pretty easy case to make that killing a baby to save mankind is morally permissible, depending on what your stance is on the categorical imperative.&gt;The system applies to one claim at a time. Currently there are claims of something that I would certainly call a god that are unfalsifiable. I am a gnostic atheist when it comes to the falsifiable ones.

But then how does that make the label coherent?  If it's on a per-claim basis, it seems to me to be entirely context-dependent, which seems far less useful in expressing your position.

&gt;I have no reason to believe, so I don't believe the claim (as opposed to the positive belief that they are False). 

So this description is type-3 agnosticism through and through.  Lacking a position in the affirmative and the negation of a set of claims is purely agnostic.  But you just said you were gnostic in certain claims in the set, so clearly there's something to be said here that doesn't add up. 

&gt;Thinking about it I'm not too sure agnostic theists would be theists. It is a very peculiar position, as the question shifts from belief (which can be faith based) in the 4 type system, to the existence of evidence in the 3 type system. 

Right, so in this case doesn't that just make "agnostic-x" really just agnostics?  What is gained, then, by saying "agnostic *x*" as opposed to just "agnostic"?  On one end we have theists, then agnostics, then atheists, that sounds like a 3-type description to me.&gt; There are non-religious moral systems but I don't see any of them holding up to the same treatment atheists give religion.

Not sure what you mean by this, but secular moral theories don't just fall out of thin air.  They're pretty thoroughly reasoned through and scrutinized by opposing positions. 

&gt;Where's the empirical evidence that virtue ethics is True?

There's plenty (in favor of virtue ethics): 

1.  Forming habits has been shown to better increase the likelihood of performing an action under duress.  Therefore, it makes sense to employ a set of virtue ethics to better encourage the behaviors considered to be beneficial. 

2.  Encouraging empathetic habits increases one's aptitude for empathy, thereby increasing decisions that benefit others as well as oneself (in the process).  

Not sure what you mean by "X moral theory is __True__."  Morals are a set of behaviors best intended to optimize a certain outcome; the verdict is (obviously) still out as to which one best optimizes this, but in theory that which is demonstrably the best would be "True" insofar as that word can be applied.&gt;It refers to both the origin of the universe and the expansion.
This is like those pendants who leap on people who say "I am good".

Did you mean "pedants"?  And no it doesn't.  The Big Bang theory only adequately addresses the expansion after known physical models can take effect.  There is absolutely a period of time between the conceptual (but not confirmed or accepted) singularity and where Big Bang Models break down where all sorts of explanations can take hold\u2014including oscillatory models.  

While the term "origin" of the universe can be used to describe either, they mean very different things philosophically (which matters given the context of the debate). &gt;My apologies, he rejected the Big Bang due to a priori philosophical reasons,

Not exactly.  He rejected the Big Bang in part for philosophical reasons (primarily his atheism), but also because it was (and still is) agreed that models depending on singularities as their explanation are dubious in nature. 

&gt;and rejected atheism due to the fine tuning of the universe.

It's not entirely clear that Hoyle rejected atheism, so much as he ascribed to a certain type of Spinozan deism in terms of intelligent design.  After all, his rejection of the Big Bang (that lasted his whole life) was largely because of his dissatisfaction with what the Big Bang potentially could support (meaning cosmological arguments).  So given that things could be better, are you not of the opinion that this is the best possible world god could have made?  How does this sit with your position on the Problem of Evil? If you had met me two years ago, you would have been convinced that I was the seed in good soil.  Your point doesn't hold up.  It's easy to hand-wave away someone else's change because it no longer matches yours, but that's not an intellectually honest approach on the matter. I agree, which is generally why I try and focus on things like the Cosmological Argument.  If you can remove the assumption "god exists", things get pretty tough from there.&gt;&gt;If someone like that can come to believe that a god doesn't exist, then they must have a pretty good reason

&gt; That's debatable.

Enlighten me.&gt;Argue what, exactly? Wrong about what, exactly?

Let's turn this on it's head: The only reason that you believe in a Christian god is because you're afraid of going to hell and were born in a Christian culture.  Do you believe me?  Obviously not, you *know* your internal state and reasons better than some guy on the outside looking in.  So what gives you the authority to do the same?  Seems like a patently bad double-standard to me. 

&gt;As joelanator0492 said, it's about someone's state, not the contents of his/her mind.

From personal experience, it doesn't matter one bit. You could pin me down as "good soil" without a second beat not even two years ago.  &gt;Creation, pre-fall, was the best possible world. When Christ returns, he will restore creation to that "good" state.

So, you believe in some form of literalist creation story?  Otherwise how do you get around the millions of deaths of humans or near-humans that evolved prior to any "creation" state?  &gt;If you can shrink space time, which is the tool you use to measure wavelength, you can shrink this observable minimum as well.

You can only shrink or expand spacetime at levels relevant to GR.  The whole point is that GR fails to account for quantum gravity, which is why the planck epoch is considered the first moment BB models make sense.  Prior to the planck epoch, all known physics breaks down.

&gt;These physics change near black holes,

Black hole singularities are not considered identical to a spacetime singularity, and while they're represented as singularities, a similar problem emerges when it comes to determining what exactly is "inside" a black hole (see problems of quantum gravity). 

&gt;In my understanding even the speed of light constant only applies in general relativity where spacetime is flat.

Not exactly, to us it may not appear to be the same, but *locally* it will be *c* nonetheless. &gt; How I resolve it for myself is to distinguish between what's in the bible and what the bible teaches.

Ok, but in this case, your argument depends on pre-fall conditions being real, which is what I'm interested in. 

&gt;I do believe the account as simply written, but I think understanding its inherent complexities are perhaps lost on the uneducated-contemporary reader.

Considering I used to be a student of apologetics and for a time was a YEC, I can comfortably say that a) I understand the position and b) that it is completely contrary to what is factually known about reality.Actually we don't know that it was even a singularity.  Our best maths have gotten us to *close* to a singularity, but that's where the classical physics breaks down and QM comes in makes everything a mystery (since we don't have a unifying theory yet).

So actually, not even a singularity, just *close* to a singularity.Sure thing!&gt;Pretty much all modern cosmological theories assume a singularity and don't offer any dimensions only a 'point' which contains all matter.

I don't know where you got the assumption that most cosmological theories still assume a singularity, [quantum mechanics](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Initial_singularity) makes any strong position of *singularity* concerning the first moments very dubious.

&gt;Our math doesn't break down in assuming a singularity, it breaks down in our early models of those first few fractions of a second.

It's not the math that breaks, it's what we *know* physics does when we get to these levels of proximal interactions.  It's that the math doesn't apply because the previous equations no longer make sense in terms of QM.&gt;It is standard fare for inflationary models, it was in Guth's early model and remains in the models put forth in popular literature such as Hawking's A Grand Design and Krauss' A Universe from Nothing.

Yes, *models*... which have been recognized as problematic because they are incapable of addressing the problems of QM. A singularity is used as a concept to produce the initial conditions for the expansion that can then be modeled under general relativity.  But the singularity itself is a placeholder for "we don't know" because quantum mechanics and quantum gravity make any such idea of "what happened microseconds before our general relativity model breaks down" unascertainable. 

In other words, the models have placeholder (the singularity) because, in actuality, they break down when we start approaching quantum levels. &gt;Yeah, a singularity is an inductive conclusion, but it is wrong to say "we don't know" or that it could be something else.

But that's exactly why we have competing theories: because *we don't know* and it really could *be something else.*  When we're talking about what happens after our models break down, then of course we can't posit ideas with any sort of speculative explanation and start calling it factual.

&gt; If you're going to say it it has dimensions, you'd need a supporting model,

The point is, *we don't know* if it did or didn't have dimensions.  The models *can't and __don't__* inform us of either.  See the problem?  

&gt;That inflationary cosmologists themselves all toss around the term singularity shows such needless skepticism isn't warranted.

No, using a term in discussion has no bearing on its acceptability.  Again, the singularity is a *placeholder* for the explanatory gap in expansion models, but is not supported from known physics at that level. Guth describes an infinite expansion model and never mentions singularity, theories of quantum foam, etc. all provide explanations that do not depend on a singularity that general relativity implies, so saying that all theories back it or that all experts in the field *use the term* is entirely out of context when discussion the reasonability that it is *actually* the case. For one (set), theories involving [loop quantum gravity](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loop_quantum_gravity). 

Then there's Big Bounce theories. 

But the bigger point is that even in models *with* singularities, the [point in contention is that there's a singularity at all](http://physics.stackexchange.com/a/136861), since it defies what is known or modeled in real physics.  As I've been saying all along, singularities are conceptual placeholders for what is known to be an uncertain barrier and where the math starts to disagree with the physics.&gt; Well LQC theories are bounce theories

Right, I should have said *other* bounce theories (and further, other cyclical models separate from the big bounce).  

&gt;so they're the same.

They're not the same. LQC is one of several means meant to explain a possible oscillatory model.

&gt;They're also widely fringe.

I have no clue where you got this idea from, but it simply isn't True.  Peer reviewed, respected, research and evidence based papers concerning oscillatory theories come out every year.

&gt;Urgh, he's making a semantic argument.

Yes, I'm aware of that, that isn't the point I was raising.  More specifically, I was referring to this point from his response: 

&gt;&gt;The Big Bang is a singularity, and most of us don't think singularities actually occur in the real universe. We expect that some quantum gravity effect will become important as we approach the Big Bang.

Which is reiterating what I've been trying to tell you: the math and the physics do not coincide meaningfully as we approach the singularity. 

&gt;But to say this means there isn't a singularity is False, a least for virtually all definitions and conceptions of a singularity as commonly understood.

No, this is gap-reasoning all over again.  As I've been trying to help you understand, the problem is about the math pointing to a singularity at all\u2014most physicists do not believe a singularity adequately models what happened at the point of expansion.  It's not even possible to falsify or say veridically (yet) that the big bang started with a singularity, because no known physics adequately describes the system in that state.  We have *mathematical* models from general relativity to arrive at the singularity, but it's apples and oranges at that point.  It's akin to modeling relativistic interactions in with classical physics. 

&gt;Hence why virtually everyone on the field refers to a singularity.

Again, the reference to the "singularity" is that it's a point of mystery in the model\u2014where the math makes sense but the physics isn't adequately reflected.  I don't know how many different ways I can describe this to you.

&gt;That he points to Fred Hoyle as an example of those who reject a singularity is problematic given that Hoyle rejected Big Bang Theory entirely, not simply the semantic argument of a singularity as origin.

He points to Hoyle as an example of the first contention concerning singularities, and a contemporary theory that avoided modeling in a singularity at all.

&gt; The question still remains, why are there quantum fields rather than complete emptiness?

This is begging the question, because you implicitly assume there's at least some answer to begin with.  For instance, "What color is democracy?" assumes democracy can have a color to begin with, when in fact the question is really unintelligible. 

You'd have to adequately establish that the question of "why something vs. nothing" is at all meaningful, and that has yet to be done. &gt; Right, in terms of explanatory causes they are different, but in their alternative to singularity models they are near identical, they merely interrupt the collapse/expansion to/from a singularity.

Yes, which is exactly the problem every physicist faces when confronted with the singularity in cosmological models.  The point is that there are theories that don't require a singularity to present a justifiable expansion model. 

&gt;Yes oscillatory models have been improved and refined, but still fail to gain traction.

Citation needed.

&gt;They're far more likely to come up as explanations of fine-tuning.

Not sure what you mean by this. 

&gt;You seem to be confusing "our models of what happens as a singularity is approached are flawed" with "we don't know what happened, so we'll just stick a singularity there"

In this case they are identical statements.  The models inform the concept, but we know the models are wrong (upon reaching this point), so we stick with what the model says, without committing to the details.

&gt;And which Hoyle dogmatically refused to budge on despite a deluge of evidence proving it False.

Yes, concerning the *expansion of the universe*, not the singularity itself.  Most physicists still agree that the idea of a physical singularity seems unlikely.  Where they diverge from Hoyle was his resistance to any idea of expansion.

&gt;Probably not the best example to be using to argue against singularity models.

You've missed the forest for a single tree here.  The reason Hoyle was mentioned at all was because he was against the idea of a singularity since it makes no sense from a physics standpoint\u2014it's only a mathematical representation for the bit that we haven't been able to figure out at all.  The reason for citing Hoyle was that the need to move away from a singularity as a part of a model has been realized from the outset: it's an inherent problem in the model that makes it physically suspect. Total sidenote, but:

&gt; For example, if you could save every life on earth by killing one baby, what would be the moral action?

Actually, even from a secular standpoint, the answer to this is "not necessarily."  If anything, I'd say at best this action would be morally *permissible*, but certainly not morally *right*.Could they have been conflating KCA with CAs in general?  KCA takes a distinctly scientific position, which would inspire the likes of Krauss and Carroll to engage, whereas if it were blatantly philosophical, as older CAs tend to be, they may have never even engaged to begin with.&gt; Depends on your moral framework really. In mine it would be morally right with the question as phrased.

Right, just thought I'd make it clear that it's not necessarily an objectively morally good thing, even under various secular positions. 

&gt;Anyway, the point was to show that the premise was uncertain so the conclusion, "God in the OT is morally incompatible with a good god" didn't follow.

That much I understood, my point was entirely just a tangent I thought worth mentioning. This seems largely directed to only biblical literalists.  Naturally (most) Christians on this sub will simply point out that the rib story is a metaphor about the interconnectivity of man and woman (Plato's *Symposium* has a similarly styled metaphor), and thus is not incompatible with the position that god created something from nothing.

I don't disagree that there are potentially sexist undertones/implications in this origins myth, though. Do you mean like the worm aliens in Prometheus?Part of it may also come from believing that your faith has given you a joy to which none can compare (which is commonly claimed in most religions).  It's a bit disheartening/mind-blowy to see people who shared in that ideology now going about their lives, seemingly happier than before. 

More than willful disregard, I think it's a pretty clear example of cognitive dissonance. Contractarianism, Utilitarianism, Virtue Ethics, etc....&gt; I rather obviously think the universe had a beginning. It tends to be atheists here who really want for there to be an eternal universe so they can avoid the consequence of what a beginning implies.

No... This is a terrible understanding of cosmological expansion *models*.

&gt; What they're investigating is what they can determine (if anything) about before the Big Bang.

*Including* an eternal past.  The Big Bang only refers to the rapid expansion after the planck epoch where quantum gravity no longer factors in (where general relativity and known quantum physics are understood).  The Big Bang says nothing about whether this planck epoch arose from a prior crunch, quantum foam, or something else entirely.What? Where are you getting all this bad information?  [Fred Hoyle was an atheist, and *never* accepted the Big Bang](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fred_Hoyle#Rejection_of_the_Big_Bang).  

&gt; BB is rapid expansion from an already existing singularity.

Correction: we don't know for certain that it was a singularity.  All models that employ a general relativistic mathematics lead to a singularity, but physicists dislike this conclusion precisely for that reason.  A gravitational singularity tends not to sit well with what we know about physics (massive particles have a minimum wavelength).  

It depends on who you ask concerning the Big Bang, but some will say it only refers to the rapid expansion once general relativity actually works, and what happened prior to the planck epoch is entirely unknown.&gt;1, the Big Bang theory is not the first atheistic cosmological idea.

What in the world is an atheistic cosmological idea?  Cosmology is a science, there aren't atheistic-science anythings... it's just science.

&gt;2, it's not an atheistic cosmological idea at all. It was proposed by a priest, endorsed by the Pope, and atheists were among its staunchest critics, because it went against the Steady State theory[1] .

Steady state theory didn't arise until the same time the term "Big Bang" was coined because they both came from the same guy.  Also, the reason *cosmologists* and *astrophysicists* take issue with the big bang is that *certain models* require a reduction into a singularity of spacetime.  That's it.  The singularity makes sense mathematically, but not what we know about the physical universe, so our best knowledge tells us these models are wrong.

There aren't "atheistic cosmological" theories trying to reject the big bang, the rapid expansion post planck epoch is well-accepted.  The difference is that physicists don't find the idea of an object of infinite density very plausible, which is where oscillatory and quantum foam models arise.  See, to me that just represents the traditional definition of "agnostic". I'm not sure where "atheist" would take part in this analogy, since hypothetically you'd think it equally likely that the jar be even or odd.&gt;I was referring to how OP contrasted it to "supernatural explanations."

That doesn't make the Big Bang "atheistic."  I'm still not seeing how you go from supernatural origins to "the Big Bang is atheistic."  The Big Bang is just a scientific theory intended to describe the interactions of the universe at the earliest knowable point in our history. 

&gt;Really? You're saying that evidence shows the Big Bang is wrong? Could you give me a link for this?

Nope, I'm saying the cosmological models that follow the Big Bang to it's fullest conclusion (a singularity of spacetime) are considered incorrect or questionable for moments prior to the planck epoch.

In other words, cosmological models w.r.t. moments after the problems of quantum gravity and reflect the expansion described in the Big Bang theory: well accepted.  Conclusions drawn about what happened prior to: highly dubious. 

That's what cosmologists mean when they say the Big Bang doesn't imply a "beginning," because the Big Bang does not rule out oscillatory models (among others) that allow for an eternal past.&gt; OP is the one trying to paint it as such, not me.

The contraposition of supernaturalism is naturalism, not atheism, which is why I'm uncertain why you keep calling it that.

&gt;Why? What evidence is there against it?

Not sure what you mean by "evidence against it." We have *no known model* that accurately reflects quantum gravity, so any affirmative position about what there was prior to the planck epoch will be pure speculation.  The singularity is a conceptual placeholder (from mathematical extrapolation from general relativity) for what is currently unknown pre-planck epoch, and as a result, the correct response to "did the universe begin?" is "we don't know".

To say the universe "began to exist" is wildly speculative at this point. In fact, one major goal of cosmologists is to derive a theory that undoes the dependency on a singularity, precisely because from a physical standpoint it makes no sense.I'm aware of the distinct systems, but I'm uncertain what utility you gain out of the 4-type system you mentioned above.  After all, what can you really say you are "gnostic" about anyway?  What do you gain by appending "agnostic" to anything, given that we aren't truly certain of much at all? 

It seems to me that "agnostic-x" becomes a redundant statement.

&gt;An agnostic atheist in the 4 type system would be either an agnostic or an atheist in the 3 type system.

So just to clarify what you said: from the 4-type system, "agnostic atheist" maps back to either atheist or agnostic in the 3-type system, yes?  Then what does that make agnostic-theists?  It seems to me they, too, can be either agnostic or theist in the 3-type system, in which case it's unclear to me how one distinguishes a certain subset of "agnostic theist" from "agnostic atheist." It would be morally permissible, it's not the same as morally right (under many moral frameworks).&gt; On this sub, atheism and naturalism are typically one and the same.

But the distinction is very important.  Conflating atheist with naturalist in the terms of scientific inquiry places an unwarranted bias-blame on scientific inquiry.  

&gt;Then why, in this comment, did you say that "our best knowledge tells us that [models with a singularity] are wrong"?

Because they conclude a singularity, which simply cannot be the case.  It can be better phrased that said models are *incomplete*, but incomplete in what regard and how much is also entirely unknown, which means we're ultimately agnostic about what the model informs us (excepting what we can say about the expansion itself). 

&gt;Why doesn't it make sense?

In terms of QM, it's fairly recognized that particles have a minimum wavelength.  An infinitely small point (singularity) does not respect this, and as a result, our basic physics models break down and become unintelligible. What differentiates "I don't know" from "I don't believe"?  To me "belief" and "know" differ only in degree of certainty (ie., knowledge is a more certain belief).&gt; Reading from what I linked about the 4 type system, an agnostic would say we can't (either currently or ever) know whether or not god exists, i.e. that the claim is (currently) unfalsifiable.

This makes sense, but I'm not entirely sure how you would then apply it.  Are you saying that you believe that all claims about the existence god are unfalsifiable?  That seems contrapositional to certain theistic claims about miracles and answering prayers.

&gt;The chart in the 4 type system reads the agnostic theist position as: "I don't think we can gain knowledge of god, but I choose to believe in one anyways". This would place agnostic theists as theists in the 3 type system.

But this is what confuses me.  It seems to me from this example that what you really have are all agnostic atheists really map to *agnostics*, whereas all gnostic atheists map to atheists.  After all, I don't think you would say that you just "chose" atheism on a whim (given an unfalsifiable claim).  Rather, you'd say that unfalsifiable claims require justification, and lacking any, are more likely to be False.  That's a form of falsification about unfalsifiable claims themselves, so wouldn't that just make you an atheist (in 3-type)? 

&gt;I should have clarified: Most agnostic atheists do map to agnostics in the 3 type system.

This much makes sense to me. 

&gt;The ones who map to atheists are ones who can't claim knowledge of anything, simply because they've defined knowledge as 100% certainty, which they have every right to do.

Right, but then it's still unclear to me what we gain from the two-form phrasing.  (A)gnostic theists seem to lump together into one indistinguishable group whereas (a)gnostic atheists seem to conflate what is clearly a neutral position (agnosticism) from a contraposition (atheism) via *at least some form of position taking*.  [I should hardly think so](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/knowledge-analysis/#KnoJusTruBel).One says you *should* do this, the other says, "it's not wrong for you to do this," but that doesn't mean it's the right thing to do either.  

Examples of morally permissible actions are white lies and meat consumption (arguably).&gt;I don't see the difference. If you have to kill a child in order to save everyone else on earth then you should kill the child and it is not wrong to kill the child.

Probably because you ascribe to a different moral theory than I do.  But think of it this way: is it morally *wrong* to smoke a cigarette?  It sort of depends, but clearly we don't think so across the board (after all, it is generally uncontroversially legal).  Does that therefore make it morally *right* to smoke cigarettes?  Clearly not, we're not shaming people for not smoking cigarettes.  What this middle ground is called is "morally permissible," which basically means "not wrong, but not right either."  

Killing a baby is morally wrong, saving mankind is morally good. I think it's a pretty easy case to make that killing a baby to save mankind is morally permissible, depending on what your stance is on the categorical imperative.&gt;The system applies to one claim at a time. Currently there are claims of something that I would certainly call a god that are unfalsifiable. I am a gnostic atheist when it comes to the falsifiable ones.

But then how does that make the label coherent?  If it's on a per-claim basis, it seems to me to be entirely context-dependent, which seems far less useful in expressing your position.

&gt;I have no reason to believe, so I don't believe the claim (as opposed to the positive belief that they are False). 

So this description is type-3 agnosticism through and through.  Lacking a position in the affirmative and the negation of a set of claims is purely agnostic.  But you just said you were gnostic in certain claims in the set, so clearly there's something to be said here that doesn't add up. 

&gt;Thinking about it I'm not too sure agnostic theists would be theists. It is a very peculiar position, as the question shifts from belief (which can be faith based) in the 4 type system, to the existence of evidence in the 3 type system. 

Right, so in this case doesn't that just make "agnostic-x" really just agnostics?  What is gained, then, by saying "agnostic *x*" as opposed to just "agnostic"?  On one end we have theists, then agnostics, then atheists, that sounds like a 3-type description to me.&gt; There are non-religious moral systems but I don't see any of them holding up to the same treatment atheists give religion.

Not sure what you mean by this, but secular moral theories don't just fall out of thin air.  They're pretty thoroughly reasoned through and scrutinized by opposing positions. 

&gt;Where's the empirical evidence that virtue ethics is True?

There's plenty (in favor of virtue ethics): 

1.  Forming habits has been shown to better increase the likelihood of performing an action under duress.  Therefore, it makes sense to employ a set of virtue ethics to better encourage the behaviors considered to be beneficial. 

2.  Encouraging empathetic habits increases one's aptitude for empathy, thereby increasing decisions that benefit others as well as oneself (in the process).  

Not sure what you mean by "X moral theory is __True__."  Morals are a set of behaviors best intended to optimize a certain outcome; the verdict is (obviously) still out as to which one best optimizes this, but in theory that which is demonstrably the best would be "True" insofar as that word can be applied.&gt;It refers to both the origin of the universe and the expansion.
This is like those pendants who leap on people who say "I am good".

Did you mean "pedants"?  And no it doesn't.  The Big Bang theory only adequately addresses the expansion after known physical models can take effect.  There is absolutely a period of time between the conceptual (but not confirmed or accepted) singularity and where Big Bang Models break down where all sorts of explanations can take hold\u2014including oscillatory models.  

While the term "origin" of the universe can be used to describe either, they mean very different things philosophically (which matters given the context of the debate). &gt;My apologies, he rejected the Big Bang due to a priori philosophical reasons,

Not exactly.  He rejected the Big Bang in part for philosophical reasons (primarily his atheism), but also because it was (and still is) agreed that models depending on singularities as their explanation are dubious in nature. 

&gt;and rejected atheism due to the fine tuning of the universe.

It's not entirely clear that Hoyle rejected atheism, so much as he ascribed to a certain type of Spinozan deism in terms of intelligent design.  After all, his rejection of the Big Bang (that lasted his whole life) was largely because of his dissatisfaction with what the Big Bang potentially could support (meaning cosmological arguments).  So given that things could be better, are you not of the opinion that this is the best possible world god could have made?  How does this sit with your position on the Problem of Evil? If you had met me two years ago, you would have been convinced that I was the seed in good soil.  Your point doesn't hold up.  It's easy to hand-wave away someone else's change because it no longer matches yours, but that's not an intellectually honest approach on the matter. I agree, which is generally why I try and focus on things like the Cosmological Argument.  If you can remove the assumption "god exists", things get pretty tough from there.&gt;&gt;If someone like that can come to believe that a god doesn't exist, then they must have a pretty good reason

&gt; That's debatable.

Enlighten me.&gt;Argue what, exactly? Wrong about what, exactly?

Let's turn this on it's head: The only reason that you believe in a Christian god is because you're afraid of going to hell and were born in a Christian culture.  Do you believe me?  Obviously not, you *know* your internal state and reasons better than some guy on the outside looking in.  So what gives you the authority to do the same?  Seems like a patently bad double-standard to me. 

&gt;As joelanator0492 said, it's about someone's state, not the contents of his/her mind.

From personal experience, it doesn't matter one bit. You could pin me down as "good soil" without a second beat not even two years ago.  &gt;Creation, pre-fall, was the best possible world. When Christ returns, he will restore creation to that "good" state.

So, you believe in some form of literalist creation story?  Otherwise how do you get around the millions of deaths of humans or near-humans that evolved prior to any "creation" state?  &gt;If you can shrink space time, which is the tool you use to measure wavelength, you can shrink this observable minimum as well.

You can only shrink or expand spacetime at levels relevant to GR.  The whole point is that GR fails to account for quantum gravity, which is why the planck epoch is considered the first moment BB models make sense.  Prior to the planck epoch, all known physics breaks down.

&gt;These physics change near black holes,

Black hole singularities are not considered identical to a spacetime singularity, and while they're represented as singularities, a similar problem emerges when it comes to determining what exactly is "inside" a black hole (see problems of quantum gravity). 

&gt;In my understanding even the speed of light constant only applies in general relativity where spacetime is flat.

Not exactly, to us it may not appear to be the same, but *locally* it will be *c* nonetheless. &gt; How I resolve it for myself is to distinguish between what's in the bible and what the bible teaches.

Ok, but in this case, your argument depends on pre-fall conditions being real, which is what I'm interested in. 

&gt;I do believe the account as simply written, but I think understanding its inherent complexities are perhaps lost on the uneducated-contemporary reader.

Considering I used to be a student of apologetics and for a time was a YEC, I can comfortably say that a) I understand the position and b) that it is completely contrary to what is factually known about reality.&gt;All systems are claim-dependent, because we have many definitions of "god".

I disagree.  When it comes to discussion of theism, we're talking about established religions (not just deism), I think it's pretty easy to take a position (if one exists) on (a)theism depending on whether one subscribes to a formalized faith.  In that regard, atheist is a rejection of all such faiths, since any definition of a god is considered meaningless or nonexistent.

&gt;Are you saying there is no difference between me and a faith-based theist?

I was just following your own line of reasoning.  You mentioned before that agnostic atheists basically fall into the "agnostic" category of the 3-type system, and the later mentioned that agnostic theists would as well.  In this regard it seems that your conceptualization of the 4-type system is identical to the 3-type system.&gt;I'm a little skeptical that this will happen, frankly. It sounds like the sort of retrofuturism we laugh at in a half-century.

Well if we really did have *complete* control over matter, walking on water, water into wine, and replicators would be possible. The resurrection from the dead would depend on how one medically restarts a brain, but I don't find it impossible. 

The bigger question (which I think you're raising) is if we'll ever get to that point.  Honestly, it's hard to say.  If you told someone just 80 years ago we'd be on the moon and sending robots to Mars, learning about it all from pocket phones that share data all over the planet, they'd probably laugh too.  

&gt;People might start claiming Jesus was a time traveller, but he doesn't seem to possess any technology (that presumably you'd have to have with you), so nothing would really happen at all.

Yeah that would be the only valuable claim, and since time travel is largely considered impossible by modern physicists, it seems that the miracle claims can remain in-tact.&gt; 1) We've never established that.

Ok, so then your definition of theism is the broadest meaning of the term (strictly belief in "god" of some sort)?

&gt;Those religions make different falsifiable and unfalsifiable claims. I am gnostic about the falsifiable ones and agnostic about the unfalsifiable ones. my gnosticism about the falsifiable ones prevents me from accepting any the religions as True.

So again, this makes it highly unclear why you call yourself an "agnostic" atheist.  You seem to recognize that there are falsifiable claims, and that these can be rejected.  This seems to be in direct conflict with your definition of agnostic atheist in the beginning, which claimed to be w.r.t. to the position that you are atheist and that religious claims are unfalsifiable. 

&gt;The 4 type system makes a distinction between agnostic theists and agnostic atheists, which the 3 type does not. I really don't see the problem.

But by your own admission agnostic theists and agnostic atheists are really the same thing.  According to your definition, agnostic-x means taking the position that a belief about something cannot be known (unfalsifiable), but then a position is taken nonetheless.  It's unclear to me how to make clear the distinction, then, of "agnostic (a)theist" since both sides in the "agnostic" umbrella claim the position is unfalsifiable, and, ostensibly, choose their position on a whim despite there being any proposed reason to do so. 

In reality, a truly unknowable claim means we withhold judgment in *either* direction because we have no reason or means by which to determine it's truth value.  It seems unreasonable that someone who'd call themselves an "agnostic *x*" would truly believe a position is unknowable, and yet still commit to a position without any supporting reasons. &gt; Free matter manipulation of the sort that lets you walk on water convincingly sounds like the sort of thing that's plausible with futuristic technology but turns out to be kind of a huge hassle that suffers from too many technical problems to bother with.

Well obviously.  It would have to be done at such a point that the technology was commonplace that a layman could do it, since we're not going to invest millions to do something that has no practical effect. 

&gt;Like you wear an ion engine or something, and you can hover without looking like much, but then it turns out you boil the water below you and them's just the thermodynamic breaks. 

I think you're suffering from a lack of imagination here ;).  Remember how part of the hypothetical was that we have *full* control over the matter?  What's stopping us from increasing the bonding energy for surface molecules, or somehow increasing the surface tension?

&gt;Ironically, isn't access to future scientific knowledge something a lot of atheists claim would validate the Bible?

Access to *knowledge* yes.  Examples of a guy who did magical (at the time) things that we can then replicate through our own discovery isn't quite the same thing.

&gt;So if we find out Jesus did use a quantum whatchamacallit, that's equally a proof of his claims as showing him up.

That would be quite the proof, since in theory we'd have to go back in time to prove it (since no documentation has been given to provide the scientific knowledge or explanation as to how Jesus did any of these things).  At that point, we could just verify the whole thing as-is.  But the locality is precisely the problem.  If things are going to condense, they have to *relative to one another*, otherwise the reduction to a point is incoherent.  

In any case, here's some other sources: 

[1](https://www.reddit.com/r/askscience/comments/2jlkpd/if_the_planck_length_is_the_shortest_distance/clcup6n)

[2](https://www.reddit.com/r/askscience/comments/2omqjr/how_could_the_big_bang_singularity_have_been/cmp23f5)

[3](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Initial_singularity)Ok, so let's formalize this a bit:

Let's have GE = the claim God exists and NGE = the claim god does not exist.

According to your 4-type theory, anything "atheist" rejects GE.  So presumably Gnostic Atheists reject GE but accept NGE, yes?  Let me know if this isn't right.  Therefore, an Agnostic Atheist rejects GE *and* rejects NGE, yes?  Under 3-type system we'd just call these individuals "agnostics".  

Here's what doesn't make sense, what are "agnostic theists," then?  It would seem a Gnostic Theist must reject NGE and accept GE, right?  So the only coherent combination left is an individual rejecting both NGE and GE, *exactly the same as "agnostic atheist"*.  

A simpler table: 

       GE | NGE
       ---------
    GA| F | T
    AA| F | F
    AT| F | F
    GT| T | T


AG and AA are identical, and there's no other coherent combination available.  In fact, the 4-type system *must* reduce (it seems) to the 3-type system to make sense.  

&gt;As a Muslim, this made me LOL

If you think muslim apologetics are even *slightly* more convincing than any other apologetic claims, I'd like to see your proof.  Or are you referring to the "echo chamber" statement?  

Care to elaborate how Saudi Arabia has allowed for minds of various faiths to question the teachings of Mohammad and refine the views of those who accept it?The facts disagree: [DR](http://imgur.com/a/6DzXJ), [atheism sub](http://imgur.com/H9il59X)

edit: those without imgur access: DebateReligion: 31,737 subbed, 68 online.  Atheism: ~2,100,000 subbed, 1394 online. 

Source (taken 11/4/2015 @ 9:13 AM)&gt;No, I would agree with you that Muslim apologetics are not as developed as Christian apologetics.

Ah ok, just thought I'd clarify.  

&gt;As a side note, I am not Muslim because of these apologetics. I am Muslim because the historicity of Jesus \ufdfa.

That's a really interesting take. If you're interested in unpacking this idea (and facing the crucible of skeptics) you should post this as a new thread topic in DR.  No pressure though :).The bigger question is, do we keep him around?  On the one hand, this level of stupid is entertaining.  On the other, it's obnoxious and distracting as all hell. I say boot him.[Here's](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3rih22/theres_10x_more_atheist_on_rdebatereligion_than/cwobil7) my source (me).

edit: showing that OP is full of shit.Obviously, we're a bunch of stupid, sexy heathens.  Of course we have tits!  And blackjack!  And hookers! Want more data? Sure thing buddy: [here's](https://www.reddit.com/r/debatereligion/about/traffic) the DR traffic over the last month, including *all* unique visitors by IP/user id.  See how it's only, say 60K/month? 

Now, [here's](https://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/about/traffic) atheism's traffic.  We're talking a factor of ~16x users in atheism vs. debate religion.  Approximately 40K uniques every single day. 

Is your complaint that people seem more engaged (ie., more comments) here?  Welcome to the world of debate.  Take into consideration that the comments in /r/atheism are fairly homogeneously atheist, whereas there's far more balance between theist and atheist here. 

In short, you don't have anything.&gt;Just censor me ay?

Is drowning out cacophonic nonsense "censoring"?  If so, yup. 

&gt;I'm posing a very valid topic here.

You aren't.  You didn't post any numbers or source for you claim.  I did, and it very thoroughly discredits your point. 

&gt;Why do atheist spend so much time interacting with theists as opposed to other atheists???

Because the thought of people voting under some other metric than "this is the most reasonable decision" is obviously detrimental for everyone.  Also, most of us readily admit that it's *possible* we could be wrong.  Who knows, maybe some genius with an unknown, knockout apologetic is right around the corner?  I'd like to be there when they show up. As we all know now, your favorite.It doesn't matter.  The numbers show that even if *every single person* on DR was an atheist (already False), we'd still be 60% fewer than the number of atheists on /r/atheism.&gt;Whatever you want to call it justify your own tyranny, go right ahead. It's censoring, plain as day.

Feel free to keep telling yourself that.

&gt;I presented visible evidence as per the front page and every other page of these subs. If my sources are invalid, explain so, don't censor. THIS IS A DEBATE FORUM NOT A SCIENCE JOURNAL!

The evidence you provided was demonstrably bullshit, as per the numbers I gave demonstrating that there are ~16x daily visits in /r/atheism than *all* the users in debate religion. 

&gt; Let's debate it. oh wait, we can't, i've been censored!!!

If you used those extra sharp observation skills you claim to have, you'd see very quickly that there's a hell of a lot of theists on this sub who comment literally every day without any problems.  Time for a reality check?&gt; Everyone who studies apologetics is a student of apologetics.

Yes, and?

&gt;For a time I was in my garage this morning. Does that make me a car?

That depends, did you behave as a car, function as a car, and maintain all the properties of a car? Because if you did, then you were. As it were, I behaved as  YEC, functioned as a YEC, maintained all the properties of a YEC (including believing it very strongly), so yes, I *was* a YEC.  

Plus, isn't this (very bad for what you're trying to say) analogy meant to point out that people who go to church aren't automatically christian?  I should know, I agreed (and still do) with the point concerning *that* aspect.

&gt;The fact that you are comfortable, is not evidence of anything nor does it support anything but your perceived comfort.

I'm comfortable *because* there's every bit of evidence to the contrary of any YEC position.  You have to be quite science-illiterate to believe in YEC, and unfortunately for my past YEC self, I received a quality education.&gt;I'm proposing that Atheist, deep down, sense God does exist and they're instinctively drawn to this atmosphere for this very reason.

As someone who once (very sincerely) believed god existed and was drawn to the atmosphere, I can tell you very seriously that this is not the reason I come here. 

&gt;How am I wrong?

You'd have to prove the motive for every atheist here, *especially* those who de-converted.  &gt; This "source" merely presents how many users are logged in to reddit. It says nothing of what topics they are currently engaged in.

Did you even read the pages? Or are you bad at evaluating data?  It says right there that these are unique visitors visiting *those specific* pages.  

Fact: There are approximately 16x users daily *visiting* /r/atheism posts compared to debate religion.

Fact: Assuming an equal sampling rate of *visitors* vs. *those engaged* it is simply impossible that there are 10x atheists here than there. 

Fact: Even assuming a default sub skew of 10x (ie., only 1/10 /r/atheism users are actually "engaged"), this is still impossible for there to be 10x debate religion atheists vs. /r/atheism. 

&gt;It says nothing of what topics they are currently engaged in.

Nope, go back and read [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/about/traffic) again. It __very clearly states__: 

&gt;&gt;
-  pageviews are all hits to /r/atheism, including both listing pages and comment pages.
-  uniques are the total number of unique visitors (determined by a combination of their IP address and User Agent string) that generate the above pageviews. This is independent of whether or not they are signed in.Time for you to go back and actually read what they said? 

From the /r/atheism stats page: 

&gt;&gt;pageviews are all hits to /r/atheism, including both listing pages and comment pages.

&gt; Once again you've failed to understand your own sources. Nobody's engaging in /r/atheism because the atmosphere there is putrid.

Thanks for the pure speculation.

&gt;Where's as

Not a word

&gt;the activity on /r/debatereligion is vibrant.

It is? Let's see some comparative numbers. 

&gt;Nobody wants to interact with atheist because they know they are wrong.

Wrong about what? If it's so knowable, then prove it. 

&gt;deep down, even atheist know they are wrong that's why they gravitate towards theistic arenas. 

Nope, I'm an ex-theist so I know exactly what a lack of gravitating towards that arena means. 

&gt;This is undeniable psychology.

Sounds like you've just redefined what "undeniable" means. 

&gt;exhibit A. No activity
exhibit b. much activity

No idea what your metric of "activity" is, but it's clearly misinformed.  They have an entire post dedicated to "hot topics" for the sub, or did you miss that too?This is more confusing than the already confusing 4-type system. 

Ok, let me just ask you how you define the following and we'll go from there. 

GE = claim god (under any definition of a being that created the universe) exists.  NGE = claim god does not exist.  

In the 3-type system, we see: 

Atheist=&gt; GE: F, NGE: T

Agnostic=&gt; GE: F, NGE: F

Theist =&gt; GE: T, NGE: F

Very simple, yes?  How does your system map each variable?  Already it seems you'll need more, because apparently a deistic god, is different from an intervening god. 

Ultimately I think this causes more problems than it solves.&gt; People that use agnostic this way are attempting to place themselves in a position of not being on a particular side, when that is neither tenable nor coherent.

I disagree.  I think you're referring to a pragmatic *response* to that position, but the position itself is tenable. 

&gt;If you don't know what your belief is, then you cannot participate in the conversation in any reasonable way.

Which is probably why we don't see many pure agnostics here. 

&gt;More commonly, people will call themselves agnostic because they somehow think the the atheist/theist dichotomy doesn't apply to them when that is obviously not the case.

I used to think this, but it isn't True.

&gt; visits does not equal engagement.

Ok, but if *visits* __maps__ to a number for engagement, the difference is still proportional.  Hell, I even gave /r/debatereligion a 10x handicap in the ratio, and it *still* doesn't add up to 10x.

&gt;How hard is that to understand, __boy__?

What the fuck is this antiquated bullshit? How old do you think I am, anyway, sonny?

&gt;No one is engaging on /r/atheism, as opposed to the high level of engagement on /r/debatereligion.

Are you in the investments business?  Because your speculations are wild!  Seriously though, back that shit up with some goddamn evidence next time.  A link to the pages themselves isn't proof of anything. 

&gt;Wrong. Check the flairs. Majority of comments come from atheists.

Irrelevant to your claim of 10x users.  Also, check the ratio of flairs on /r/atheism.  See the discrepancy?  &gt; I did, that's my point. You don't even understand your own sources.

You keep saying that, but you fail to show why you think that is. Right now I'm just seeing a toddler with hands over its ears saying "nuh-uh".  Maybe you should actually learn how to evaluate numbers of activity (which is what I do nearly every day as a part of my *job*) before you start saying silly, silly things. 

&gt;But they're not engaging. They are visiting the page then leaving.

I've addressed this in at least 3 different ways now and you've failed to even acknowledge that understand what those points are saying. 

&gt;Why would you make this assumption?

It's a general assumption, but it's not required.  See the 10x handicap I give to debatereligion. 

&gt;It's clearly False judging by MY SOURCE 

Your "source" is a goddamn link to the page with no explanation as to what metric you're using to gauge "activity". From what I see, it's very clear that your "source" actually indicates the opposite of what you say it does. 

&gt;The engagement rate

Yes, why don't you define for me in rigorous terms what you mean by "engagement rate"?&gt;&gt;Nobody's engaging in /r/atheism because the atmosphere there is putrid.
&gt; That's your claim.

That wasn't my claim... I was quoting the parent comment there... 

&gt;Actually, it is a word,

"Where's as" is a word?  As in, "where is as"?  I think it was pretty clear the poster was trying to say "whereas", which is not what they said. 

&gt;If you want to obtusely nit-pick the online writings of others, you should do so correctly

Are you sure you read OP's then my comment correctly?

&gt;My advise is to ignore the grammatical mistakes in the online comments of others, because there is an atmosphere of informality here, and you look like a snob when you criticize that.

Normally I do, but OP is particularly stupid, and could use all the help we can give.Yes, and?  /r/askscience requires accredited scientists to post their responses.  Wikipedia has long since been considered a much more verifiable and vetted source (especially in the scientific scopes). 

Where are *your* sources?  

Here's more of mine: [1](http://physics.stackexchange.com/questions/136860/did-the-big-bang-happen-at-a-point/136861#136861) [2](http://www.askamathematician.com/2012/09/q-what-are-singularities-do-they-exist-in-nature/)&gt; Think of the 7-type system as a 3D mapping of one's beliefs.

o_O

&gt;I might also be going off an outdated version of what we consider a theist as my definition is

Why not just go by this definition (which encompasses deism)?
&gt;&gt;belief in the existence of a god or gods, especially belief in one god as creator of the universe, intervening in it and sustaining a personal relation to his creatures.

&gt;Agnostic:

That one is closer to the mark. 

&gt;I agree it makes life more complicated but I am trying to find a way to include all beliefs without making people conform to definitions we have set up. 

Definitions serve a useful categorization purpose.  I don't think there's much meaningful distinction to be made between the atheist and the theist/deist, which is why they are often lumped together when *compared* to atheist.  The terms deist and theist have their own purpose thereafter to make the distinctions more clear. 

&gt;On reddit we should definitely use the 4 block system as it is more coherent for discussion and debate.

I disagree.  I'm still unsure what people mean when they call someone an "agnostic theist", unless they hope to equate "agnostic" to "not 100% certain" which is redundant to say the least. 

I think the 3-type system does a sufficient job in differentiating positions without any unnecessary obfuscation/duplication of meanings.&gt;But it doesn't. You simply cannot just assume a visit equals engagement.

I didn't. Go back an read what I said.  Nowhere did I say "visit = engagement".  I said they can be *proportional* to one another.  And even there I gave a 10x handicap to DR. 

&gt;Majority of the /r/atheism posts have little to no comments.

Ok, but how many posts per minute show up on /r/atheism vs. /r/debatereligion?  How many upvotes/downvotes per sub?  These things matter, because if activity is condensed to more active posts vs. spread over a larger number, it will *appear* to a casual uninformed observer that DR is far more engaged than /r/atheism.

&gt;No one's engaging

You haven't shown that yet. 

&gt;Watch your language, this isn't /r/atheism.

I'll watch mine when you stop throwing around racially-charged terms. 

&gt;We actually treat people with respect around here.

You just called me "boy".... You know there's a whole ethos of "boy" equating to slave-owners down-talking their slaves, right?

&gt;Something they don't teach at the church of atheism.

Because a "church of atheism" doesn't exist. 

&gt;Just a reminder visits =/= engagement.

Never said they were.  The fact that you missed that (and possibly *still* do) is very telling. 

&gt;A link to statics isn't proof of anything.

That's why I gave you a thorough analysis of the numbers.  Something you are apparently incapable of doing. 

&gt;See, I can play the denial game too.

Not a denial game, I just know how to read numbers.  You sidestep the issue entirely and just link to various subs. 

&gt;Compare the pages firsthand and you'll notice the engagement on /r/debatereligion by atheists is much higher than /r/atheism. 

Again, what is the distribution of posts/minute on each sub?  The number of up/down votes per minute?  We could have more posts in /r/atheism with less density that equate to greater volume.  You haven't backed your position against this possibility, so the oneness is on you to get your facts straight. 

&gt;What? there are no flairs on /r/atheism.

[Someone needs to do their research](http://imgur.com/MmaYdB5).  But you don't even need that.  If you spent even half a second on most posts, you'd see that most of the comments are not debating one another about god (because most people there agree god doesn't exist).  That is, most people in /r/atheism are (shocker) atheist.&gt; Coming from the person who conflated visits with engagements. 

That's three times you've demonstrated your complete lack of understanding on analysis (proportion is not the same as *equating*).  This has been very educational. 

&gt;Visit the front page and observe for yourself.

Same problem I mentioned before, sparse but dense posts can still be less *overall* engaging for a sub than multiple, less active posts. 

&gt;I could extract all the numbers from that page but it's easier if you just visit the page. I provided a link above.

You actually have to do that. Because as it is, I'm happy to point out to you that /r/atheism had &gt;150 posts in the last 24 hours alone, compared to the __10__ in DR. You would need 15x comments *per post* in /r/debatereligion than each post in /r/atheism to make the claim that they were even *equal* in terms of sub engagement.  

__Your__ claim is that, there are 10x engaged users on DR, which means you'd have to show 150x comments (nearly all of which, by the way, would have to be atheist).

&gt;My examples are constructed on NEW not HOT. Hot pulls out the most engaged in posts. It's not a legitimate analysis.

Go back and count the number of actual comments in *all* posts from the last 24 hours in /r/atheism and compare it to /r/debatereligion.  Make sure you get a good count of atheist vs. theist posts to get an accurate measure.  As I pointed out above, you'll need a roughly 150x comment ratio in DR.  

Is your head still in the sand, or will you actually address this glaring problem with your "source"?&gt; Hey! Any sort of pedophilia comments will not be tolerated here! Please refrain from doing so!

You must have a very sick head if you could pull any sort of pedophilia from that comment. 

&gt;No, all you've said was "we can assume visits = engagement"

The stupid is very strong with this one.  I'll let you read my other comments concerning this point. 

&gt;How do you not see the fundamental problem with this reasoning?

Oh irony.

&gt;It doesn't matter if /r/atheism has 10 billion visits/usersonline and /r/debatereligion has only 10 visits/usersonline.

You do realize that, in this case, each user would have to comment, in the *same* post (since each post visit is counted as unique) 10 billion times to add up to your 10x claim right?  I'd say it very much matters if those were the numbers, since it's blatantly obvious that there aren't 10 billion comments happening per user per post.  See the correlation yet? 

&gt;/r/debatereligion is more interactive than /r/atheism!

*Trumpet sounds!* This is not an argument, you're just restating a (misinformed) position. 

&gt;My metric is post comments.

See my comment about &gt;150 posts in /r/atheism in the last day compared to the 10 in DR.  See how each post in DR would need a 150x comment ratio to /r/atheism to hope to represent the 10x number you claim exists. 

&gt;Majority of the posts on /r/atheism have a low volume of comments --&lt;10.

Majority doesn't matter if the subset of that majority is still greater than the sum of the opposition.  Do you see why? If the *minority* of posts in /r/atheism have, say, 500 comments, but that minority is, say 30 posts (compared to the 120 sparse ones), that's still 3x more than all of DRs posts combined. 

Guess what I just did?   I just found the highest-commented post in the last 24 hours of Debate religion ([here](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3rfns0/if_we_reject_deuteronomy_and_leviticus_by_what/), 80 comments) and found __12__ posts in /r/atheism with &gt;80 comments than the last 24 hours. 

I'm going to give you the benefit and ignore the fact that those 12 posts averaged to closer to 200 comments/post.  I'm also going to give you the benefit and assume *every single DR post had the max number of comments* (80).  

So, DR has a total of 800 comments in the last 24 hours.  /r/atheism has, *at least* 960, but definitely more (since we ignored all posts with &lt;80 comments, and didn't account for the fact that these posts averaged 200, no 80 comments).  

Even with this generous handicap, the engagement ratio of DR to atheism isn't even 1:1, and that's also ignoring that there are far more comments (proportionally) coming from theists in /r/debatereligion than there are in /r/atheism.&gt;How is the following tenable?

Let GE be the claim "god exists" (we say that it's the particulars of god and the existent universe, and god being within that set). 

The claim NGE is "god does not exist" (god is not a part of the set of existent things).  They are, in fact, separate claims (not purely reflective).  In other words ~GE does not necessarily mean NGE.

One can say this if one believes GE/NGE is vacuously True/False. 

As a result, we have the following: 

-  Atheist (of any sort): GE = False

-  Theist (of any sort): NGE = False

-  Agnostic: NGE = False and GE = False

Incidentally, let's use the 4-type system that people love to use here.  

How can we assign these positions? 

-  Gnostic Theist: GE = True, NGE = False

-  Gnostic Atheist: GE = False, NGE = True

-  Agnostic Atheist: GE = False, NGE = False (presumably this is the distinction).

-  Agnostic Theist: GE = False, NGE = False

And here we see that "Agnostic -x" are exactly identical, rendering the 4-type system as incoherent. &gt;I think the (a)gnostic qualifiers show one's claim as they "know" the truth or not.

But what things can we say we really "know" at all?  It seems like a redundant qualifier. 

&gt;On the deist term I was going off of Merriam's definition which is in no way the authority of definitions but I feel is widely accepted.

Deism is fine, but the greater point is that there's no need to draw a separate distinction there.  Deism readily fits within the theism paradigm, which means we overcompensate for granularity by creating a separate distinction for it in terms such as these.&gt; I agree %100 and you are very smart man.

You mean 100% right? 

I may as well live up to my reputation.&gt; Of course they can be, but what makes you think they are?

Ever heard of the normal distribution?  Even sampling across large enough sample sizes? 

&gt;Many more on /r/atheism but it doesn't matter because very few of them are stimulating engagement.

Ah so now it's become subjective.  How convenient. 

&gt;People are posting and running off.

Probably because it isn't a debate sub.  Check out /r/debateanatheist and see what kind of correlative activity shows up there.  Hey, look at that, debateanatheist has tons of people returning and resuming conversation?  What about /r/politics?  Same story, interesting!  It's almost as if it has nothing to do with the content, and everything to do with how that content is addressed.

&gt;Atheist don't like each other.

Can I get Sweeping Generalizations for 400, Alex? 

&gt;Upvotes/downvotes are extremely low effort. they are poor representations of people's willingness to interact

So let's stick to comments/day/sub.  After all, your post states that there are 10x more atheists overall here than on /r/atheism.  Seems pretty far from the mark already.  Or are you shifting the goal-posts to redefine what you meant by that? 

&gt;You don't.

We do.  By a factor of 15, in fact. 

&gt;My facts are solid.

Facts are always solid.  You just don't have any. 

&gt;Check the pages.

I did.  I even counted the number of comments and posts over a 24 hour period. 

&gt; /r/worldnews has a high interaction rate yet is not a debate sub. 

Because it's still a sub meant to foster discussion?  /r/atheism is about circlejerking and atheist news.  Which is entirely besides the point, since your original post was about the *number* atheists here vs. on /r/atheism, which is pathetically False. 

&gt;Atheism is the one of the only subs which has such little interaction vs posts.

Not True at all.  Few subs have posts that have up to 500 comments.  Atheism has at least 2 a day. 

&gt;Atheist don't like talking to each other,

Take a look at /r/Trueatheism and you'll see that subs meant for more discussion bear the same patterns as those in other subs. 

&gt;I'm not blaming you for this.

Unless you can actually address the heaping number of problems and challenges I've raised concerning your very bad and misinformed position, I'm done with this discussion.It's dawning on me.By that same metric, agnostic atheist would require NGE to be True. 

Or, conversely, it means you actually subscribe to a 3-type system: 

Theist (since agnostic/gnostic are identical), Agnostic Atheist, and Atheist.  Seems to me at that point that "agnostic atheist" is just an agnostic.I've fattened the troll enough for one day. &gt; In True sense of the word we cannot "know" anything but I suppose claim would be a better word for this situation.

Which is fine, but then it becomes unclear to me what the use of appending "agnostic" is, unless you're saying they're not claiming anything...

&gt;So the reason to not include deism is because it would create a small distinction when we can lump them in with theists until we begin the debate?

In a very broad and oversimplified sense, yes. 

&gt;I don't approve of lumping them in because their ideals and beliefs are uniquely different than theists.

Theism itself has nothing to do with ideals, and the central bonding agent between all theists is the belief that god exists.  Deism shares in that relation.  &gt; But there's a difference between believing that GE is False, and not being convinced that GE is True.

Well yeah, which is why I provided both GE *and* NGE.  GE is the claim that "god exists".  Saying "GE" is False is the same as not being convinced it's True.  Saying NGE is *True* is the same as saying "GE is False, and I have reasons to believe as such".  See the distinction? 

&gt;A theist is by definition someone who believes that GE is True.

Ok, so Agnostic Theist: GE = True and NGE = False.  What is a Gnostic Theist? 

&gt;An atheist, on the other hand, is anyone who does not believe that GE is True.

Yes, which is why both (A)gnostic atheists were given a GE value of False ("I do not accept the claim that god exists"). 

This doesn't change anything about the problem I rose earlier, though. 

&gt;That encompasses people who believe that GE is False, but it also encompasses people whose position is, "I don't believe that GE is True, but I'm also not sure I believe that GE is False. I don't think there's enough evidence to say one way or the other."

In this case you'd have to be a pure agnostic, which is why I think the 3-type system makes more sense. 

&gt;You're arguing that an atheist is someone who believes that GE is False

Yes, an atheist is anyone who rejects the claim "god exists".

&gt;and anyone who is unconvinced by either proposition should get their own third category

No, I'm saying anyone who believes the proposition is completely unknowable/unable to valuate should get their own category (agnostic), since it is a rejection of claims on all sides (conceivably because claims about god are unfalsifiable, for instance).  

&gt;The appending agnostic says they do not claim that there is no god or is a god. But they believe there isn't or is one (depending on theist/atheist)

What is the distinction between a claim and a belief? Isn't somebody who stands behind a claim the same as someone believing it to be True?&gt;You mean, 100%,right?, right?

You mean, "100%__,__ right?" right?&gt;Well no, because an agnostic atheist doesn't have to believe that God does not exist. Whereas a theist has to believe that God does exist, else they are an atheist.

Ok, so again, what you are saying is this: 

Gnostic Atheist: NGE = True, GE = False

Theist (no such thing as (a)gnostic distinction): GE = True, NGE = False (necessarily)

Agnostic Atheist: NGE = False, GE = False.  It would have to be, right? Otherwise they'd just be what you defined as a gnostic atheist. So what makes this any different from the position of a pure Agnostic I pointed out from before? 

&gt;You're simply misusing the terms agnostic and gnostic.

I'm using them precisely as they've been described under a 4-type system. &gt;I may misunderstand what you mean by some of these abbreviations, or by what you understand "False" to mean, but I can't imagine how it is tenable or coherent to think both propositions ("god[s] exists" and "no gods exist") are False, when they are oppositely exclusive propositions. 

Well they aren't exactly.  Consider this: 

"The number of jellybeans in the jar is even."  Clearly the contraposition to this is they are odd.  But does that mean if you reject the claim that the number of jelly beans is even, you must therefore say you believe they are odd?  Clearly not, your real answer is "I don't know".

&gt;Now, one may not have concluded the matter of whether one or the other is True, but that is a non-position; failing to conclude is not the same as concluding "False."

Which is what makes the use of "False" a little tricky here.  But what it means is that you reject the claim given to you.  If it's easier to grasp, you can replace "True/False" with "Accept/Reject" if that makes it more clear what I'm trying to say. 

&gt; Claim is positive and seems to have attached a certain amount of knowledge on the subject in question

Fair enough.

&gt;while belief is held without the positive assertion of one side being True or False.

I'm not sure how this is possible...  Are you familiar with the example "there are an even number of jelly beans in this jar?"  How does a claim about the number compare with a belief under your definitions?&gt; A lack of belief that GE is True does not equate to a positive belief that GE is False.

As I mentioned to someone else, if it's easier for you to replace the original framing with "accept/reject" instead of "True/False" you'll see what I'm getting at here.  

For instance: 

Gnostic Atheist =&gt; NGE: accept (because of reasons), GE: reject (because NGE accepted). 

Gnostic Theist =&gt; GE: accept (because of reasons), NGE: reject (because GE accepted). 

Agnostic Atheist =&gt; GE: reject (lack of belief), NGE: reject? (otherwise you're a gnostic atheist).  

Agnostic Theist =&gt; NGE: reject, GE: reject? (otherwise you're a gnostic theist). 


The reject/accept distinction is meant to point out that it is not an "affirmative claim" that people seem to love equating a "False" valuation with, but simply a rejection of the claim given to them.  

*Even so*, the problem I presented precipitates out: agnostic-x's are the same in both camps, so why not just call them all agnosticts? 

&gt;Suppose I flip a coin. Before I show you the outcome, I ask if you think it's heads. You say, "I don't know."

Yes, so let's use this example as an equivalent: 

Gnostic "Header" =&gt; H: accept (because reasons), T: reject (because H is believed to be True).

Agnostic "Header" =&gt; H: reject (unknown outcome), T: reject (because unknown outcome). 

Where does that leave us with respect to "Tailer"s?  The gnostic tailer will invert the header, but the agnostic tailer will look identical to the agnostic header.  So why even add the "x" to the "agnostic x" position?  They're the same thing. 

&gt;So you don't believe that the coin is heads. Does that automatically mean that you believe the coin came up as tails?
No, of course not. You don't believe it's tails either. You don't know one way or the other.

So we're actually on the same page here, the only difference is I think you just haven't seen what that means for the agnostic-x position (they're the same on both sides).  
&gt;I believe there are an even number but I don't know(claim) that there is.

So a claim is the same as knowledge, but a belief is a position that lacks that?  This sounds exactly like the agnostic distinction from before.  It's unclear what we gain by saying we believe vs. "claim" since we can't say we "know" much of anything. &gt; If you conclude that it is False that the number is even, then yes, you are concluding that it is True that the number is odd.

Concluding and rejecting the claim are not identical.  I can reject a claim because, in truth, I don't know at all whether it is True or False (in formal terms this would be a vacuously True statement). We can make pragmatic conclusions about the beans (ie., stand by the position that it is even, and therefore say we'd have to reject the claim that it is odd), but is perfectly acceptable to instead say: 

"Is the number of beans even?" 

"I don't know"

"So you believe it's odd?"

"I don't know"

"So do you accept that it's even?"

"No"

"Then you accept that it's *odd!*".

"No, I don't accept either, because, as I said before, I simply don't know". 

&gt;&gt;You said elsewhere:
&gt;Saying "GE" is False is the same as not being convinced it's True.

Yes, meaning one can have the position "I don't know" and therefore call GE "False" by virtue of it not being known (it's a vacuous truth).

Another example of vacuous truth is this: All the Snorlaxes in the universe are &gt; 200 lbs.  How do you valuate this statement?  In formal terms we *reject* it (label it False) because it's a vacuous statement (there are no Snorlaxes in the universe).  It doesn't mean we necessarily think there are actually *some* Snorlaxes &lt; 200 lbs. 

&gt;But ultimately, this is a distraction if "False" simply means "I don't know" to you.

"False" *can* mean "I don't know", but it doesn't necessarily.  As I said elsewhere, if it's easier to substitute True/False for accept/reject, the meaning is the same. 

&gt;If you say "I don't know" to the question of GE, then you lack belief\u2014therefore you aren't a third category, you are just an atheist.

But if you *also* say "I don't know" to NGE, then you also lack belief that god *doesn't* exist, that would seem to imply (by the same magnitude) that you are actually a theist.  But clearly an agnostic is neither, so it would make sense to have a third category solely for this group of people. 

&gt;I don't see how one can escape that and arrive at "agnostic" being a tenable, coherent third position that is completely divorced from atheism.

I wouldn't say this third category is really divorced from either.  Rather it abstains from partaking in the distinction.  So in one sense, it's both, in another, it's neither.  It's just like whether 0 is positive or negative: it's neither and both. 

&gt;It doesn't matter whether or not you are sure that NGE is True\u2014you are an atheist either way if you do not believe that GE is True.

That seems like an unbalanced overstep, considering that agnostics also reject the claim that god does *not* exist.  If we take it to *not* imply that they believe god must therefore exist, then neither can we invert the implication when they reject the claim that "god exists".  Perhaps it's definitionally inclusive, but the point of agnostics first coming up with the term was that they didn't want to be confused with taking an affirmative position either way. &gt; Yet people will stay say that they "know" there is/isn't a god. While others will say believe/lack belief that there is a god but they do not know if there is.

And I blame that on the confusing definitions of what it means to know/believe.  Personally, I subscribe to knowledge being a substantiated belief that *also* is True.  Under this regard, we can say that *nobody* knows about their theistic position, because we simply can't evaluate whether or not it is True.  As a result, all positions are positions of "belief", and therefore the agnostic qualifier is universal (and worthless). &gt; "What I am saying" is not that. I disagree with your fascination in thinking that the only differences between the 4 different positions can be summed up like that in the first place.

It's taken directly from the idea of what a belief is: a valuation on a set of particulars in accordance with reality.  That is, take a set of particulars, and your valuation on whether they represent reality is you *belief*.  There can only be 2 possible values: True or False, and there are two particulars we can consider (which are seemingly the inverse of one another, but do not *necessarily* inform us of the other).

&gt;You could just as easily say let BEA mean "breaths the Earth's atmosphere to survive".
Agnostic/gnostic theist/atheist: BEA=True
Therefore there's only 1 position.

But that's because the (a)theist distinction is not distinguished according to beliefs about atmosphere, they're distinguished precisely because they differ in evaluating claims about god.  

&gt;Obviously this is False, because the distinction lies elsewhere.

Yes so we agree.  The distinction at hand is about the existence of at least one god.  GE represents the particulars "God is in this universe that exists" and NGE represents the particulars "God is not in the universe of existent things". This gives us (hypothetically) two dimensions to valuate on, but as we see in application, the acceptance of one negates the other (necessarily).  

&gt;Could you provide any source to the idea that you're using the terms "precicely...as described"? I've literally never seen anybody ever use the terms the way you are.

I'm just using them exactly as redditors describe them throughout the threads concerning a "lack of a belief".  Take up any thread and you'll see they describe "lacking of a belief" in god does not (necessarily) imply that this equates to "god does not exist" and will use analogies like the number of jelly beans in a jar.  

Of course, what my point is is that this "lack of a belief" still devolves into either atheism or agnosticism, and that's it, so the term "agnostic atheist" is either redundant or worthless.&gt; There is a way of approaching it where a 4-pronged system makes sense,

How so?  My position has been that the 4-pronged system doesn't make sense precisely because the two "agnostics" are actually identical. 

&gt;You're saying we should lump the agnostic theists in with the agnostic atheists and call them all "agnostics."

I'm saying the term "agnostic theist" and "agnostic atheist" are either identical, or if not, make "gnostic (a)theist" a meaningless term. 

&gt;If we're going to collapse two groups into one, I think it should be both groups of theists who are grouped together, because "agnostic theist" kind of seems like an incoherent term (at least, in the context of the 3-pronged system).

Of all the proposals, I can get most on board with this one.  If we had just "Theist" "Agnostic Atheist" and "Atheist" I could see that being acceptable (and, in fact, a fine reflection of the 3-prong system), so long as it was understood that "Agnostic Atheist" also rejects the claim "god does not exist" (which would have to be the distinction, right?). 

&gt;My definition of "atheist" is anyone who does not accept the claims of theism. 

Fair enough, by your definition an agnostic would have to be included; but they themselves would (likely) be loathe to accept this label. Personally, I'm inclined to agree with you, if for no other reason than it seems that not knowing makes it a vacuous claim and therefore should be rejected altogether. 

&gt;On the other hand, many people say that theism/atheism refers to belief, whereas gnostic/agnostic refers to knowledge or claims of certainty. That's why the 4-pronged system exists.

Yes, but what they fail to realize is that we don't *know* much of anything.  So gnostic-x because worthless terms (excepting maybe some staunch theist absolutists).  I would say that under this system, we would still need to account for the agnostics who do not claim/believe/know either side, and as a result, it would be a 5-prong system, not 4. Or, 3, if we agree that "gnostic" is a worthless qualifier"&gt; Again, equating "False" with "I don't know" is a distraction, and irrelevant. You think they are equal; I don't.

I don't "think" that, they are, "I don't know" is the same as recognizing (P v ~P).  So if someone claims "P" you can reject it on the grounds that "~P" is also possible, and vice versa.

&gt;Moving forward, I will ignore your sense of False, and instead use "I don't know."

As long as it's in the context of positions related to (P v ~P) compared to one's position of (~P), that's fine. 

&gt;First, there is no metric of theistic-ness that you accrue by saying "I don't know" to NGE (if there is, how\u2014to what magnitude\u2014why?)

It's not a metric inasmuch as you used the exact same principle to say people who reject GE are atheists. By the exact same logic, we should say that people who reject NGE are theist, but that is contradictory to people who reject both NGE *and* GE. 

&gt;Second, even if it made sense that you accrued some level of assent to theism in that breath, you go on to say in the next sentence that "clearly agnostic is neither," 

It's neither for the reason that (assuming you *did* ascribe some sort of metric here), rejecting NGE would pull one just as far in to the theistic scope as rejecting GE would pull one *out* of it.  In other words, assuming (again, this is not what I was implying) a metric of "theisticness", t, then an agnostic (who rejects both NGE and GE) should be = t + -t, which is purely 0. Hence the conclusion that agnostic is neither "t" nor "-t". 

&gt;This appears to be a nonsense analogy that just begs the question of wanting agnosticism to be special.

Not at all, it's completely distinct from Theism (G) and Atheism (~G), because it states that both G and ~G are acceptably True (G v ~G).  Agnostics take a vacuous position on the entire matter. 

&gt;Sometimes you are trying to say its like 50-50 atheism and theism, but other times you allude to there being no value of either.

Again I point to my analogy of 0 being neither positive nor negative.  0 is a distinctly neutral and independent position.  You can describe it as *either* "both positive and negative" or "neither positive nor negative" but it is certainly not just one or the other. 

&gt;It really seems like you are just throwing things at the wall to see which sticks.

Not at all, the examples using GE and NGE are taken from the philosophical explanation that belief is a valuation on a set of particulars.  And using them in this manner is to demonstrate how an agnostic position precipitates out from a vacuous position (P v ~P). 

&gt;No. Atheism does not mean "I believe in zero gods," and you tacitly have admitted this with your first definition of atheism (that all atheism requires is to answer "I don't know" to GE).

That wasn't *my* definition of atheism, that was the one that I was using to demonstrate that it is, in some sense, arbitrary because we could have just as readily defined all theists to be anyone who rejects the claim "god does not exist" (even though that includes agnostics for entirely different reasons). 

&gt;It is, in fact, a consequence of your definitions of atheism and agnosticism.

If you'd like to envelope agnostics into an atheistic category by pure virtue of the fact that they reject the claim god exists (for entirely different reasons), you are fine to do so, but agnostics themselves will take issue with the oversimplification of their position.  In fact, that's how the philosophical term Agnostic first came into being\u2014as a means of distinguishing from atheists. 

&gt;BUT, all that said, if you really think "agnostic" is some other category of thing, you still have yet to describe why it is a tenable position in itself.

Let's replace "god exists" with a separate definition.  Suppose there's a jar of jellybeans.  We have "even-ists" who claim the number of beans is even and "odd-ists" who claim the number of beans is odd.  "Agnostics" are those who simply state "I don't know". 

According to the arbitrary inclusion of "anyone who rejects GE is atheist" we would say that agnostics are therefore atheists.  By the same metric, we can say that "oddists" are "anyone who rejects the E (even number of beans)".  

But this is clearly problematic, because couldn't we just as readily say that "evenists" are "anyone who rejects O (odd number of beans)"?  And isn't it the case that an agnostic to bean count would say "I don't know" to *either* proposition, and reject both O and E?  

It seems to me that the most reasonable position (especially if the jar is not transparent) is "I don't know" concerning the number of jellybeans.  It seems equally problematic for even-ists or odd-ists to claim that I'm in support of their position, when in fact I'd rather abstain from answering altogether (imagine there's some high stakes if one engages in the challenge to guess the number).  

&gt; the best agnosticism is at that point is a mere non-position\u2014like the position that a rock holds when asked whether it believes NGE.

That's exactly what agnosticism means: a non-position.  An "I don't know" to the entire question.  I wouldn't really lump "rocks" in with it, since rocks are incapable of holding positions, but suffice it to say that an agnostic would at least grant that the rock and the agnostic have the same amount of falsifiable information on which to make a judgment of the question at hand. 

&gt;If "agnostic" does not overlap with either atheism or theism, it has no content or argument or discussion whatsoever

Well sort of.  An agnostic can at least point out when a question pertaining to the bigger question isn't actually knowable, as in the case of people claiming a Russellian teapot sort of god.  But yes, when it comes to stronger position than this, they are out of the loop, which is probably why we don't see many agnostics in these threads. 

&gt;It's a shrug of the shoulder, not a position. How, again, is that tenable or coherent?

Same way we can shrug at the question of "is the number of beans odd or even in this jar?".&gt; I agree. I think all the talk of certainty is largely a response to theists misunderstanding the definition of "atheist."

I agree with your assessment.  But I think we ended up making a bigger mess than simply pointing out that "belief" and "knowledge" are not necessarily the same thing, and that an absence of evidence is sufficient grounds to reject a claim. 

&gt;Right, as long as it's also understood that someone's position could shift in relation to what kind of God it is we're talking about.

Sure.  After all, for pantheists who claim the cosmos is some sort of "nature god", we'd all be "theists".  But I think such definitions are cop-outs in the first place.  

&gt;If we're talking about a deistic god who is vague and undefined other than "creator of the universe" then I would be an agnostic atheist.

We would have to be, though I think Russell's teapot is a valuable thought experiment in such claims. 

&gt;If we refer to the belief in that kind of god as deism, then perhaps we should refer to the opposing belief as adeism, in which case atheism would have a more specific meaning, one dealing specifically with theistic claims.

I agree, but deism is satisfactorily theistic with respect to still claiming there was some being at the outset of creation.  Traditional deism also posits that this god is behind man's ability to reason, which I think you and I would both agree we are "atheistic" towards. 

This is a great point.  Even if capital punishment is somehow wrangled into a "benevolent" stance on things, how can a benevolent god willingly condone an inhumane form of capital punishment?  Especially stoning, what a terrible thing to do. 

Edit: Examples from the old testament of the Judeo-Christian bible: 

[1](http://biblehub.com/deuteronomy/22-21.htm) [2](http://biblehub.com/leviticus/24-16.htm) [3](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=Deuteronomy+17%3A2-7%2CDeuteronomy+29%3A18&amp;version=NASB) [4](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=Deuteronomy+21:18-21) [5](http://biblehub.com/leviticus/20-27.htm) [6](http://biblehub.com/leviticus/20-2.htm) [7](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=Numbers+15%3A32-41&amp;version=NIV) [8](http://biblehub.com/1_kings/21-10.htm).&gt; There's another group, aheadists, who fail to believe this coin toss came up heads.

&gt; Now you're telling us about a third group, agnoheadists, who claim that we cannot know whether the coin was heads or not.

What is the difference between agnoheadists and aheadists?  They both fail to believe the coin toss came up heads.  So do aheadists believe the coin came up tails, or do they fail to believe this as well?

&gt;so they're already members of the aheadist group.

Why couldn't they be part of the __atailist__ family, if we described __atailists__ as those who *fail to believe* the coin came up heads?  The only difference is that you could have reframed the question by *first* talking about atailists, and the agnoheadists would have been defacto *atailists*.  Your distinction is arbitrary.  

&gt;You do not need to be tailist in order to be aheadist.

But what about the requirements for being an atailist?  You don't need to be a headist to be an atailist either, right?  So agnoheadists are also agnotailists.&gt;I still think a distinction between atheism and adeism might be useful.

You're welcome to stand by that.  My bigger interest is in the (a)gnostic (a)theist distinctions. 

&gt;One of the biggest equivocations that theists are guilty of is convincing people that the cosmological arguments are valid, and therefor their own brand of theism is reasonable.

I agree. 

&gt;I think if we did a better job of emphasizing the distinction between theism and deism, they wouldn't be able to get away with that equivocation as easily.

That's a fair point.  I think in general there's a whole sphere of places we can address faulty arguments of theists that further distance the step from atheism to theism.  My personal preference is to aim at more deistic claims, as it tends to kill two birds with one stone. &gt; Since you keep mentioning it, what is "agnosticism" and why is it not atheism?

In very simple terms, it is the position "I don't know" to the question of "does god exists?"  This is not a unique position to this question alone, people can be "agnostic" about the number of beans in a jar, the absolute mass of the universe, who will win the 2016 presidential election.  

&gt;Does it involve a theistic belief?

It involves neither a theistic belief nor an atheistic belief.  Just as being agnostic about the number of beans in a jar entails neither an "odd" belief or an "even" belief. 

&gt;And if so, is that not agnostic theism? If not, then its atheism?

That's precisely why I think the terms (a)gnostic (a)theism are incoherent.  There's a position right there in the middle, wholly distinct from theism and atheism.  Terms like (a)gnostic (a)theism muddy the waters more than help things.&gt; I'm not going to debate your YEC, background and yes, the analogy totally applies to people who go to church. 

Good, because it isn't relevant to the truth of whether YEC is a scientifically supported position. 

&gt;Attendance, membership and pedigrees don't automatically make them christian. 

I agree. 

&gt;I think you're also confusing me with a YEC,

Your own stance was that the pre-fall (and fall) did occur and that the bible is (unless you meant otherwise) literally True.  Whether you're an OEC or a YEC is besides the point\u2014I'm only interested in the claim that there as a pre-fall era.

&gt;as far as science vs religion you realize in the end everyone, including scientists, have to choose what to believe.

I disagree with your definition of belief.  Beliefs are not choices.  I cannot choose to believe in Santa Claus, because we have photographs of the North Pole and evidence against his existence.  Even if I once did believe, the facts prevent me from believing still, regardless of whether or not I wanted to believe. 

&gt;You are just putting your faith in another institution who dwells you what to believe.

This is also unTrue. There is no institution in which I place my faith, only my own reasoning and what can be drawn from it. Science also isn't an institution, it's a methodology.  There are institutions that employ science to come to various fields of inquiry, but science itself is not some magical, arbitrary thing: it was derived from hundreds of years of philosophical thinking and coming to a conclusion on *what* can be known and *how*. 

&gt;Remember, as far as evidence goes, OJ was judged innocent, but the truth is he murdered two people.

That's not what the evidence said either. The jurors were instructed to *ignore evidence* because of a legal loophole.  The reason you and everyone else believes OJ was guilty is *because of the evidence*.  &gt;Each religion is talking about a specific coin toss, and saying that coin toss absolutely must have happened, and must have been heads.

Ok, that's not exactly what they say.  They say there's better reason to suspect heads than tails, but otherwise, it makes sense. The only other problem is that this analogy fails by virtue that accepting *one* coin toss as heads or tails would have to inform us of the tosses of the other coins.  In other words, in a theistic setting, people who accept an "Islam" tails for whatever reason will therefore call "heads" for all other coins.  This is not analogous in a series of coin tosses. 

&gt;So to be tailist about one coin toss is not to be tailist about every coin toss,

If someone takes a *tailist* position on at least on toss, we can say with certainty that they are tailist, and also *not* atailist. If they reject all *tail* claims, we cannot say whether they are both atailist and aheadist, or simply headist.  The same can be said of the inverse regarding "heads".

&gt;to be aheadest is to fail to find any credible headist claim.

Sure, just as one can be atailist for all tailist claims.  It isn't yet clear to me what this aims to prove.  If someone is atailist for all tail claims, that doesn't suddenly make them headist, it makes them *either* headist or *also* aheadist.  An atheist would be someone who claims that any and all "tails" are unlikely.  An agnostic would be someone who claims that "heads" or "tails" are equally likely for all, and that there's no way to conclude whether any coin is heads or tails before seeing it. 

&gt;I don't claim to know that no gods exist, but I do know that all the arguments for gods I've looked at are completely unconvincing.

So we can say you're definitely atailist.  But what this doesn't tell us is whether you're also a headist or an aheadist.  In other words, you could be an "atheist" or an "agnostic".  The simple statement that you lack beliefs in any claims about gods (tails) doesn't inform us on what you *do* think about no gods existing (heads). 

&gt;Maybe one day I'll find some evidence of a God, so I suppose that open-mindedness means I'm agnostic

The open-mindedness just means you aren't 100% convinced, which is True of just about everybody.  Agnostic (traditionally) means a little more than open-mindedness. 

&gt;but until I do see such evidence I fail to believe in any god and that lack of belief leaves me atheist, just like every other agnostic.


I'm not sure how you got to here. As I pointed out, you can define things in terms of atailism, but they equally apply to aheadism unless a headist position has been taken.  Therefore, an agnostic is both an atheist and an a-atheist.  You haven't really shown why agnostic should be labeled as "atheist" and not just something entirely separate from either. &gt; "I don't know" is atheism. If it doesn't involve a theistic belief, its atheism.

You're just repeating your statement, not demonstrating how this is so.  As I've already said, would you answer "I don't know" to "any god doesn't exist" or "probably not/probably not"?  If you answer the former, you're an agnostic (by virtue of not *rejecting the claim* "god does not exist"), if you answer the latter, you're an atheist.

You seem eager to include a group that is very much inclined to remain distinct from your definition, and you haven't made it clear why the inverse couldn't be said of that group (Anyone who rejects "god does not exist" is a theist, therefore agnostics are theists). 

&gt;Agnostic atheism isn't distinct from atheism, its just narrowing down inside the bracket.

I maintain that you have failed to show how how agnostic is necessarily a subset of atheism and *not* by the same application a subset of theism.

&gt;It might muddy the waters in the sense that it's much more simple to say you're an atheist, but if you're getting into specifics, that's exactly the point of additional descriptors.

It's simpler to say theist, atheist, or agnostic. The three positions are clearly distinct and clearly recognizable.  One says "I have reason to suspect god exists", one says "I have no reason to suspect any god exists, and therefore conclude that it is unlikely any does", and the third says "I have no way of forming a position one way or the other, so I reject *both* sides". 

&gt;Agnostic then is simply a specific type of atheist, not a third category.

No, agnostic does not take a position in *either* state of belief.  You're framing it according to the affirmation of a particular statement, but the same can be said of the converse: 

Theist: one who does not believe in the non-existence of a god

Atheist: one who believes the non-existence of all gods.

By this logic, Agnostic is therefore a Theist.  Just because you frame it a particular way doesn't mean it readily applies.  

You could read about the distinction [here](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/atheism-agnosticism/#3).&gt; I tell you what then, since you're about 5 steps behind a discussion on the subject

Considering I've studied the origins of agnosticism for some time, I doubt it.  You could always read up on it yourself [here](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/atheism-agnosticism/#3). 

&gt;If you do not believe in a God you're an atheist.

And an agnostic doesn't know either way, so doesn't claim to not believe in a god.  

&gt;There's an awful lot of people who reject lables that apply directly to them.

Sure, but this is a meaningful distinction. 

&gt;How many alcoholics or other addicts do you know that freely admit to being so?

How is this at all relevant?  It has nothing to do with the distinction at hand.  Just because some people disagree with or prefer labels in some circumstances has nothing to do with the relevant distinction at hand. 

&gt;Agnostic atheism is atheism with the added caveat that you also believe that, at least currently, it's not possible to know for certain.

But *everybody* thinks this way.  What do we really claim to know for *certain*?  Basically nothing.  It's a redundant qualifier.

&gt;You might as well say atheist, theist or tall.

For someone who says I'm 5 steps behind in the conversation, this fails to reflect an understanding of the position an "agnostic" claims to make. 

&gt;It sounda distinctly like the third person in your example would also say "I have no reason to suspect any god exists". 

They would say the same to *both* propositions.  That's the entire point. 

Do I need to run the jellybean in a jar example again? 

Guy has a jar of jellybeans and claims: "the number of beans is even".

Atheist (oddist): "I have no reason to believe you"

Theist (evenist): "I believe you"

Agnostic: "I have no reason to believe you" 

Then owner says: "the number of beans in the jar is odd" 

Atheist (evenist): "I believe you" 

Theist (oddist): "I don't believe you" 

Agnostic: "I have no reason to believe you"

Just because you compartmentalize one way of framing the problem doesn't mean you can collectively interpret that position in it's entirety.  The distinction of agnosticism from atheism is precisely the picture *in the whole* just as it is between agnosticism and theism. 



Which is the same as Gnostic Theists.  So how is that term at all meaningful? &gt;Well sure, if you want to create meaningless word soup, you can do just that.

Except it's not meaningless word soup.  If you want to distinguish "lack from belief of x" from "believes x is False" then it must be applicable equally.  "Lacking belief in x" means rejecting x without accepting ~x, so clearly "lacking belief in ~x" is just as tenable.  

&gt;Still, that's not a serious definition of Theist, and it doesn't lead to a reasonable description of atheism.

Sounds like you have a problem using "lack of belief" as the all-encompassing standard. 

&gt;Some atheists affirm that there are no gods, but that is not a requirement for atheism.

Of course not, but that still doesn't mean that agnostics are required to be included here.  The definition of atheism still means taking *some form of a position* that gods do no exist.  An agnostic, by definition, does not subscribe to this claim whatsoever.  Instead of "I lack belief that x", they'd say "I don't know, so I don't have a value assessment." 

&gt; Mostly because one is talking about a position on belief and another about knowledge.

Knowledge is arguably a *subset* of beliefs.  Namely a belief that is well-substantiated and in accordance with reality.  

If the only distinction between gnostic x and agnostic x is the degree in which one is certain, then I'd ask you clarify what degree of certainty one must have to be labelled "gnostic".  After all, it seems pretty clear to me that "knowledge" about the existence of a god is unattainable, which means everyone would fall under the "agnostic" category\u2014making the word redundant. &gt; The agnostic in your jelly bean example is still an atheist. 

It's unclear to me why not believing in oddness means they're now classified as "evenists" but somehow the contraposition is impossible.  You keep telling me that it's sufficient to define atheist as "lacking belief in god" but not sufficient to do the same for theism and "godlessness".  Until I get a justification for this definitional difference, it seems unclear why anyone should accept it. 

&gt;How can somebody simultaneously not believe in god, but also not-not believe in god?

Same way someone can simultaneously not believe a jar has even beans or odd beans.  Why is this equivalence so difficult to get?  You keep saying that atheists are defined differently, but (again) you haven't given any good reason why.  

If they are different, then what does it mean exactly to say you "lack a belief that x is True" but do not commit to ~x? 

&gt;I mention people rejecting all sorts of labels because you claims people rejecting the atheist label somehow meant that they weren't atheists.

Because, by definition, they aren't.  Evenists, oddists, "I don't know" ists.  This isn't unique to the theism question. 

&gt;Perfectly acceptable, and non-contradictory atheist position: "I don't believe either of you"

That's literally the definition of an agnostic.  Really.  Did you read the article I linked to you from SEP?&gt; The thing is, you are continuing to ascribe a numerical value/metric to all this

Nope, just a factual assessment of the particulars.  That's what a belief is: a valuation on a claim. 

&gt;one you are just making up to suit your argument.

I'm not.  The SEP has a very clear distinction between Agnostic and Atheist. There's a whole page dedicated to it. 

&gt;It just isn't the case that atheists are assuredly tantamount to -1.

Feel free to not define it this way. 

&gt;It's just as easy to say atheism is zero, and theism is one.

Except what does it mean to be negative now?  It sounds as if you're instead saying atheists are all numbers less than or *equal* to 0, but it's not clear why 0 is acceptable for atheism but not theism.  It's an arbitrary line you've drawn in the sand, whereas the 0s themselves will say readily they are not on either side of this thing. 

&gt;With theism, you have something, but with atheism you have nothing.

And with agnosticism, you have an unknown.  It's a different ballgame entirely. 

&gt;I'm not necessarily arguing that's the case, I'm just pointing to how your arbitrarily founded premises make your position seem plausible, even without merit.

But it isn't an arbitrary distinction, and the premises comes from some very basic logical truths.  Vacuous statements are logical facts, and prevent us from deciding on one side or the other.  An agnostic claims that all positions about theism are vacuous.

&gt;First and foremost, you are again conflating disbelief in a proposition with belief that the opposite proposition is True

No I'm doing the opposite.  I'm saying that just because someone doesn't believe "the number is even" doesn't mean they therefore accept "the number is odd."  On the contrary, they could reject *both* arguments. 

&gt;But in order to be an atheist, one does not need to assent to the belief that NGE.

But you see how this puts you squarely into the definition of what an agnostic is, right?  If you reject both NGE and GE, then that's the definition of an agnostic: someone who maintains the question is vacuous.

&gt;But an ancillary contradiction is that theism is a proposition of whether a thing exists, whereas odd/even is a binary question of the quality of real integers

Yes, but they are both questions about a *fact* of something: "is it the case that x?"

&gt;One either assents to the belief, or they don't. 

Or they say "I don't know" because it's considered completely unfalsifiable.

&gt;You add a "god" to your picture of the world, or you don't.

Now in this regard, I would have to put it to the agnostic as to how they respond to their position.  It seems to me that considering the statement is vacuous, the agnostic is bound to consider the question irrelevant and therefore remove god from the world picture (but always consider it).  In this aspect at least, I am inclined to say that an agnostic may most reasonably *function* as an atheist.  But this is different than saying they epistemologically *believe* the same thing an atheist does. 

&gt;And again, you are creating this confusion by positing that atheism is tantamount to a value that is opposite, exactly and proportionally, to theism.

Definitionally (w.r.t. agnostics) it is.  It's some form of affirmative position (either in the form of *accepting* that god exists or *accepting* that god does not exist). If you do neither, then you clearly have no valuation whatsoever.  So if I ask you, "do you believe god does not exist?"  What is your answer?  An agnostic would say, "I don't know".  I think any honest atheist would say, "yes," as I do now. 

&gt;is non-overlapping with atheism, where it has no value to do so except wanting to call oneself something different, special, and plausibly above the conversation.

Seems a little ad hominemy, I'd say that agnostics aim to make it clear they find the question impossible to answer, whereas an (a)theist believes some conclusion can be drawn.  In that sense they would be "above" the question, but there's nothing special or different about it: it's just a different perspective based on the questions raised. Does it mean that Jesus really condemned *stoning* or passing arbitrary judgment?  For an all-knowing god, the message here is pretty obfuscated.&gt; If you don't think so, then there is no baseline by which to argue whether or not death is an appropriate punishment for adultery.

But stoning is all sorts of unnecessarily fucked up.  Even if I grant you that capital punishment is justified (I don't, but for arguments sake), there's a hell of a lot more humane ways to kill a person.  Why did god command *stoning* people to death? &gt;what about men?

Does it matter?  And why stoning specifically?  Why not, say, a swift beheading?  Why didn't god share with its followers more humane ways to end a life?Except it doesn't, Jesus just condemned an ad hoc trial of a woman.  It's not at all clear that he opposed stoning specifically, just in that instance (for unclear reasons).  And that's assuming that this passage was actually an historical account; some claim it was not in the earliest manuscripts. 

And there's at least 8 passages from the OT that explicitly say *to do so*, why did God ever command stoning at all?  Seems pretty inhumane.

&gt; That interpretation can't be justified from a simple reading of the passage. It seems like you're projecting a meta-analysis of the text onto the plain reading.

The point is *either* interpretation needs further justification, and it's not clear why in this case a simple reading isn't permitted, whereas elsewhere in the bible it is. 

&gt;Not at all. They speak the Law of Moses to him and ask his opinion on it.

Yes, and his answer is vaguely responsive to *judgment* (he who has not sinned cast the first stone).  It's not at all clear that Jesus disagrees with OT commandments in general or just the way this scenario was brought forth.  It was never made clear whether or not the woman is guilty, so it's not really as simple as determining a motive for Jesus's response.

But that's all besides the point because my bigger issue was that *God himself* commanded the stoning in the first place (in the OT).  That's a pretty inhumane way to demand capital punishment. I don't study the Qur'an very closely, but there seems to be a whole bunch of stoning in the Hadith, like [here](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rajm#In_the_Hadith)&gt;So at least we aren't dealing with a matter of solipsism.

Naturally.

&gt;A person can be really certain even with beliefs that are not well supported.

So (a)gnosticism isn't just about degree of certainty of a belief?  Then what is the distinction? 

&gt;Certainly some kind's of god would fit. Knowledge of an all powerful god that is trying to hide of course would be impossible to ever have.

Well yeah, but even here we can apply thought experiments like Russell's Teapot to conclude that it's at least more likely than not that such a god exists.  

&gt;A god like Zeus would be far easier to get knowledge of were such a deity around and interacting.

But the question of "atheism" vs. "agnosticism" isn't about particular gods in particular places.  Otherwise we start looking ridiculous because *everyone* is an "atheist" about a certain god (e.g. Christians are "atheistic" to Mohammad).  The question is about the ground truth: does *at least one* god exist?  And the agnostic will say "That answer is completely unknowable."  An "atheist" (me) would say: "Probably not."

&gt;What would qualify as well justified of course is always tricky but god being such a wide term needs that breadth of scope.

Sure, but if we restrict the definition of "god" to something creator/supernatural, there's no longer need to differentiate so granularly.  

&gt;Besides not everyone agrees with you on the issue of if knowledge of god is possible which is why agnosticism as a whole contains the idea that knowledge of god is impossible

Yes... that's the whole point. &gt;So at least we aren't dealing with a matter of solipsism.

Naturally.

&gt;A person can be really certain even with beliefs that are not well supported.

So (a)gnosticism isn't just about degree of certainty of a belief?  Then what is the distinction? 

&gt;Certainly some kind's of god would fit. Knowledge of an all powerful god that is trying to hide of course would be impossible to ever have.

Well yeah, but even here we can apply thought experiments like Russell's Teapot to conclude that it's at least more likely than not that such a god exists.  

&gt;A god like Zeus would be far easier to get knowledge of were such a deity around and interacting.

But the question of "atheism" vs. "agnosticism" isn't about particular gods in particular places.  Otherwise we start looking ridiculous because *everyone* is an "atheist" about a certain god (e.g. Christians are "atheistic" to Mohammad).  The question is about the ground truth: does *at least one* god exist?  And the agnostic will say "That answer is completely unknowable."  An "atheist" (me) would say: "Probably not."

&gt;What would qualify as well justified of course is always tricky but god being such a wide term needs that breadth of scope.

Sure, but if we restrict the definition of "god" to something creator/supernatural, there's no longer need to differentiate so granularly.  

&gt;Besides not everyone agrees with you on the issue of if knowledge of god is possible which is why agnosticism as a whole contains the idea that knowledge of god is impossible

Yes... that's the whole point. &gt; It is modestly analogous because atheism is a mere lack of belief. 

Again, this is simply you stating something, not an actually justifiable *reason* as to why this is the case, as opposed to the theist's "a lack of a belief in god's nonexistence" (which would include agnosticism).

&gt;It isn't a belief that there are zero gods.

So if I asked you, "are there *no* gods?" what would you say?  I, an atheist, would say "probably."  An agnostic would say "I don't know."   What's your valuation on the question? 

&gt;But again, I'm not arguing that any position is tantamount to some magnitudinous value; you are.

Because you're failing to see that you're applying a double standard in the case of "lack of a belief".  Look, we can observe this in two ways.  Given P, we can say a "lack of belief" simply means that we reject P (but do not accept ~P), which seems to be the way you'd like to use it.  *Or*, we can say that "lack of belief" implies believing the opposite, in which case rejecting P *therefore implies* ~P.  

Ok, so we go with the first definition.  But if, by this reasoning, rejecting a proposition P does not imply ~P, then *equally* (by the same justification), rejecting ~P does not imply P.  You keep repeating over and over that "atheist" = "lack of belief in P", but it isn't clear to me why "theism" != "lack of belief in ~P".  You seem to have arbitrarily drawn a line in the sand, and I'm asking for your justification as to why. 

*Why* is an atheist "lacks belief in P" but a theist *not* "lacks belief in ~P"?  

&gt;It is absurd to draw the analogy that 1 + -1 = agnosticism, or any other formula you want to strap to these labels.

Again, this is not some magical formula, it's a byproduct of vacuous statements being rejected for *different reasons* than accepting the contraposition (ie., ~P does not imply P).

&gt;You are saying that atheists do side on even or odd because they reject one or the other, 

I'm pointing out that this idea of an "agnostic atheist" is incoherent, by virtue that the *same person* who rejects "even" because it is unknown will reject "odd" because it is unknown.  It's therefore incomplete to label them as simply "people who reject evens."  

&gt;Yep, but not at the exclusion of being an atheist.

See my request for justification of this one-sided inclusion above. 

&gt;I am agnostic, but I am also an atheist because there are no gods that I happen to believe in.

You're failing to see the whole picture of an agnostic then, because the "belief that there are no gods I happen to believe in" is *incorrect.*  The agnostic says "I don't know how many gods there are, at all.  There could be 20."  Do you believe there could be 20 gods, or more likely that there are none?

&gt;(I happen to believe that the Christian god cannot exist, but I don't know about other gods one might imagine.)

That's not the definition of an atheist then.  An atheist's position is that there are likely *no gods in existence*.  Otherwise we get into silly definitions where *everybody* is an atheist, because they reject claims about at least *some* god. 

&gt;Most atheists will not say that they "know" there are zero gods.

That's why my question was "do you *believe*?" not "do you know?". 

&gt; Most will say "I don't know."

No, the definition of an atheist is "lack of belief" in *all* gods.  Therefore, if I ask "do you __believe__ (not know) god does not exist?" I should expect a consistent response.  

&gt; This is exactly the sort of misconception that I thought you were consciously avoiding by posing your initial definition as negative questions, but apparently you have fallen for the misconception yourself.

No, you seem to simply misunderstand the difference between "know" and "believe".

&gt;How you framed your question is exactly why atheism and agnosticism overlap.

Nope, it's exactly why they *don't* overlap.  Because asking "do you believe god does *not* exist?" is asking whether you lack belief in *all* gods, and an agnostic will say "no" whereas an atheist will necessarily say "yes". 

&gt;Is there a god? \u2014&gt; I don't know. Agnostic.
Do you believe in god? \u2014&gt; No. Atheist.

Would you kindly clarify what the actual difference is between "is there a god" and "do you believe in god?"  Also, as I pointed out above, this use of "lack of belief" muddies the waters, because you also need to answer the question "do you lack belief in the *nonexistence* of gods?" 

&gt;But in individuals, many, many people will answer these questions exactly as I have outlined above, meaning that agnosticism and atheism overlap.

Actually, it depends on what you mean by "believe in god".  If it means "believe god exists?" then the agnostic will still respond with "I don't know" while the atheist says "no".

&gt;As a consequence of not knowing if gods exist, you lack the belief that the theist has, and therefore an agnostic is also an atheist (in this example).

Again, it's unclear to me why an atheist is "lacks belief in P" but theist is not "lacks belief in ~P".  There seems to be a pretty clear double-standard happening that I don't think you're seeing. &gt; They're considered an a-oddist, only we don't have a term for that because believing there is an odd number of sweets in a jar is not affecting anybodies lives on any large scale.

Ok, so under this reasoning, there's *also* a-evenists, right?  People who lack belief in evens?  In that case, an agnostic is *both* an a-evenist and a-oddist, so it's unclear why you think you can classify agnostics as "a-oddist". 

&gt;I don't think I keep telling you that because I don't even know what that means.

Which part?  Lacking a belief seems to be rejecting the proposition without accepting the converse, yes?  Then logically there's no difference between rejecting P not implying ~P as there is rejecting ~P not implying P.  If lacking belief simply means "I do not hold that position to be True", then by definition, an agnostic lacks both the belief that god exists and that god does not exist.  You failing to understand what your own definition implies isn't really my problem, but I'm trying to make it clear that you haven't thought this all the way through. 

&gt;You're obsessed with this flawed analogy aren't you?

You haven't demonstrated why it's flawed.  At all. 

&gt;You don't run marathons? You're not a marathon runner.

Yes, but it's impossible not to both run and not run a marathon at the same time.  It's not impossible to hold two competing ideas as equally likely to be True at the same time.  If anything, it seems like your analogy is flawed.

&gt;a person who disbelieves or lacks belief in the existence of God or gods.

Agnostic: 
&gt;&gt;[a person who believes that nothing is known or can be known of the existence or nature of God or of anything beyond material phenomena; *a person who claims neither faith __nor disbelief__ in God.*](https://www.google.com/search?q=define:agnostic)

See the distinction?  Agnostics don't *disbelieve*, they reject *both* belief and disbelief. 

&gt;"There's an odd number of sweets in the jar, I just know it"

&gt;"There might be, but you don't know that, you're just guessing. You've got no reason to think there is".

First of all, irrelevant, because agnostics don't *just* refute claims of knowledge.  They also refute claims of *belief.* 

So, let's represent that case here: 

&gt;"I believe there's an odd number of sweets in the jar"
"There might be, but there's no way to tell at all, you've got no reason to believe so".

Now, *if* even = "belief in god" then both the atheist and agnostic will have the same response.  __But__ that's an incomplete picture, because it could just as well be that even = "disbelief in god", in which case the *theist* and *agnostic* will have similar responses. 

The point is, you're not looking at the *reasoning* behind the responses.  You're just looking at a sample of responses and declaring the two groups equal.  Once you get the full picture, it's pretty clear that agnostic and atheist don't fit the same mold at all. 

&gt;That wouldn't stop it being an atheist position.

It literally would.  See the definition I provided above.  Or see [this](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Agnosticism): 

&gt;&gt;"an agnostic is someone who neither believes nor disbelieves in the existence of God, while a theist believes that God exists, an atheist disbelieves in God".

And before you start saying that this misrepresents the case because "disbelief is an affirmative claim, which I do not make", [here's] the definition of *disbelief*: 

&gt;__inability__ or refusal to accept that something is True or real.

In other words disbelief and "lack of belief" are synonymous.  

&gt;Nope. No need.

It seems pretty clear there is a need...&gt; There's a lot of weird stuff in the hadiths and a lot of them only have a single chain of narration.

Are you calling your holy book "weird"?  That's an odd way to justify it's authenticity. 

&gt;Considering that hadiths were collected over 200 years after the prophet Mohammed

So you're saying some of that book is entirely wrong? 

&gt;I don't see any reason to consider single narration hadiths reliable or authentic.

Fair enough, I'd recommend cutting out all the text that is inconsistent or completely inaccurate, since it seems so obvious that they aren't True. It gives a bad representation of your faith, and then you have to tell people like me that your text is untrustworthy. &gt;A simple reading tells us that as sinners, we cannot cast the first stone.

No, a simple reading tells us that *those present* could not cast the first stone *at her*.  The oneness is on you to justify why you think Jesus was talking about all people in all places casting stones. 

&gt;stoning has never been a point of contention in Christianity 

Tradition has nothing to do with the textual instructions.  Interracial marriage and female leadership/equality *was* a point of contention in Christianity, are you saying they were justified in this interpretation?  Especially since simple readings informed these beliefs?  

&gt;Furthermore, it's notable that he is without sin, and yet refuses to throw the stone at the woman.

Yes, at *Mary*.  But he (if you believe Revelations) also claims to come back in blood stained robes and strike down all believers with a sword and his feet. It isn't clear that his point in *this* story was therefore universal. 

&gt;Yes it is. She was guilty. "Go, and sin no more."

Yeah... you just pointed out that only Jesus was without any sin, so "go and sin no more" could be equally applicable to his encouragement for her general redemption, and not necessarily a crime of adultery. Theologians have argued on both sides that she may or may not have been actually guilty (how else was there a "trap" by the Pharisees?). 

&gt;Jesus' ministry was to correct problems with how the Law was carried out, and to move it from Legalism principles to one with humanist values.

This changes nothing about the fact that *god* commanded the stoning of people prior to.  It wasn't that the Hebrews just happened to stone people as their choice of capital punishment and Jesus hoped to change that; the Hebrews were *commanded* to stone adulterers (and more).  Assuming Jesus as god, he would be literally contradicting his *own* commandments. 

As I mentioned before, this isn't even about capital punishment per se, as much as it's about the blatant commands to perform said punishment in an obviously inhumane and violent way.&gt;No, the hadiths are not in the holy book.

But they are supposed to reflect what your prophet has said/commanded, no?

&gt;I wouldn't go as far as to say that some of the book "is entirely wrong" but I just don't see any reason some of the hadiths are entirely reliable if they don't have multiple chains of narration.

Then why keep them in an allow for less informed Muslims to misunderstand them?  After all, stoning to death is still a practice in many Islamic countries around the world. It would be easier if they never knew about those passages at all. 

&gt;It depends on the hadith.

But for things like *stoning*, it sounds like it's pretty clear, no?  Yeah isn't there something called the "privatization of evil" which Aquinas and his ilk seem to argue in response?  I've never seen an adequate justification of this position so unless I'm mistaken, that's the last nail in the coffin.&gt; since some of them are fabricated.

So it's not clear to me why there isn't an ongoing campaign to redact these from the Hadith, if they're clearly fabricated.

&gt;The reason the hadith collectors collected all the hadiths was because they weren't sure which hadiths were authentic and which were fabricated. 

So are you saying you aren't *certain* that maybe some of the stoning Hadiths are actually True?  It seems to me you're in a pickle: either all the stoning hadiths are known to be False, in which case it's obvious you should remove them, or some of them are possibly True, which is far more disconcerting. 

&gt;It's better to collect everything and then find out later which hadiths are authentic and which hadiths are fabricated than to only collect some of the hadiths (of which a certain percentage are probably fabricated) and to miss authenticated hadiths.

Sure, but once you've determined which ones *are* fabricated, you should remove them, right?  Why spread misinformation when it's known to be False?  I'm talking only of the stoning passages right now, which before you said were clearly not of Mohammad. 

&gt;That's not how it works... The clarity of the hadith has nothing to with its authenticity.

Then you've missed my point entirely.  Either a) some of the hadiths about stoning *might* be True: in which case you can't say they aren't, and that it's possible your god has commanded the stoning of adulterers or b) they're all known to be False, in which case you can remove them.  

How that's determined is unimportant to me. &gt;So he would get 3 points for naming his source (Jesus)

*Convincingly* naming sources. You're going to have to make a case for how naming a "vision" is at all convincing. 

So it sounds more like... 3 points.I'll bite.

Obviously unTrue: any and all theistic arguments and claims. Examples: Cosmological and Ontological arguments, any (other) arguments from Classical theism.  From there it's also clear the historical interpretation of the bible because largely dubious.

As an alternative?  Not really an alternative as much as a necessary consequence.  Once it's abundantly clear that all arguments *for* a god are unsound, one is left pondering how this is any different than claims about magical fairies or invisible, intangible unicorns.  Given that there's no evidence to believe these things, and that issues like the PoE put further distance between me and any meaningful god, atheism is a logical byproduct. &gt;Prime mover, fine tuning, etc.

All of them unsound.

&gt;Presumably if you are an atheist, you have a reason you don't find these kinds of arguments compelling? So you must be atheist in a difference sense than when you were born,

Yessir.  Russell's teapot and the Problem of Evil are my (general) answers. 

&gt;because you have been presented with arguments for theism that you've had to explicitly reject

I reject them on their lack of any [sound](http://www.iep.utm.edu/val-snd/) argumentation.In this case the distinction is irrelevant.  If you say "I saw him in my head!" I'm not going to find that very convincing.  If you instead say "this person is purported to be god!" that doesn't make the source convincing either. What you have is a vision of a possibly existing person (and the verdict is still out on that one) who then allegedly is *providing you with more information*.  

What about that is convincing? 

If I told you that I had a dead president talking to me in my head, would you believe me or find that source convincing? &gt;Hadiths are never redacted, even if they're known to be 100% fabricated. If hadiths are redacted, then that will provide atheists, Christians, etc a very easy method to attack the historicity of Islam.

But this makes more problems for you, not fewer.  If you told me that there are certain passages known to be False but are still propagated, how am I supposed to believe which ones are True?  Why spread misinformation that can harm others?  After all, Saudi Arabia still condones stoning of adulterers.  

Also, your statement about making it harder is simply unTrue.  When it was later revealed that the earliest books of Mark did not include the final chapters concerning Jesus's resurrection, they added in the bible that this was the case.  While they still do many hurdles to avoid addressing other historical conflicts, it at least makes them more, not less, respectable for admitting when something should probably be redacted. 

&gt;Hold up a second, I never said they were clearly fabricated. Please don't exaggerate my position.

This makes the problem worse, not better.  If it's unclear whether they're fabricated, it means parsing the truth from fabrication is all the harder and more unreliable. 

&gt;Yes, it's possible some of those stoning hadiths are True.

Which brings us to the challenge raised by the OP.  How can we justify god's command to stone people to death: a form of capital punishment so violent and barbaric it can be likened to torture? 

&gt;Part A is True.

So now that we've established what you asked from the beginning, you can address the challenge raised by the OP.And you're missing mine.  The 3 point criteria was the following: 

&gt;Give yourself up to 3 points for __convincingly naming sources.__

Saying "there's a voice in my head" is not convincingly naming a source\u2014it's unfalsifiable at best.&gt; He wasn't talking specifically to them, but rather said, "Let those without sin cast the first stone."

And then the *people* nearby walked away.  Where are you getting this idea that he was talking to the ether and not the people right in front of him? 

&gt;Nice general principle that Christians haven't ever had trouble understanding.

Because it's conceivably about passing judgment, not stoning specifically.  After all, they had no moral quandaries about burning people at the stake, wouldn't a reasonable person realize that this stoning is on par with stake burning if it was clear god opposed torturous deaths? 

&gt;I'm talking about the plain reading of the text, which the pericope of John is rather unusual in that nobody has ever disagreed on the point in question

But your simple reading is not the simplest.  It requires anticipating that there's a greater meaning or message to be taken from the story, and you would need to justify why that's more accurate than the simplest of readings (Jesus said don't stone *this* lady).

&gt;Nowhere is it mentioned or implied it is Mary Magdalene.

Ah, funny how my old church upbringing propagated that misconception.  You're right.  Anyway, to the point.  The story in it's simplest reading tells a story about a guy telling people to only throw stones at an *accused* adulterer if they've never sinned. 

&gt;You're torturing words here, and ignoring that she wasn't accused of adultery, but rather "had been caught in adultery".

Fair point. But sadly not relevant to the bigger problem.

&gt;He didn't contradict anything, which is what was so clever about the approach he took.

You believe Jesus and the god of the OT are the same, yes? The god of the OT commanded stoning, and Jesus is now saying not to (according to you).  That's a plain contradiction of a previous command.  Unless you're trying to say he's *redacting* that previous command, which now leaves you to address the glaring problem that he *still commanded people to stone people to death*.  I notice you're giving the least attention to the biggest problem about this. 

&gt;Not for Christians, remember?

So the god of the old testament isn't the christian god?  That's a new take I've never heard before.  I don't care if the command is *different* now, the point is, __at one point in time, the allegedly benevolent god you worship commanded the stoning of adulterous women.__  Do you dispute the bolded text?  That's where the issue is, not whether he changed his mind later. 

  &gt;What do you mean by misinformation? There is no misinformation being spread.

You said even if a hadith was 100% known to be False, it would not be redacted.  That's the very definition of spreading misinformation. 

&gt;So now you understand that Muslims have always categorized hadiths based on authenticity?

Yes, that's very interesting. I appreciate you taking the time to educate me :). 

So you're saying the ones about stoning are *weak* or dubious in nature? 

&gt;True, this is why we have the Quran and why you should always take hadiths with a grain of salt

Makes sense.

&gt;Your question assumes that God commanded Muslims to stone people to death. Do you have any proof of this?

Well my assumption was that there was reason to believe at least one hadith was True.  According to you (unless I'm wrong) these hadiths are not respectable?  In which case I guess I don't have any proof.

So am I unreasonable to assume that you therefore oppose the stoning of others?  &gt; But he named a source.  Right? If you're convinced that he named a source, then he convincingly named a source.

Boy, talk about pedantry. In any case, citing "voices in my head" is not a historically respectable form of "naming a source" so, no, he didn't name a source.  At least not rigorously and with great care.  Tell you what, out of the kindness of my heart, the fact that he named *something* other than *nothing at all* as the source, I'll give you 1 point.

That makes.... 4 points.  Yikes, still an F.&gt; Is it sound? Is it valid?

Whoa whoa whoa whoa whooooaaaa there.... hold up.  Are you saying you demand *sound* evidence for your beliefs now?  [Last time we spoke](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateAChristian/comments/3qoue6/christianity_and_its_shortcomings/cwi2ra4?context=3), you seemed to not understand how sound evidence worked, so hopefully that's been cleared up for you.  

In any case, what sound evidence do you have that convinces you of your belief? I think it only fair as someone who ostensibly shares the same standard of evidence for belief that you share with us what convinced you, seeing as it *should* convince me too, right? &gt;A fabricated hadith will never be censored. It will be considered fabricated but it won't be removed or edited.

Reading what you said later on, I should have just edited that comment bit out.  It's clearer what you mean now. 

&gt;One thing I should point out though is that as a Muslim, you have to completely accept the Quran and the mutawatir hadiths. Muslims believe the Quran is the direct word of God so if it was found out that a verse of the Quran was fabricated, then that would pose a very serious issue to Islam.

Also makes sense.  

&gt;One advantage Christians have is that even if verses of their Bible are False/fabricated, they can continue to be Christian and just say that their Bible is from "divinely inspired" humans and not God.

Yeah that's posed lots of problems when it comes to trying to argue with them reasonably... 

&gt;I think a lot of Muslims today accept that all the hadiths in Sahih al-Bukhari are authentic but this wasn't always the case.

Naturally.  There's christian hillbillies who still celebrate the Confederacy and believe the earth is 6000 years old, so I wouldn't think everyone of any other faith was homogeneously unanimous either. Hell, there's flat earth-ist atheists too. 

&gt;One other thing I should mention: Islamic scholarship has basically been paused for the last 100 years. So any opinions you get from Muslims today are literally 100+ year old opinions.

Wow, that's interesting.  Do you consider that a problem?  Are there any scholars trying to bring back scholarship on the matter? 

&gt;Yes, I do oppose the stonings of others.

Good to know.  I've learned a lot today.

&gt;Basically, what I'm saying is that you shouldn't use unreliable or uncertain hadiths for serious legal rulings (sharia).

Seems very reasonable.Yeah I'm taken a little aback by how vibrant everything, it puts a weird life into everything that the wasteland isn't supposed to have.

Then again, this is the northeast, compared to the capital wasteland or Vegas.&gt; Also, coincidentally enough, science has nearly halted in the last 100 or so years in the Muslim world. There's only 3 Muslim Nobel prize winners in science/mathematics. It's a serious issue unfortunately.

Wow that is unfortunate (especially considering the rich scientific history from Islamic tradition).  

Thanks for the patience and education! You've left a very positive impression :).Considering it's still possible that the universe (or multiverse) is eternal... this doesn't make a nontheistic position illogical.Doesn't it affect our valuation of the god, though?  If the god was blue and thought blueness worthy of praise, but we preferred red to blue, wouldn't that matter to a god expecting worship?&gt; Only God the Father (the Tao) is good

I actually think the tao is good as well, but I'm unsure why you are calling it god. Are you a theistic taoist?But he doesn't *owe* anybody an explanation.  And while some of us are eager to chomp at the bit to engage a pastor in theistic dialog (e.g. me), some are less comfortable with needing to have an explanation for everything on the spot.  It's perfectly normal for people in positions like this to get cornered because they can't recall or don't recognize the bullshittery that goes on in debate, and I don't think it unreasonable to opt out. 

For instance, would you agree to free-range FBI interrogation even if you knew you were innocent and weren't obligated to be interrogated?Anti-theist is not just someone who declares no gods exist though; anti-theists are also opposed to theism in general. 

What's wrong with the standard dictionary definitions? 

__atheist__: a person who disbelieves or lacks belief in the existence of God or gods.

__theist__: one who has belief in the existence of a god or gods, especially belief in one god as creator of the universe, intervening in it and sustaining a personal relation to his creatures.

__agnostic__: a person who claims neither faith nor disbelief in God.

Keep in mind that "disbelief" is synonymous with "lacks belief in", so by definition, an agnostic is not an atheist. &gt;Disbelief: inability or refusal to accept that something is True or real.

And what is the difference between "the inability to accept that something is True" and "lack in a belief"?  

I also noticed you conveniently ignored the *second definition of disbelief*: 

&gt;&gt;lack of faith in something.

It's literally right there.

&gt;So an agnostic does not refuse to accept in God, but they still don't actively believe in any god(s).

Sigh.  They don't actively do anything, *except* as the definition points out *refuse* __both__ the belief and disbelief in god. 

&gt;"Refusal to accept" is a step farther than atheist

How so?  If I say "god exists", you're not going refuse accepting that? In other words, you're going to accept that? 


&gt;you're pushing atheism away to make room for agnosticism as an in-between.

Not at all.  You're trying to include a set of people who quite literally do not want to be considered "atheist" for the very reason that an atheist is defined.  I'm just reading you the dictionary.  You could read the SEP article on the distinction if you want, it's all there.  
&gt; People should strive to be in pursuit of truth - there are plenty of "good" and "bad" people who do not stand for truth.

Yes but seeking and praising are two different things, aren't they?  I don't really praise reality for being *real.*  I accept it and find whether claims are in accordance with reality.  Just because rape is real (a *True* thing) doesn't mean I should be praising it.  In fact, the reason I *don't* praise rape is because I consider it bad. &gt; still the same, something has to be infinite/eternal.

Yeah, that could be the universe itself.

&gt;why a multiverse would make more sense then a God is still not something i get.

Because it doesn't require question begging, and adheres to all (if any) rules of causality we can extrapolate in our current state of affairs, whereas the causality required to invoke a god is both unfounded and undemonstrated. Yes, which is why I also wouldn't call it "god the father".Fair enough, I just don't consider it a very convenient choice.&gt;Given that would gnostic atheists, who claim there is no god, have to support their claim by supplying evidence and facts for their stance to be judged?

I don't agree with the (a)gnostic atheist distinction, I'm just an atheist.  And yes, any time someone posits any claim, whether it's a rejection or an affirmation, there needs to be a reason behind it.

As it happens, the disbelief in gods has a very trivial burden of proof: that which lacks all evidence bears the same characteristics of something that doesn't exist, so by the identity principle, it more likely doesn't exist.

&gt;Would being a(n) ~~gnostic~~ atheist be rational given that there is no evidence, that I know of, to Noneify the god claim?

Yes, for the reason I provided above.  Replace god with Carl Sagan's garage dragon or Russell's Teapot, it becomes pretty clear that if there is no evidence whatsoever of something existing, the rational thing to do is reject claims about its existence. 

&gt;Are the only rational positions the agnostic kind in which the person holds a belief but lacks the knowledge to make the claim one way or another?

This is why I hate the "agnostic" qualifier.  It's been shoe-horned in to mean "I don't claim to *know* this" but that's a redundant and worthless qualifier, given that most reasonable people recognize that we don't claim to *know* many things with certainty. 

As per the definition of agnostic, an agnostic rejects both the belief *and* the disbelief of gods.  Their position is that the answer is completely unknown and therefore refuse to make any valuation on it.  Atheism (arguably) differs because it takes the position that "lack of evidence" = "likely doesn't exist".  I find the atheist position more tenable and practical. &gt;But, why do you believe it is bad?

You're not going to like my answer, but essentially it is bad because of the biological metaethical foundation we have evolved. The empathetic response, the desire to live well, the desire to be rational: from these precipitate codifications we call morals, by which we use metrics to determine the "goodness" or "badness" of something.  

But where it comes from really isn't important.  If a god *cared* about being worshipped, one would hope it would construct a universe wherein our judgments of "good" (wherever they came from) aligned with the character of this god.  We could then say that this god was worthy of praise.  As it is, however, I do not see this being the case. &gt;So you prescribe to the 3 part identifier for belief? Theist/agnostic/atheist?

My personal position is that it makes more sense, and that the 4-part identifier really should be 5, making the other two parts seemingly redundant. 

&gt;Absence of evidence is evidence of absence? Is this not generally considered fallacious?

Not really. Theists like to say that it is fallacious, but that's actually incorrect.  Evidence is defined as the body of factual information that informs a claim.  If there are literally no facts supporting a claim, we are left with what is known as a potentially *vacuously True* statement.  Vacuously True statements do not help us, and for whatever reason it has been shown time and again that it is more helpful and reasonable to reject vacuously True statements than to accept them ad-hoc.

In fact, the rejection of claims lacking all evidence is how we've progressed at all in our inquiry in scientific endeavors (for example). The code of the scientist is to reject and scrutinize all claims until evidence has been shown to be adequately convincing. Once shown, the scientist *tentatively* accepts the claim, always open to the possibility that new evidence could undermine the previous one. I see no reason this needs to be unique to empirical inquiry.

&gt;Would you put the complete rejection of the god claim down as common sense since there is no evidence?

Not common sense, but the logical conclusion.  Common sense sometimes overlooks vacuous truths and gets us in a pickle.  Following the logic for what it can actually tells us gets us to the truth of the matter. Sure thing.

&gt;Do you consider threads such as this as beneficial to the community?

I'd say the way you frame the questions make it easy for discourse and the exchanging of information.  However, in a debateanatheist sub, most people are going to be in general agreement to begin with if your question concerns something like the burden of proof.  You might get more heated exchanges (of you're interested in that component) by posting to debatereligion.

For the community at large, it's really hard to say. I spent about 8 hours on Wednesday trying to explain why I subscribed to a 3-type system with negligible results. So by comparison we have made far more progress in this 3-comment exchange than those 8 hours.  By that metric, it's definitely beneficial. &gt;  I know that most atheists will agree on most terms but I have been trying to bring out differing opinions even among fellow atheists.

It's funny when we don't, though, because you'd think it would be obvious given a dictionary :).  

&gt;I have posted several threads recently including one about abortion and one about a hypothetical god being judged.

I was probably participating in at least a few of those. 

&gt;Most times on a post i see the same answers refuting the theist so I was trying to highlight different opinions within our own community.

That's a good idea actually. So far as I know, the most divisive positions at the moment are the (a)gnostic atheist distinction vs. the three-type system.  In fact, it would be really good to see if *other* things spring up, but that's the only one I can think of that's prominent. &gt;&gt;Examples: Cosmological and Ontological arguments

&gt;Why are these "obviously True?"

Do you mean 'unTrue'? And the answer is that they lack soundness.  Namely, their premises are either poorly defined or fail to be derived from anything we know about reality (read: speculative).

&gt;Are you claiming it is dubious because you think the cosmological arguments don't work, or for other reasons?

The logical construction itself is valid, but the premises that drive the argument are unsound.  

&gt;Are there records of thousands of people having seen invisible unicorns and dying for their beliefs?

Well let's unpack this a little (though I care more about the above topics).  Concerning dying for one's beliefs: people die for all sorts of things they think are True.  That doesn't add to the reasonability of the claim, that just shows how convicted people can get about an idea. Suicide bombers die for jihad, mormons have died for their beliefs, people have anguished social scrutiny for believing they've been abducted by aliens.  Christians don't have a monopoly on dying for their convictions, so the logic doesn't follow that their belief must be more reasonable. 

Concerning these *thousands* of claims.  You do realize the only sources that claim there were thousands was, at best 4-5, right?  And there's plenty of theories out there to say the gospels were mostly derivative of Mark, reducing even that number.  You can't say there were 1000s of testimonies unless you have each unique testimony recorded.  We don't.  We have the claim from a handful of people that some other (unnamed) group also saw what they did. 

&gt;If not, then you cannot equate the empirical evidence for, say, Jesus with that of invisible unicorns.

Well this really depends on your biblical interpretation, but from where I'm sitting most academically honest biblical scholars see no reason to suspect the claims of the bible are all factually True\u2014especially concerning Christ and miracle claims.  If you concede that Cosmological, Teleological, Ontological, etc. arguments are flawed, then the bible is the *only* bit of evidence you can hope to use to differentiate from unicorns.  And on that front I'd say you're still at quite a disadvantage. 

&gt;Whether or not God intervenes to stop evil has nothing to do with if God exists.

It depends on your god claims. Presumably, you believe in an intervening god, no? In which case the PoE applies. I admit with no hesitation that the PoE does not address deistic gods, but I find the arguments for deistic gods (see above) wholly lacking.  The PoE demonstrates that even if there *is* a god, that god is either very weak or very uncaring of our problems.  To me that does not give me reason to worship it (again, assuming you could justifiably demonstrate the soundness of deistic arguments).&gt;I know the most prevalent one is The Semantics Game but I fell as if there are other issues to explore within our own community that will be enlightening

I'll be very intrigued if you unearth more.  I say it's worth continued pursuit.&gt; well i have never seen any proof of a multiverse other then the theory.

That's because *everything* is a theory at this point. The last place we can even attempt to calculate existed is the planck epoch, well before any singularity that would suggest a "beginning" of the universe. 

&gt;and if we include causality we would just end up with the multiverse needing a cause.

Including causality would have to be justified adequately.  I've never seen it done so. &gt;That causation is "poorly defined or fails to be derived from reality" doesn't seem to be the case,

Depends a lot on what you mean by causation. Depends a lot on how you plan to use what's understood about causation as we observe it.  No formulation I've seen has adequately kept causation under reasonable empirical standards and been able to justify a cosmological argument. 

&gt;and all you need is causation for the cosmological arguments to work.

UnTrue. What you need is a very specific form of causation (everything that begins to exist requires a cause).  *And* you have to rigorously define what it means to "begin to exist."

Do tables "begin to exist" when a carpenter crafts them?  If you mean it this way, then it seems that material cause is always required to make any sense.  We can therefore say that the universe was created from existing material (what do you know, quantum fields are timeless).

Or do you mean something entirely different by "begin to exist" (e.g., creatio ex nihilo)?  Well now you have a problem, because claims about causality ex nihilo are not grounded in any fact: we've never observed a single instance of ex nihilo existence, so as I've predicted you don't have a sound premise. 

I put it to you to *rigorously* define what it means to "begin to exist" and what cause you think is required for it, and what *factual* evidence you can use to support this claim.  No cosmological argument I've seen has been able to do all three. 

&gt;Well, yes, exactly. Dying for a belief is the ultimate sign of committment to that belief.

And has no bearing on it's truth value. 

&gt;Key point: when eyewitnesses die for their beliefs, the story told by these witnesses is more credible than people who are obviously lying (like Joseph Smith, who was unable to recreate the BoM when his draft was stolen from him).

The problem is we don't actually know how many eyewitnesses actually died for their beliefs.  The Bible only mentions a handful (in the epistles) and these are not always from firsthand witnesses.  They definitely weren't in the thousands.  And as I said before, eyewitness testimony is not really all that credible.  People have been willing to endure terrible scrutiny for their claims of alien abduction.  I'm sure they'd tell you they were eyewitnesses to the event.  

&gt;If you read the letters of Paul, he invites the reader to talk to any of the witnesses of the events in question.

But that's not a historically reliable way to determine he's telling the truth.  If Pele said "Hey, I'm god, I have a thousand people who will testify to it, go and ask them!" does that suddenly make you believe Pele is god?  Of course not.  Paul didn't give names, he didn't give locations.  He just said "these people over here."  Well that makes it pretty easy to have questionable claims.  It also depends on which epistles you refer to, as a many number of them are suspected to be forgeries. 

&gt;If you're making a cheap equation between "atheist" with "honest", sure. Otherwise, no.

Not required.  We can use "secular" or "academically rigorous" or "alternatively biased". 

&gt;No, I absolutely don't concede they're all flawed, unless, again, you're trying to equate "flawed" with "some atheists don't accept them".

I'm equating "unsound" with "flawed" as I mentioned all said arguments are unsound.  Be my guest.  Pick an argument, *rigorously* define the premises, and see if you can keep them sound *and* relevant to how the argument uses them. 

Unless you don't require premises to be grounded in actual reality.  In which case, of course you don't find them flawed, but that seems like a really low bar (and a double standard against other logically valid arguments). 

&gt;Belief is not equivalent to worship.

I understand.  My point is that the PoE makes god irrelevant to me, even if it existed (ie., even if I somehow were convinced god exists). &gt; in that sense it is no more logical not to believe in God than to believe in God

No, because there *are no viable theories* for god. You're trying to turn this into a coin-toss. What I'm saying is that this proposed evidence used to argue god into existence is very dubious compared to what the theories *do* inform us about. 

&gt;just as we reason the universe needing a cause

Yeah, there *has been no reason to justify the cause without also including a trivial cause from quantum fields.*

&gt;and if it were not bound by causality how would it ever be proven or even indicated with scientific tests?

Maybe because causality can exist locally but not universally? 

&gt;EDIT: Also in what sense would the multiverse not require begging the question that God does?

Not sure what you mean.&gt;I used to think that all agnostics were atheists, but I had to change my view to accommodate the existence of people self-identifying as agnostic theists.

I agree they aren't atheists, because they are *neither* atheist nor theist.  

[Agnostic](https://www.google.com/?q=define+agnostic): "a person who claims neither faith nor disbelief in God."

&gt;You'd have to convince the people who think they know something.

My point it it's sort of arbitrary to distinguish a set by how *confident* they are in a belief.  We don't do that with any other endeavor, even though people fall all over the spectrum on any given topic.&gt; But rejecting all god claims leaves me as a non-theist, which is to say, an atheist.

Rejecting *all* god claims would leave you as an agnostic. If you rejected both the belief *and* disbelief (lack of belief), then you're agnostic.  I'm pretty sure you don't reject disbelief (lack of belief), so that's what makes you atheist. 

&gt;Because it doesn't tell you if they're theists or not.

But that's because agnostic already removes whether or not they're theist. 

&gt;I've met a few who self-identified as agnostic theists.

My point is that I think the qualifier is either an incorrect use of the word, or incoherent.  To use agnostic as "not certain or not claiming absolute knowledge" is a pretty useless term.  We're not certain of much of anything, and those who *are* certain can easily take the time to point out that nothing will convince them.  It isn't clear to me how that qualifier helps, given the vast majority of beliefs are not "certain"&gt;I don't "claim disbelief."

If you say "I lack faith in x" that's claiming disbelief.  

&gt;If you lack belief in something, you don't believe in it. 

Yes, and agnostics *don't say this*.  They don't say they lack belief in something.  They're answer is fundamentally "I don't know."  You can read more about it [here](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/atheism-agnosticism/#6).  

&gt;I see no reason to be a theist, so I remain someone who is not a theist.

Yes, but "not a theist" does not entail "an atheist".  It entails "either an atheist or an agnostic."  

&gt;Gnostic theists and gnostic atheists disagree with him (and me) on that, and think that they have a basis by which to make knowledge claims regarding God.

Sure, and we can call them *gnostic x*, but the term "agnostic x" is incoherent.  Agnostics reject both theistic and atheistic positions, so you can't very well reject and simultaneously accept a position on something. &gt;Yes, and I am an agnostic. But since I lack theistic belief, I am also an atheist.

This is logically inconsistent. 

Disbelief: "lack of belief/faith"

Agnostic: Deny both belief and disbelief in god. 

Atheist: disbelief in god.  

These three cannot coexist. Agnostic is *defined* as distinct from atheist.

&gt;I can't reject lack of belief. That doesn't make any sense to me.

To reject it is to say that the question is impossible to answer in any regard. That is the position of the agnostic.  To the agnostic it's like asking "what is the color of democracy?"  It's a meaningless question to them.  Of course it doesn't make sense to you, *because I don't think you're actually an agnostic.*  You (and I) fail to see evidence for theism, and determine that this assessment leads us to a meaningful conclusion: maintain the default position.  The agnostic does not assess the lack of evidence in the same way. 

&gt;The default is lack of belief, which is what you have when you've never even heard of something

Default positions have nothing to do with agnosticism.  

&gt; If you've never heard of Quetzalcoatl, you don't have a belief in that deity.

Yes.

&gt; If someone claims something to exist but you find their claims vacuous and untenable, there is no reason to put credence in their claims.

This isn't necessarily True.  An agnostic would disagree.  They would say "I don't know how much or little credence to put in their claims."  You (and I), an atheist, think it's pretty clear that an absence of evidence is sufficient evidence of nonexistence and therefore can confidently say we "lack belief". But an agnostic does not have the leisure of this conclusion. &gt; I mean the entire filed of Theology is dedicated to that.

Theology is not a scientific theory.  We're talking about cosmology, remember?  No *cosmological* theory requires us to conclude: god.  No cosmological theory even indicates that god is necessary. These are theological *interpretations* of scientific theories\u2014interpretations I find highly suspect. 

&gt;can you explain this to me?

When talking about the Kalam Cosmological Argument (Craig's variation)\u2014since that one aims to utilize scientific understanding)\u2014the premises begin with "everything that begins to exist has a cause".  Common sense tells us this is a reasonable premise, but common sense can be very wrong about things.  

After all, what does it *mean* to "begin to exist?"  If we say a chair "begins to exist" when the carpenter finishes crafting the wood, that's fine.  But notice that in *all* cases of "beginning to exist" with a cause, we've observed there had to be *material* there to begin with.  Common sense tells us that material is required for something to be caused. But this is not what Craig's argument uses.  His definition of the "Universe" is *all* of matter and space.  This precludes us from using this definition of "cause" and "begins to exist."

Clearly Craig must either now backpedal and say we *can't* use common sense to decide if "everything that begins to exist needs a cause" (which puts him in a very tight spot) or else redefine "begins to exist" mid-argument to make it fit his meaning (which I think he actually does). But in either case, the argument suffers either philosophical/scientific backing or else logical validity. 

&gt;but then how can science determine about what is universally True or even True about the universe (assuming that science is completely build logic and causality)

We look for patterns and observe statistical significance in their predictability.  We work under the assumption that there's some causal interaction, but there's no scientific *commitment* that everything must be caused.  After all, quantum fluctuations are technically uncaused (at least "efficiently"), and we have no problem accepting this. 

&gt;i was wondering why in case of multiverse there is no begging of question which does occur with God

Oh, right. Basically it has to do with what the cosmological theories say and depend on. The cosmological theories do not depend on some stringent efficient causal interaction, they merely depend on a material one.  When we get into the topic of god starting the universe, there's question begging in one of two ways: 

1.  Everything needs an efficient explanation (why? we're not committed to is scientifically) 
2.  Craig's other response when cornered =&gt; But the question is *actually* philosophical: Why is there something at all and not nothing?  Even if the universe existed eternally, it doesn't tell us why it's here! (Question begged: the assumption that this question is meaningful at all.  Assuming a "why" implicitly expects an explanation.  We don't have reason to suspect so.  "What color is democracy" could be equally coherent.)
&gt; No, it's not a claim. It's the bare fact of lacking belief in something.

Ok sure.  It's just the bare fact.  But the point is it's a *position you take*, which is not what agnostics do. 

&gt;You also lack belief in something you've never heard of, or of claims you find nonsensical or vacuous.

One can argue to "lack a belief in something" means one must be aware of the *idea* of it to lack belief in. Scientists didn't "lack belief" in quantum fields before the electron was discovered, because the very idea had never occurred to them.  They were, as it were, simply unfamiliar with it entirely.  *Once* confronted with the idea, however, one either lacks belief, has belief, or finds the ability to valuate belief at all completely impossible.  

&gt;Agnosticism pertains to the knowledge I consider available to me,

No, this is an incomplete representation of agnosticism.  Agnostics *also* draw a conclusion based on their take of what can be derived from the knowledge. That conclusion is: "we can't believe or do anything about it, it's completely unknowable, even insofar as how unknowable it is".

&gt;Agnosticism does not address belief,

Do I need to link you to the definition again?  Which is defined *by* it's rejection to either belief or disbelief?

&gt;Yes, it does. Theism is belief in God. The a- prefix means not, or without.

But, again, this means that agnostics are also a-atheists. That you can impose a definitional dichotomy here does not mean that the third option "I don't know" (to both sides) should be excluded from "atheist". 

&gt;Those are not mutually exclusive, since each pertains to something different.

If you want to qualify (a)theism with agnostic that's fine, so long as *pure*/unqualified agnostics are still a tenable option.  People have and do append (a)theist to their agnostic label to represent a *functional* approach to their life, but that is not the same as identifying their actual belief itself, which is what I'm interested in.  

That is, someone can be an (epistemological) agnostic, but respond accordingly in an atheistic fashion (do not adhere to the tenets of faith), but to lump these together epistemologically is an overstep. 

&gt;Strange, since I know what I mean, as do other agnostic atheists, and in fact most people I've discussed this with.

It depends on whether you're talking pragmatically or epistemologically. 

&gt;Agnosticism pertains to knowledge, not to belief.

Where are you getting this definition? I already provided for you at least two sources that directly refer to agnosticism as the rejection of belief.  It's *defined by* it's distinction from belief.  The fact that it is *based* on a knowledge claim does not exclude it from also being *defined as* disjoint from beliefs. 


&gt;That is not how Huxley defined the term when he coined it. 

This is Huxley's direct quote: 

&gt;&gt;When I reached intellectual maturity, and began to ask myself whether I was an __atheist__, a __theist__, or a pantheist; a materialist or an idealist; a Christian or a __freethinker__, I found that the more I learned and reflected, the less ready was the answer; until at last __I came to the conclusion that I had neither art nor part with *any* of these denominations, *except the last*__. 


What the term means (literally) and what it actually employs are not one and the same.  The fact that it pertains to knowledge has to do with the *origins* of the position, but the position itself is still a rejection of both atheism and theism. 

&gt;You are using a narrow definition that I do not share.

Take it up with Huxley and those who call themselves pure agnostics. 

&gt;It's not what Huxley meant by the term.

I think Huxley would disagree. 

&gt;it's nonsensical to say you reject both believing and not believing in something.

This only demonstrates that I don't think you understand the agnostic's position.  If I said "democracy is orange!" would you believe me, believe it to be wrong, or believe the position to be utterly unknowable (but possible)?  Huxley views beliefs about god to be the same way.  It's not that democracy *can't* be orange, it's that we have no way to decipher *how* or *if* such a thing is possible or impossible at all.

&gt;If you don't don't believe, that's believing, because of the double negative. Not believing in something is NOT the same as believing that the obverse is True.

Unless we're talking about unfalsifiable statements that are vacuously True (color of democracy).  In which the third option is "I don't know" or "I have no idea".  

&gt;But you would still lack belief that democracy has a color.

No, you don't have to.  You can say "I'm unsure *if* democracy has color.  I don't see how it could, but that doesn't mean I'm willing to say it *doesn't*".

&gt;"That claim doesn't make any sense" leaves you without belief that the claim is True.

And Huxley isn't about to say "that claim (color of democracy) doesn't make any sense".

&gt;No, to me there can be no empirical evidence for the non-existence of an invisible, magical entity. 

If we're talking about Russellian teapot gods, I agree. 

&gt;My atheism is merely the lack of theistic belief, not a claim or belief that "God" doesn't exist. 

Yes, and Huxley and his ilk would not fall in line with this position.  He doesn't necessarily "lack theistic belief" in the same way that you do. 

&gt;I'm not a theist, but I also see no basis to claim that something as nebulous and poorly defined as "God" doesn't exist. You can't make substantive claims about something so insubstantial.

This is all fine, but not necessarily relevant to agnosticism. 
Couldn't you make the information anonymous but still use the tool?

E.g. User supplies data that makes it obvious of their identity.  Reddit databases store the information linked with account (and link it with other known accounts).  User does a shitty thing.  Moderator says "ban this account and all accounts linked".  Automated system accesses the DB to do the "bulk ban".  No private information is given to anyone.But what if the end game is getting a free copy of the game?  Enough people here care about the good name of this sub to have their kindness be (theoretically) taken advantage of.  I think that's even worse, since the end result is actually of monetary value, not imaginary internet points.Um, what?  Not all academically rigorous institutions suffer widespread over-sanitation of ideas.  And I would hazard to guess Yale is not actually an exception.  Part of Yale's creed is to embrace the truth, even if it offends or challenges the status quo. One subset of one generational group doesn't represent an institution's overall MO.Maybe it would be better for everyone if they *did* flunk out from missing class.  Or at least go see a therapist.  Failing teaches valuable lessons too.  It happens more than you think.  Living in an academic bubble where everyone praises you for preaching the party line makes it an easy position to take.

That said, I hope everyone here understands that for every outspoken kid on that campus, there is likely at least one or two shaking their heads in the background.  I can speak to that firsthand.No because you have the privilege of "intelligence."  Check your goddamn brain at the door before it hurts another feeling.Except even then he wasn't talking down to them.  It's like he really just wanted them to understand.  The man is a saint. My friend and I (we met in college) would often talk about how there should be a secret component to admissions wherein an admissions officer does an anonymous "cold call" encounter with potential students in the wild (at home, at a coffee shop, etc.)\u2014to see what they're really like behind that polished essay.

It was blue sky daydreaming, but we still talk about how that would have been a good thing for everyone. It would also get boring after, like, a week.&gt;Is there a threshold in your mind that would prompt you to say,  "enough is enough, now I prefer to be dead rather than alive"

See: "Depression".  It's not even unique to atheism.Gaming it, and winning.

edit: unless god says "I don't know".It seems to me pretty obvious (to me) that P != NP.  Well, on the face of it, not *obvious* (because why is TSP NP-hard, but not other shortest-path problems?), but after some investigation, it does seem clear that someone will eventually prove P != NP. If we take a parable from Jesus literally, we can hear them and tell them how they can't have any of our shit (except maybe, our *literal* shit; it didn't rule that out).&gt;Do you believe in the multiverse? eternal universe?

The answer is far from settled for either (and all other) theories.  That said, my *pragmatic, uncommitted, layman* belief (read: I have no clue, but this idea at least makes sense) is sort of a cross between the two you listed.  That is, our universe is an element of a larger set of "verses" known as a "multiverse" that has existed eternally. It's possible that even if Big Bang cosmology reduces our origins to a *first* singularity, such an occurrence can be explained via interactions with particulars from the multiverse. 

&gt;I believe that a divine entity at least sparked the big bang.

Define "divine" and why you think said "divinity" is required to spark the Big Bang.  While you're at it, you should probably explain to me what *you* think the Big Bang is/means. It would at least raise some (even more) doubts about Teleological arguments. &gt; It's just out of His character, being the great loving person that He is.
&gt; Why does anyone adopt a son or daughter?

People also don't eat meat because they love animals. But I don't see god promising dogs, cats, or scallops entry into heaven.

&gt;We are significantly lower than Him but not as low as insects.

By what metric?

&gt;We were made in His image, and we already have the capability of a more-similar relationship to Him than insects have.

This begs the question.  Why does god love things (more so) made in its image?  Why didn't god give *all* creatures the ability to have such a relationship? What makes you think that humans have a unique sense of love?
&gt; to define divine is to go into religion which I think will only side track us.

This is a debate religion subreddit.  And I need a rigorous definition to understand what *you* mean by divine, versus, say, a naturalist.  The definition is important, because as you've indicated, you believe a "divine" spark was required for the Big Bang. I assume it's because you think something "nondivine" couldn't have done it, and that's why I need to know what *isn't* divine (ie., what have you ruled out?). 

&gt;lets just define the entity as that which is outside of our dimension of which we exist within.

A pantheist (naturalist) definition could therefore work if one subscribed to a multiverse theory.  It's therefore unclear whether you are an atheist/pantheist or some form of theist.

&gt;And this entity at the very least sparked the big bang.

This tells me nothing about divinity.  It's a tautological definition.  Are you just defining the entity as "that which outside of *our* spacetime started the Big Bang?"  There's still a problem because you have to justify why you think the Big Bang needed to be started outside of our own spacetime, as opposed to a prior crunch/bang refraction. 

[edit: still writing, the comment auto-completed]

&gt;To explain what I think the big bang is, from my understanding its an infinitely small singularity that slowly expanded to form everything that can possibly exist in our dimension.

Then I'm sorry to say your understanding is (sort of) wrong. The Big Bang does lend itself to a prior singularity (conceptually), but all of our known physics breaks down moments before this singularity is achieved mathematically.  In general one of the big questions of cosmology is "what *was* there between where our physics breaks down (moments of quantum gravity) and this theoretical singularity.  To presume that something was needed to *spark* the singularity is to presume the singularity was *actually* what was first there, and that simply isn't supported by the science (yet, or perhaps ever). 

&gt;I believe an entity outside of this dimension at least sparked the existence of said singularity.

Why?  And why call it "divine"?&gt;Logic follows that if something existed then it did not exist before existing (unless it always existed)

I think I know what you're trying to say, but that's not what you're saying here.  What you're *trying to say* is that something with a finite past (began to exist) cannot be eternal, but that's self-evident by definition.

&gt;but if it did not always exist then there must be a creator, a causer.

Let's play DA for a moment and assume we prove that the Big Bang really did reduce to a singularity.  Ok then, what's stopping us from calling that "causer" a mundane piece of higher-dimensional matter?  I still don't see where you went from "needs a cause" to "q.e.d divine cause/creator".

&gt;(IT could be another universe bumping into our empty one)

It could, so it's unclear to me why you've committed to the divine creator theory. 

&gt;or its an entity outside of everything that 'created' the singularity that lead to all this mess.

Again, playing DA here, I think you've produced a False dichotomy here. It could be universes bumping into one another, fluctations of any sort of field(s), a necessary byproduct of a high-energy (other dimensional) interaction. It's not really just "bumping" vs. "intelligent mind with all creative powers producing a fine-tuned universe for its own human creation".&gt; As I wrote my comment above, I imagined a scale of 0 to 100. Suppose God's attributes and capabilities were listed, and there were 100 or more.

Ok, where are these characteristics derived and laid out?  What is the cut-off for heaven worthiness and why is it that number and not somewhere else?

&gt;For example: bacteria:2 (exists, lives)

"Existence" is not a characteristic. Magical invisible intangible flobpoops don't lack a "characteristic" of existence, they don't exist at all.

&gt;exists,lives,sees,desires

What is your definition of "live"?  Because if god "lives" then it's clearly not connected to the standard biological definition, and one is left to consider if other systems can be called "living" that are not biological.

&gt;dog:8 (insect+has emotions+more attributes)

Which ones?  Seems like there aren't many others.  Seems like dogs are really insects + 2 (at best). 

&gt; man:20

What are the 20? If you say there aren't *literally* 100 qualities, then how many are there (total), and what are they?  Which ones do humans have?  You'd also need to go back and rescale insects, dogs, etc. because you've currently employed a 1:1 scale which clearly wouldn't match. 

&gt;Christ-like man on new earth:30

Same questions as above. 

&gt;... God:100 or more.

Is it 100? Or is it "more"?  It matters if you want to talk about scale. 

&gt;I'm not sure of the exact numbers, but you can get the idea.

I get an idea of a very arbitrary and vague system that has many holes.  My next (important) question: Why is the cut-off 20 (supposing humans are 20 in your scale), and not, say, 5? &gt; Perhaps because we humans go through higher levels of challenges to live morally,
&gt; while animals and insects and bacteria do not?

So god loves things more that go through moral challenges?  Then why give only humans moral challenges, when he could give other animals said qualities as well?

It seems to me that moral challenges and intellect are directly related, no?  By that reasoning, it sounds like god loves smarter creatures more, but that's odd, because *god made them that way.* 

&gt;I don't know; to keep the overall course of history simple, I guess.

I thought god was omniscient? We have all sorts of fan-fiction with intelligent creatures who endure moral challenges.  It seems like a god with all-encompassing knowledge could handle that.

You're probably better off with just "I don't know," which I think is the only real answer you can give.

&gt;It's been enough of a story to have humans as the dominant species, compared to an alternative world where there are two or more intelligent/moral species

Yes, but it's not about *species* that separates us from having a multi-special society.  It's about the intellectual capacity to engage in civility.  Seems to me all creatures, should they be as intelligent as us, would be capable of harmonious interaction. 

&gt;I'm not sure I claimed above that "humans have a unique sense of love."

But if animals can love in the same ways we do, then they can love god in the same way we do, right?  Why would god love/treat/care for something less that loves it (potentially) to the same capacity as humans?&gt;The possibilities in parenthesis are ignored by me because I dont find them to be True

Why?  These are theories of leading cosmologists who dedicate their lives to the necessary information to provide these theories?  What information do you have that they don't? 

&gt;it follows that there could have been an entity outside of this dimension that at least started the universe from existing.

It could be any number of things from an infinite set of possibilities.  It's therefore unclear to me why you think this thing must be "divine" (still undefined).&gt; I was born in believing in a divine god. I have changed my opinion about a lot of things and the criteria usually is that the evidence must be undeniable (beyond a reasonable doubt) and so far both eternal-universe and multi-verse do not appeal to me because it seems they are invoking infinity which is the same as invoking a god, so no reason to change opinion.

But they are inherently very different things. One comes with an idea of a being with intention and intelligence and planning.  The other is a matter of circumstance for unknown reasons.  They aren't really "invoking infinite" so much as they are sound theories where infinite is a necessary byproduct.  In any case, doesn't it matter to you that you actually believe what is True?  If not, then there won't be any changing of your mind, but if there is, I think it worth investigating why you think a god is equally plausible/reasonable as an eternal cosmological theory.

&gt;The reason I dont want to get into divine is because it will invoke religion 

I mean, it doesn't have to.  If it did, it would seem you're begging the question, because your'e saying you believe a divine spark was necessary for the big bang for religious reasons.  That seems circular (unless you have other evidence/argument for the existence of a god).  

&gt; Oh, sure, it'd be interesting alright. I just don't think it'd mean much for my life.

You sound like my wife; she's very practical (we're a good balance for that).  I have my head in the clouds, so the idea of aliens or terrestrial biogenesis changes a lot to me.

&gt;If I wake up tomorrow and the origin of the universe is revealed to be some complicated explanation involving QM, then I'll say "Cool", and go to work.

Have you studied QM?  It's actually not as daunting as you'd think, if you have some linear algebra/physics education. I think I'd be reading up on all of that :). 

&gt;And if I wake up tomorrow and the origin of the universe is revealed to be God, who had a specific purpose in mind for humanity, then I'll say "Well, screw him, I'll do what I want anyway", and go to work.

Yeah, I'd probably use more four-letter words to the same effect.

&gt;I don't see myself making any radical changes to my life regardless of the answer.

For me it would mostly be outlook and the possibilities we could encounter in the future.
&gt; Would you claim that the theory of gravity is a concept? Does that invalidate it?

Being a concept in and of itself is not an invalidation.  But there is more to proving a fact than simply providing a coherent perceptual framework (e.g. Freud's psychological framework).  The problem arises specifically when a framework makes universal, unfalsifiable claims.

Actuality and potentiality either a) has been falsified because I can conceive of an actual that did not require a previous actualizer (such as the spontaneous creation of the universe) or b) is unfalsifiable because it makes a more metaphysical claim that we do not have access to (ie., we cannot see the actualizer, but it *must* be there).  Both make the framework problematic.

&gt;Which is exactly what I was pointing out in your reasoning.

You seem turned around.  The only thing I'm interested in, and have been interested in, is the factuality of the premises behind any and all theistic arguments.  The end, full stop.

&gt;Yes, it may be used to argue for an evil God. That doesn't mean it's unsound.

Except it does, because unless you're willing to say that it's a *fact* that there are an uncountable  number of gods *in existence* who are all over the spectrum of pure evil to pure good all existing as separate "maximums" then the argument quite simply isn't sound.  That's what "sound" means.

&gt;You're forgetting that necessary existence is positive.

See Kant's criticism of using existence as a property.  I really don't think you know the space of the argument if you're bothering to bring this up\u2014especially after I already pointed it out to you. 

&gt;If we're supposing that P1...Pi are compatible with necessary existence, there's no reason to think that N1...Ni also are.

Why not?  You're going to have to make the case for which properties *and why* are compatible with *necessary* existence while others are not.  This is precisely the failure of Godel is his argument: he never actually defends the idea that nominally positive (things we consider "good") are entailed by necessary existence while nominally negative (things we call "bad") are not.  

Did you even read the article I linked you?  I'm just rehashing the same issues the SEP itself is raising here. 

&gt;You mentioned Kant's objections to properties being better than others. You said nothing about whether existence is a predicate or not.

Precisely *because* Kant disagrees with existence as a property.  Hopefully now you understand the full objection. 

&gt;But showing that a particular X is necessarily True does make X factually True. I see no reason that a priori arguments should fail.

Sure. But it has yet to be shown *which*, if any, properties are necessarily True as a positive set S that we'd like to ascribe to X.  In other words, it's entirely possible that Godel's OA is vacuously True (S is empty), until a rigorous defense of the certain properties you'd like to show as necessary *are actually necessary*.  Or, conversely, it's entirely possible that there are an uncountable number of combinations of Si, leaving us with an uncountable number of gods (see the SEP for more on this). Vacuously True statements are entirely worthless, and an infinite (or near infinite) number of gods seems to already be in direct contradiction with reality.&gt;No. My moral intuition.

Congratulations for being in the minority position, but your anecdotal position on distinguishing moral intuition from divine command theory doesn't excuse the religion as a whole.  The fact that you've recognized that your holy book is in direct contradiction with reality doesn't make the *religion* excused, it just means you think critically despite the fact that your book claims to be "god breathed," and the creed of nearly every major denomination considers it to be the moral authority. 

&gt; The universe cannot be necessary. It is time-bound, and has an origin, both of which exclude it from being a necessary object.

The better objection to your claim is that the universe being contingent does not mean that it has to have a predecessor.

Contingent just means "neither necessary nor impossible," it says nothing of dependency, so we can easily reject your conclusions of 2 by pointing out that the universe was simply an accident or happenstance.I agree. My reply to OP was going to be along similar lines.  Seems to me Dawkins was saying we're evolutionarily inclined to give meaning to something, even if that meaning is incorrect.&gt;Then why did you use it as an argument, rather than moving on to these other arguments?

Because my point is that it is *merely* a concept, and fails to move into the space of being "fact."

&gt;This is only a problem for science. We are not doing science, so it's not a problem.

It's a problem for *claims about reality*, existential claims.  If you can't establish \u2203(x) then there's simply no way that it is a fact. 

&gt;I can't conceive of this. Can you show me how it's possible?

Sure, a universe spontaneously pops into being.  That's perfectly possible unless you want to add further premises onto what you think causality is\u2014and those certainly aren't going to be factual.

&gt;Do you reject the premise that something cannot come from nothing?

I do. I see no good reason to believe it, and maintain that it's a perfectly open question.  Why do you accept it? 

&gt;Unfalsifiability makes it unscientific. That's not a problem for me.

Unfalsifiable makes it inverifiable makes it counter-factual.

&gt;But whether this is True or not depends entirely on whether ontological arguments succeed or not.

Not at all. What do you think "analytic statement" means, exactly?

&gt;So you've assumed from the outset that they fail, in order to make this argument against them.

No, I'm saying the premises are not factual, therefore the argument isn't sound.  That's the only thing I've been saying this whole time. 

&gt;I'm not sure what "maximums" you are talking about here

Various permutations of "positive" sets.  Again, see the SEP link I provided from before for a more thorough picture. 

&gt;But either way, I'm not going to reject the argument simply because it's possible that it proves the existence of other entities as well as God.

That's not why we should reject it.  We should reject it because it implies something overly complex and contrary to what we seem to know about reality. Furthermore, if the argument can be made for all gods in equally opposing forces, it can be said that all gods are therefore negated by their contrapositional deities. 

&gt;If you think it does prove that these entities exist, please provide a set of properties that works for them.

The argument itself makes this point, because Godel fails to rigorously define which properties are properly positive.  I don't have to do anything more than point you to the argument and the criticisms raised in the SEP. 

&gt;I need do nothing. You claimed that the argument is unsound, so you must demonstrate one of the premises False.

The claim "the set of properties that *necessarily exist* is empty" is what I'm saying. My proof is that for any property you provide, I can provide a logically possible universe that lacks this property.  Therefore, by definition no such property is *necessary,* and we must conclude that Godel's set of "positive" traits is empty. 

If you want to make it a point in fact that there *are* necessary properties, your argument to refute is right up there. 

&gt;If you think that P1...Pi being positive means that N1...Ni can also be positive, you must show it.

If Pi does not conflict with Pj for any Pj != Pi (definition of positive), then by definition !Pi will not conflict with !Pj for the same reason.  Furthermore, P-&gt;Q allows for !P-&gt;!Q, so any entailment does not render the negation False either. This seems trivial to understand, and I'm not sure why you can't see it.

&gt;Your objection was against existence being better than non-existence.

Because existence and non existence are not properties.  There is not valid comparison to make.

&gt;That is not part of Godel's argument.

Godel's argument\u2014Axiom 5: Necessary existence is positive.  This is listing existence as a property, and as I *just* said above, is exactly what I and Kant disagree with.&gt; Why all the stuff about my answer being anecdotal?

Because, as I said before, your personal experience does not map back necessarily to the issue at hand for religion as an institution.

&gt;Didn't you know the answer was going to be anecdotal when you asked me what I, one specific individual, thought?

It honestly depended on whether you cited what the religious answer was (by the holy book, the authority of morality, according to the vast majority of denominations of your faith) or your own.  The fact that it is your own *contrary* to what the religion explicitly says is why I answered accordingly. 

&gt;If I had answered that morality can be found in the Bible and in the Bible alone that would have been just as anecdotal but somehow I don't believe you would have brought it up then. Maybe it has something to do with that idea of confirmation bias you mentioned earlier? Just saying.

Let me rephrase the question then to make it clear exactly what I'm trying to point out. Do you believe the bible or any church leader is an authority on moral, scientific, or life-direction choices?&gt;It doesn't equate to it, but it entails it.

It doesn't even entail it, for the reason I provided about spontaneous creation.  We often assume dependency for sake of exploring explanatory power, but that by no means indicates that an explanation *must* exist for all contingent entities.

&gt;As Aquinas pointed out, if something can exist or not exist (with nonzero probabilities) over time, if you let an infinite amount of time go by, it will eventually not exist.

Sure, this is True of any finite-existing thing.  But the first issue here is that the universe could have existed forever (but oscillates), in which case it will never not exist.  And secondly this says nothing about a dependency: we can still say that the universe happened merely by chance instead. 

&gt;I managed to avoid invoking the PSR for this argument chain, via the reason stated above.

I'm still not sure how you think you avoided it, because it seems to me both an eternal independent-contingent universe and a spontaneous independent-contingent universe are completely possible (I separate independent-contingent from dependent-contingent: that which requires an explanation). 

&gt;I don't agree that all varieties of Deism require a conscious, intelligent God.

But whether you think so or not, that is the definition.  Another part that I failed to mention is that deism specifically believes in a non-interventionary god, which is in contradiction with most major religions. If you'd like to argue that your definition of a creator god lacks this quality, you're arguing for a type of theism that most theists would actually call atheism. 

&gt;The point here wasn't to discuss Free Will, per se, but rather a defense of the metaphysics that allow it to be possible.

I'll need to look more closely then on what metaphysics you think make this possible, because I'm still not convinced there's a coherent system that allows for it.&gt;Then demonstrate this point, rather than simply claiming it.

I already did, by pointing out a completely possible event that conflicts with the claim that all actuals required other actuals if they were potentials prior to: a spontaneous event.  To extend Aristotle's actuality/potentiality to a metaphysical claim requires more justification, by virtue of completely valid counter-examples like the one I just provided that undermine it. 

&gt;I don't see how, so demonstrate it. Mathematics is not falsifiable, but it makes claims about reality.

It's very much falsifiable.  2 + 2 = 5.  Is that a falsifiable claim?  The number of primes less than ten is even.  Falsifiable?  What's not falsifiable are the *axioms*, which are self-evident.  But Aristotle's metaphysical framework for actuality/causality is not an axiom.

&gt;I don't concede that we can't establish it. Merely that it's not falsifiable.

It would also not be *verifiable*. Which would make it completely counter-factual. Except that it *is* falsifiable, by virtue of the counter-example I provided.

&gt;I can't conceive of such a thing.

Of course you can.  You understood what I said because it was a logically valid event.  What you can't conceive is that such a thing *actually* happened.  But your inability to accept it is not the same as saying it's impossible or unTrue, that's just the fallacy of ignorance.

&gt;Can you explain how such a thing is possible?

Yes, because it isn't *impossible.* The definition of possible is that it isn't impossible.  If a logically possible world can hold a universe that spontaneously existed, it's possible.

&gt;How can something contingent be not contingent on anything?

You're confusing contingent and dependent.  Contingent just means "[not impossible nor necessary](http://tinyurl.com/o3goez2)".  There can be dependent-contingent things (caused) or independent-contingent things (uncaused).

&gt;For one, science is impossible without the PSR. But surely you know that.

Science does not depend on the PSR. Science makes causal assumptions about things *that can be observed*.  The PSR makes a much more stringent and universal claim.  From the [SEP](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/sufficient-reason/):

&gt;&gt;The Principle seems at first sight to have a strong intuitive appeal\u2014we always ask for explanations\u2014__yet it is taken by many to be too bold and expensive__ due to the radical implications it seems to yield. 

I highly recommend you read up on the SEP's articles about the PSR as well as Ontological arguments in general. A lot of this stuff I'm saying can be read straight out of there. 

&gt;True by virtue of its meaning.

And purely analytic arguments, by definition, cannot be sound unless the premises are established as fact *a posteriori*.  I already conceded *long* before that I find the analytic component of Ontological arguments to be valid.  But the *soundness* requires that the premises be *fact* and *facts* require getting up from the thinking chair and *verifying* that the premises are in accordance with reality.  

Reality cannot be established from the thinking chair.  We cannot reason that unicorns do not exist but horses do if we've never left the chair, read or seen anything.

&gt; If the Ontological arguments succeed, then God necessarily exists. 

Succeed at what?  Being logically valid?  You seem to fail to understand how *a priori* reasoning works and what that means about the soundness of a claim.  I recommend you read more on it [here](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/apriori/), as it's getting tiring correcting the numerous incorrect claims you're making. 

&gt;The statement "God exists" is True by virtue of its meaning.

To be so you'd have to say the definition of "god" *includes* "a thing that exists", which Kant already pointed out is incorrectly using existence as a property. Existential claims, by definition, require experience to verify (*a posteriori* verification, read the SEP to understand more of what I mean). 

&gt;I don't concede that such arguments can be made. Make them and prove me wrong.

The SEP article made them.... Did you read it?

Here it is again for you, please read it this time: 

&gt;&gt;Suppose that there is some set of independent properties {I, G1, G2, \u2026} which can be used to generate the set of positive properties by closure under entailment and \u201cnecessitation\u201d. (\u201cIndependence\u201d means: no one of the properties in the set is entailed by all the rest. \u201cNecessitation\u201d means: if P is in the set, then so is necessarily having P. I is the property of having as essential properties just those properties which are in the set. G1, G2, \u2026 are further properties, of which we require at least two.) Consider any proper subset of the set {G1, G2, \u2026}\u2014{H1, H2, \u2026}, say\u2014and define a new generating set {I*, H1, H2, \u2026}, where I* is the property of having as essential properties just those properties which are in the newly generated set. A \u201cproof\u201d parallel to that offered by G\u00f6del \u201cestablishes\u201d that there is a being which has as essential properties just those properties in this new set. If there are as few as 7 independent properties in the original generating set, then we shall be able to establish the existence of 720 distinct\u201cGod-like\u201d creatures by the kind of argument which G\u00f6del offers. (The creatures are distinct because each has a different set of essential properties.)

([source](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/ontological-arguments/#GodOntArg))

&gt;You claim to know the argument is unsound

Yes, because the premises are not established facts.

&gt;So you claim to know that one of the premises is False. 

No, I claim to know that at least one of the premises is *not a fact*.  There's a difference. 

&gt;Which one, and how do you know it?

This: "Axiom 5: Necessary existence is a positive property" is not a fact.

The definition of "positive" is not a fact. What's more, it isn't even clear which properties can be factually attributed to "positive" and which cannot. 

&gt;Can omnipotence and not-omniscience both be positive? It seems intuitively plausible that omnipotence includes the ability to discover all information, and so entails omniscience.

It's entirely possible for omnipotence and not-omniscience to be positive. Imagine a gorilla has god-like omnipotence, it can *do* anything, but it doesn't comprehend all of what it can do. 

&gt;Maybe that's the case, maybe not. Either way, you need to demonstrate this point more thoroughly.

-------------------------------------------

Proof by induction.  Let {P} be a set of positive properties and {P'} be the set of P s.t. Pi is negated for all Pi in {P}. 

-  Base case 1: {P} is empty.  Therefore, {P'} is empty.  Both are positive.

-  Base case 2: {P} contains one element, p.  !p satisfies the definition of "positive" (ie., it's negation is not in the set).  Therefore {P'} is still valid. 

-  Base case 3: {P} contains two elements, p1 and p2, s.t. p1 and p2 are independent. Therefore !p1 and !p2 are also independent, and thus {P'} is also positive.  In fact, p1 and !p2 is equally positive, as is !p1 and p2, because, by definition of "positive" provided, the only requirement is that the negation is not also included for any pi for a given {P}.

-  Corollary 1: let p1 and p2, two independent positive properties, be combined into a single positive property p^1,2 or (p1 ^ p2). Trivially, we can negate p^12 in any number of ways (!p1 and p2, p1 and !p2, !p1 and !p2) and maintain {P'}.  For simplicity I'm going to perform the tertiary model (!p1 and !p2), which is the most intuitive.  By base case 3 and 1, we see that !p^12 is positive for {P'}, therefore p^12 is a valid positive property representing p1 and p2.

-  Base case 4: {P} contains two elements, s.t. p1-&gt;p2. Negation give us !p1 and !p2, which is not a contradiction since !p2-&gt;!p1.  Therefore {P'} is valid. 

-  Corollary 2: By base case 4, we can combine p1-&gt;p2 as p^1-2 that represents an independent property which negation that permits it to still hold.  The negation of p^1-2 is represented as !p1 and !p2, and furthermore !p2-&gt;!p1.

-  Base case 5: {P} = (p1 ^ p2)-&gt;p3.  By Corollary 1: {P} = p^12 -&gt;p3, and by Base case 4, {P'} is still positive. 

-  Inductive step: Suppose {Pk} represents a k-sized positive set, and that {Pk'} is also positive.  Therefore, there are k properties that form some combination of entailment and independent properties s.t. their negation is also a positive set. Let pk+1 be a new property to introduce.  By definition, pk+1 is either independent or entailed by some combination of ps in {Pk}.  If independent, then by Corollary 1, pk+1 can become a member of all other independent properties, and thus {Pk+1'} is also positive.  If entailed by some pi in pk, then we can do the following: describe all properties, entailed or otherwise, independent of pk+1 as p^ind , which is known to be positive. Therefore, all pi in {Pk} not in p^ind entail transitively pk+1.  By Corollary 2, we can condense these into p^ent s.t. p^ent and p^ind form {Pk} and p^ent-&gt;pk+1.  By base case 4, we can now say definitively that {Pk+1'} is also positive. 

Therefore, by induction, we can say there is, at least, one inverse positive set for any positive set provided. 

-------------------------

As the SEP rightly points out, we can also perform a {P}* operation on {P} and produce n! combinations of positive sets. 

&gt;Necessary existence doesn't have the same dubious nature as existence.

Necessary existence has *more* dubious nature than existence. Not only must the existence first be demonstrated, it must also be shown that is it *impossible* for said existence to not be the case. That's a hard pill to swallow when we only have one universe to observe of the seemingly infinite set of logically possible universes to consider. To get around this, you'd have to demonstrate that it's *logically impossible* given the facts we have to not have it exist (beyond just definitionally).

I don't think anyone is capable of doing so.The answer would depend on what you said, but the expected result was the same.  If: 

a)  You said yes, then I would point out to you that you are, in fact, recruiting an authority that overrides free thinking and therefore should not be taught to a child until said child has the ability to think for themselves that such an authority is valuable. 

B)  You said no, then I'd point out to you that the religion you practice does not demand strict adherence to any particular authority except free thinking, and I'd ask why you think a child should be taught to practice that religion at all (beyond the simple information of *what* it is).

In either case, the point I'm making is that an institution that expects fidelity to an authority over and above thinking critically is problematic\u2014especially for children who have not yet seen the value or proper education on free thinking.&gt;Something non-contingent.

You ignore this every time I bring it up so I'm just going to say it again here.  Contingent != "requires explanation".  Contingent just means "neither necessary nor impossible."

There can be dependent-contingent things (have an explanation) and independent-contingent things (spontaneous events).  

Your argument depends on the idea that *everything* is dependent-contingent.&gt;A. Contingent things have an explanation for their existence (practically follows from the definition of "contingent" as being dependent on other things for its existence)

Only if you subscribe to the strongest form of the PSR.

&gt;B. Explanations cannot be circular (e.g., if you are going to explain the existence of elephants, you need to appeal to something other than elephants)

But they can be non-existent. I thought you subscribed to determinism? 

If so, it seems pretty trivial to point out that if god created the universe, and everything that happen/s/ed in the universe is based on exactly how it was made by god, then god is responsible for each and every even that occurs *in* that universe. &gt; Compatibilism, which is different.


No it isn't.  Compatibilism is about free will.  Free will *strictly under a deterministic universe*.  My comment was only about determinism, not free will. 

&gt;Are parents responsible for their children's sins? If not, why?

Because they were equally determined to create that child.I think what you mean by "default" position is that it is the most parsimonious and appears to be the "best" explanation by any abductive framework.  Since we naturally tend to think in abductive terms (sometimes to a fault), it intuitively *feels* default.

It's not so much *proof* against solipsism, but a pretty good case for saying that the world "really is" is the most reasonable conclusion.

In any case, I agree that the rejection of solipsism is a somewhat pragmatic, but reasonable, response (insofar as abduction and parsimonious conclusions are pragmatic). "Null hypothesis" is a bad term for what we're talking about, I agree.  But the spirit of what's being said isn't far from the mark.  What we can say is that rejection of solipsism is the most parsimonious answer, and under an abductive framework the "best explanation" appears to be that solipsism is False. 

It isn't one of those feel-good, rock-solid cases for a "default position" or rejection of solipsism, but it definitely seems to handle the claim that the rejection is the most reasonable position to take.Here's something that help in the future ;). 

1.  Abductive reasoning is a sub-form of induction (largely considered more respectable and reasonable) that takes the "best explanation" to be True. 

2.  The most parsimonious answer is often the best explanation (see Occam's Razor, for instance). 

3.   Given what we do and don't know w.r.t. solipsism, the most parsimonious response is that reality "is as we perceive it". 

4.  Therefore, by abductive reasoning we conclude that the rejection of solipsism is the most reasonable. 

The reason you think it's "default" to reject it is because we naturally tend to think in abductive and parsimonious terms without realizing it.  Sometimes induction can be a bad thing (e.g. no black swans, "if P-&gt;Q, Q, therefore P")\u2014and it certainly can't *disprove* anything with full certainty.

However, this is probably why it feels so intuitive to say rejecting solipsism is the default position, and why it feels more reasonable to reject than to accept it.  It arguably *is* "default" in some respect, but simply because it is the best explanation that we concluded on long, long ago. &gt;See, you're saying it's not about free will, but you're talking about responsibility, and that because the parents were determined to do something, they have no responsibility.

The free will of the parents is (at least mostly) irrelevant to the child, but the free will of god is 100% accountable.

The responsibility changes depending on what the agent has control over.  The parents do not have control over 

-  how the child's brain is configured,
-  the surrounding environment *every second of every day*,
-  the physiological components that affect motive and drive,
-  what the child dreams about, the health of the child,
-  etc... 

God does.  Any one of these things will change the outcome of the child's life entirely under a deterministic framework. 

Therefore, the parents cannot "will/change/claim ownership over" the child's outcome in the same way god can, not even remotely close, in fact. 

As a more concrete example, to some degree we hold Charles Manson's "family" accountable, because they were coerced, not forced, to commit murder.  But they did seem to be somewhat manipulated outside of their control.  If Manson never existed and they still murdered, we'd hold those "family" members completely responsible.  If Manson had mind-control devices he planted in their brains, we'd hold Manson solely responsible. 

Responsibility is directly related to one's control over the situation.  By comparison, the parents are determined to act a certain way, cannot control a near infinite number of factors that will affect the child's behavior, etc.  God, in every respect, has free agency over these things, and is therefore entirely responsible for the outcomes of both the parents' successes and failures, as well as the child itself. 
&gt; "Contingent" means the explanation is not found in the thing itself.

As long as you admit that this explanation can be non-existent (you don't seem to), your definition doesn't conflict with the philosophical standard one:

From old wikipedia: 
&gt;&gt;In philosophy and logic, contingency is the status of propositions that are neither True under every possible valuation (i.e. tautologies) nor False under every possible valuation (i.e. contradictions).

&gt;If it were, then it would be necessary, not contingent.

This is also False.  If A necessarily entails B, and A exists necessarily, then B exists necessarily as well.  B is necessary, but it's explanation is found in A.  

&gt;And yes, this presupposes a version of the PSR (though not the Rationalist one, necessarily).

A very strong one.  One that does not fare well in most philosophical circles because the scope is well beyond what most advocates of the PSR would care to argue.  Even Kant's argument for the PSR is limited to *within* physical spacetime.

&gt;Spontaneous events are absolutely contingent. 

Yes, that's why I said it.  But they don't have an *explanation* behind them.  Which means that your argument is undone, because we can say that the universe/multiverse exists without explanation (especially atemporally).

&gt;For example, virtual particles are contingent on the existence of a vacuum, energy, and instability in the energy field. Take any of those away, and you won't have virtual particles. 

This is not what it means to be, *in principle*, spontaneous (read: *uncaused*).  This is simply another example of a dependent-contingent event which is separate from the independent-contingent (uncaused) events of which I am referring.  Let's stay on topic.

&gt;You are presupposing a Humean event causation: that all causes must be preceding events

Never once did I even invoke Hume.  I'm interested only in your definition of "contingent" and its dependency on an overly assertive PSR.  Let's stay on topic.


No worries.  You can just write a new reply so I know it's been updated.  edit: Where's Pruss? Did you forget a link?

&gt; Not really, no.

Do you believe that *every* contingent event requires an explanation?  If so, you subscribe to literally the strongest form of PSR possible.  If not, which events are exempt?

&gt;That's not True at all. The rationalist PSR is both defended and rejected.

The form you take on is largely rejected (now and from before) because it oversteps the bounds of what can be even known about.  The threshold of our knowledge is limited by what is *in* spacetime, so to demand explanation of things crossing this threshold (such as "why do things exist versus nothing at all") overstep this bound. 

&gt;Spontaneous doesn't mean uncaused, unless you are presupposing Humean event causation, which you are.

Ok, then let's retrace exactly what I said from before you can actually understand what I wrote: 

Contingency (in and of itself) allows for uncaused events.  Only under the strictest form of the PSR can you say that this *always impossible*.

And again, this is unrelated to Hume.

&gt;You are implicitly presuppsing it, by saying that no event precedes a spontaneous event and therefore it is uncaused. 

It doesn't have to be Humean.  It can be any form of causation that limits its requirements to a general, as opposed to a universal, principle.

&gt;But Aristotelians see causes as things, not events.

This has nothing to do with the only two things I'm interested in:

1.  Contingency in and of itself allows for uncaused events.

2.  (1) can be rejected *only* if you assert that every event must have a cause (itself or otherwise), which falls squarely in the camp of an overly stringent PSR. 

Your return to quantum particles is completely irrelevant to me, because I don't disagree that they had a cause.  I'm talking only about uncaused things (which, by the way, are often considered synonymous with "spontaneous," so this clarification is only for your understanding).
&gt; I have not explored all variants of PSR in depth

Are you saying you don't know what you believe about this?  That's a big problem if you care to believe the argument from contingency is sound.

If you don't have any commitments whatsoever to the PSR, you should stop arguing for contingency, because it very much requires a certain form of the PSR be True.

&gt;Incorrect.

Citation needed.  From the SEP:

&gt;&gt;The Principle seems at first sight to have a strong intuitive appeal\u2014we always ask for explanations\u2014yet it is taken by many to be too bold and expensive due to the radical implications it seems to yield. 

and 

&gt;&gt;In the Critique of Pure Reason (1781, 1787), Kant claims to provide a proof for the PSR by showing that \u201cthe PSR is the ground of possible experience, namely the objective cognition of appearances with regards to their relation in the successive series of time\u201d...Yet, this argument also restricts the validity of the PSR to human experience

.

&gt;This presumes a Kantian view, which begs the question.

Begs what question?  What can be known?  If you claim you can know about things beyond spacetime, specifically relating to causality and the PSR, you're going to need to demonstrate that. 

&gt;&gt;Contingency (in and of itself) allows for uncaused events.

&gt;Incorrect.

Lol, what?  Are you serious right now?  This is a patently False retort. Do you not read the definition of "contingent" I provided that is the philosophical and logical standard?

Contingency means "neither impossible nor necessary," that's it.  Full stop.  An uncaused event certainly needn't be impossible nor necessary, *unless* you also package in a strong form of the PSR, which is by no means required when talking about contingency in and of itself. 

&gt;You are assuming implicitly that a "cause" must be a preceding event,

No I'm not.  Stop putting words in my mouth.  I'm only talking about contingency and the PSR.  I even mentioned long before that contingency is still relevant even atemporally. 

&gt;saying that spontaneous events do not have preceding events,

I'm saying that uncaused events (a subset of spontaneous events) do not have a cause.  By definition, they would not have a preceding/primary/explanatory source.  Time need not be invoked here. 

&gt;This is Humean, whether you are aware of it or not.

And, as I've been saying every time now, *not relevant* what I'm talking about. I'm simply talking about entities and their explanation, and whether the latter requires the former.  Full stop.  

Are you sure you know what you're talking about?

&gt;I never said I believe the contingency argument is sound.

So you admit that it isn't?  If you don't then you need to defend it, because as it is, it's been undermined.

What about the argument from actuality/potentiality that requires all potentials be actualized?  Lacking a rigorous PSR also undermines this argument as well. 

&gt;It "refutes" Aristotelianism by assuming a non-Aristotelian epistemology/metaphysics.

No it doesn't. His argument only addresses that which is epistemologically trivial to know about (the empirical), that doesn't mean he excludes the possibility of knowing beyond that, simply that his argument doesn't go so far as to support it.

If you think it *is* possible to derive knowledge/make an argument beyond this with respect to the PSR, you should make that case.

&gt;...which is part of the Aristotelian worldview.

So you're saying you *do* subscribe to the strictest form of the PSR?  And world views still need to be defended.

Or are you saying you accept a world view but still don't know what you believe about the PSR (which you now say is a part of that world view)?  That sounds like you haven't rigorously thought through your own world view.

If it requires a certain view of the PSR and you haven't thought through the PSR sufficiently, then you should probably withhold committing to that world view, no?

&gt;Right, but on an Aristotelian worldview, quantum events do have a cause.

I said I *didn't* disagree (in other words, I agree that quantum events have a cause). I'm specifically talking about uncaused events (separate from quantum events).

You're the one who brought it up as an example, and I long ago said it was irrelevant for the very reason that I agree they have a cause.

1.  Where did you Pruss article go, the one that said that necessity is equivalent to an entity explaining itself?  

2.  I assume your noticeable silence to the response about what it means to be contingent means you actually *do* agree that contingency, in and of itself, allows for uncaused entities/events.&gt; I didn't say that either.

Ok, let's make it even simpler.  Let's go with "reasonable."  How can you say the argument is even reasonable if it depends on a mode of PSR you are incapable of defending (and apparently haven't thought much through)?

&gt;No, it hasn't.

You've been unable to pinpoint your belief about the PSR, we've established that the argument depends on a very specific form of the PSR, and according to all the sources I've provided, that form is largely rejected in philosophical circles.

If you don't see that as undermined, I'm not sure how much more cognitive dissonance I can show you before I'm forced to conclude that you aren't really believing things for reasonable reasons. 


&gt;&gt;So you're saying you do subscribe to the strictest form of the PSR?

&gt;No.

Great! So which contingent entities/events do you believe can exist uncaused?

&gt;&gt;That sounds like you haven't rigorously thought through your own world view.

&gt;I don't have a worldview at the moment.

What? Even if it isn't categorically *a single* classified world view, everybody has some world view.  Everyone has beliefs about reality.  What are yours? 

&gt;I haven't' committed to anything.

So you reject Aristotelian metaphysics as being reasonably True?  That is, you accept it's an open question, and what Aristotelian metaphysics informs us of cannot be accepted as *True* until it can be more rigorously defended? 

&gt;There would be no such thing on an Aristotelian picture.

Right, because as you said the Aristotelian picture depends on a strict form of the PSR. So why should you, or anybody, consider the arguments from Aristotelian metaphysics as reasonably True if it depends on an overly-stringent form of the PSR?

&gt;You mentioned spontaneous events, of which the main examples have causes.

And then I narrowed the scope to *uncaused* events/entities.  So the continual talk of Hume/quantum causes was completely irrelevant. 

&gt;http://alexanderpruss.com/papers/LCA.html

Holy text wall batman!

A lot of this is just about the PSR, of which the SEP addresses [here](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/cosmological-argument/#3.4) and elsewhere. 

Concerning what this article was *supposed* to be about... Pruss doesn't seem to argue that necessary things must be self-explanatory, but merely that necessary things don't need to entail other things necessarily.  Unless you can actually point out where Pruss refutes my actual claim: 

&gt;&gt;If A *necessarily* entails B, and A exists necessarily, then B exists necessarily as well.

Or more formally:

    ([](A-&gt;B) and []A)-&gt;[]B.


In fact, that's *exactly* the formulation provided [here](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/logic-modal/#ModLog) describing a basic axiom of formal logic.  

So to reign this back in to the relevance from where it started, the claim that necessary things means they always explain themselves is patently False. 

&gt;&gt;I assume your noticeable silence to the response about what it means to be contingent means you actually do agree that contingency, in and of itself, allows for uncaused entities/events.

&gt;Incorrect.

Then your inability to defend it against valid arguments means you believe something False.
I'm no good at being not good.&gt; Why would my individual unwillingness to converse with you have anything to do with whether the PSR is True or not?

We're in the business of getting to that.  And I've raised some valid contentions that seem to imply the PSR cannot be True insofar as you stringently need it to be. 

There are glaring issues that you are either unwilling or incapable to defend.  I have no way of knowing if your unwillingness is simply a thinly veiled incapability\u2014especially since it happens so often with you when valid issues are raised\u2014and so far as I can tell, these glaring issues are real problems for your position.

I'm forced to conclude that you do not, in fact, have an answer, and as such hold an unreasonable position.  In fact, your unwillingness to address the counter-points makes the whole of your claims intellectually dishonest.

&gt;&gt;we've established that the argument depends on a very specific form of the PSR

&gt;Incorrect.

Your inability to see it doesn't make it so.  If a contingent thing *can* exist uncaused, then the argument from contingency fails (by virtue of "brute fact" entities).  The only way a contingent thing *can't* (impossibly so) exist uncaused is if the PSR is True in the strictest sense.  These are all matters of fact, not opinion. 

&gt;&gt;Everyone has beliefs about reality. What are yours?

&gt;This is not relevant.

It's relevant if you want to be intellectually honest about arguments you claim are reasonable. It is when you come onto subs like this and start saying that the Contingency Argument is perfectly reasonable or sound (which you have, in the past) but are unwilling to show exactly how valid criticisms of your "sound" argument fail.  

If you don't want to be intellectually honest, far be it from me to stop you, it just further entrenches my opinion that you aren't actually able to account for the criticisms raised to your beliefs. 

&gt;&gt;So you reject Aristotelian metaphysics as being reasonably True?

&gt;Nope.

So you *do* think it's reasonably True? More so than other metaphysical frameworks?

Then you have a problem, because the PSR, *irrespective* of the metaphysical framework, suffers from some glaring issues.  And, according to you, a strong form of the PSR "is part of the Aristotelian worldview." ([source](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateAChristian/comments/3v0c00/if_god_wants_us_to_believe_in_his_existence_why/cxkqp91))  So it seems to me that is the strongest forms of the PSR are problematic, then there's something wrong with your world view. 

&gt;&gt;So which contingent entities/events do you believe can exist uncaused?

&gt;I haven't said they can.

Serious question: are you a troll? There's no way someone with this much confidence in their position can be this blind to a well-established, philosophical definition.  Even Feser describes strong, meaningful definitions of the PSR to say "no brute facts exist."  If you *don't* subscribe to this view, then necessarily you consider that it's *possible* (at least in theory) that some events/entities are uncaused (brute facts).

I'm not really interested in playing ELI5.  If you can't comprehend this basic definition and what it means to accept/reject it, then I'm convinced you just don't know what you're talking about.

&gt;&gt;Right, because as you said the Aristotelian picture depends on a strict form of the PSR

&gt;No it doesn't.

So your belief in the PSR depends on your Aristotelian picture?  That's still problematic (for two reasons): (1) as I said before, irrespective of worldview, the PSR in its strongest forms suffers some very issues, and (2) how do you go about proving all composite actuals *need to be actualized* from other actuals if you haven't established that all actuals need an explanation?  

I highly recommend you actually sit down and write out, from the bottom up, what your initial assumptions are, check whether those are actually True/factual, and then build from there.  As it is, you've got lots of obvious circular reasoning going on.  The posts on your sub jump too far down the chain of assumptions, and the circular reasoning is (apparently) already there.

&gt;&gt;So why should you, or anybody, consider the arguments from Aristotelian metaphysics as reasonably True if it depends on an overly-stringent form of the PSR?

&gt;It doesn't.

See above.

&gt;&gt;So the continual talk of Hume/quantum causes was completely irrelevant.

&gt;No it's not

You need to support this position more thoroughly.  So far you've just been strawmanning an argument about causality, when I've only been interested in the PSR (full-picture). 

&gt;&gt;Unless you can actually point out where Pruss refutes my actual claim:

&gt;He addresses it in the Van Inwagen section.

No he doesn't.  And in fact, he *can't*. Because the statement I made is literally an axiom of modal logic.  Are you really sure you know what you're talking about?

&gt;&gt;the claim that necessary things means they always explain themselves is patently False.

&gt;Incorrect.

You need to back this claim besides hand-waving.  The distribution axiom of modal logic would like a word with you.

&gt;I have no willingness to converse with you, but you clearly have Aspbergers otherwise you would be able to tell that from my short answers.

I'm just hoping one day you sit squarely with yourself that a lot of what you're saying around here is either misinformed, circular, or unfounded.  In a self-masochistic way, I'm trying to help you see the cracks in your own positions, but you seem to think you already have it all figured out, despite what tons of literature says on a plethora of subjects directly or indirectly related to what you think you know about.

*Something about taking a horse to water...*&gt;&gt; We're in the business of getting to that.

&gt; What?

The whole topic is about the validity of the PSR.

&gt;&gt;There are glaring issues that you are either unwilling or incapable to defend.

&gt;Not True. Just not to you.

Right, of course, because my contentions you're actually incapable of defending. 

And you know, even *if* I believed that you could, that you actually understood the criticisms and what they said about your argument, that still doesn't detract from you being intellectually dishonest for failing to present the defense. 

&gt;&gt;I've raised some valid contentions that seem to imply the PSR cannot be True insofar as you stringently need it to be.

&gt;It doesn't need to be.

You don't seem to understand the problem then.  If you did, you'd have actually addressed it by now.

&gt;&gt;especially since it happens so often with you when valid issues are raised

&gt;Valid issues have been raised and responded by reference.

And have been responded to in turn.  Did you not read the SEP articles I linked that directly addressed Pruss's arguments for the PSR? 

For that matter, I found Pruss's argument not wholly adequate in and of itself, but that would involve diving into the text, and I know how hard that is for you. 

&gt;&gt;these glaring issues are real problems for your position.

&gt;Answered already

Nope.

&gt;&gt;I'm forced to conclude that you do not, in fact, have an answer

&gt;Believe what you want. You will anyway. So goes human stubbornness.

I believe what the evidence tells me.  You seem to have a different metric.

&gt;&gt;The only way a contingent thing can't (impossibly so) exist uncaused is if the PSR is True in the strictest sense.

&gt;Not True.

...That's the definition of the PSR.  Everything must have a cause/explanation.  Otherwise it's completely logically possible to have uncaused things.

&gt;&gt;as such hold an unreasonable position

&gt;I do not hold a position.

So you're a radical skeptic? Or an agnostic?  Time to change that flair buddy.

&gt;&gt;It's relevant if you want to be intellectually honest

&gt;False.

Great argument.  I'm convinced now.  Is this how you came to your initial set of beliefs?

&gt;&gt;Then you have a problem, because the PSR, irrespective of the metaphysical framework, suffers from some glaring issues.

&gt;No it doesn't.

You're disagreeing with the SEP now?  Care to write an expose on how the collective philosophical minds of some of the world's best institutions have something wrong and you don't?

&gt;&gt;And, according to you, a strong form of the PSR "is part of the Aristotelian worldview."

&gt;False.

And that's proof that you're either a troll or completely confused about what you think.  Or rather, [here's](https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateAChristian/comments/3v0c00/if_god_wants_us_to_believe_in_his_existence_why/cxkqp91) the proof.  You seem to dislike reading, so [here's](http://imgur.com/IFaa8uu) a picture of your exact words highlighted where you said the opposite of what you're saying now. 

&gt;&gt;Even Feser describes strong, meaningful definitions of the PSR to say "no brute facts exist."

&gt;That's not a strong PSR.

It's sufficiently strong to be problematic.  And [here's](http://edwardfeser.blogspot.com/2014/10/could-theist-deny-psr.html) Feser's direct quote: 

&gt;&gt;Suppose that any version of PSR worthy of the name must entail that there are no \u201cbrute facts\u201d

Most philosophers consider this too strong. 

&gt;&gt;how do you go about proving all composite actuals need to be actualized from other actuals if you haven't established that all actuals need an explanation?

&gt;Read Feser's books. But first, be sure to whine about how I need to retype all of Feser's books here from scratch because otherwise I'm "not debating."

If you can't explain it simply, then you don't really understand it, do you?

&gt;&gt;So your belief in the PSR

&gt;I told you I do not have such a belief.

How do you find the ground in the morning when you stand up?  You have already stated that a strong form of the PSR is a part of the Aristotelian worldview (see citation above).  You believe in the Aristotelian world view (if you don't then you're wasting a whole lot of time on that sub of yours).

Yet somehow, you *don't* hold a belief about something that's a *part* of that world view\u2014and very clearly necessary for the contingency argument and argument from motion.

Tell me this isn't a joke. 

&gt;&gt;you've got lots of obvious circular reasoning going on.

&gt;Nonsense.

Well of course *you* don't think so.  But you're equally unwilling to find out if it's there, so live in perpetual confusion I guess.

&gt;&gt;See above.

&gt;Where?

If you can't figure it out, it probably explains why you have a hard time missing your own circular arguments...

&gt;&gt;You need to support this position more thoroughly.

&gt;I dont need to do anything except stay black and die.

Of course you don't, but you can't escape being intellectually dishonest in the process.  Such is your fate, I guess. 

&gt;&gt;So far you've just been strawmanning an argument about causality,

&gt;It's not a strawman.

You don't know what you're talking about at all anymore... And until you actually justify this functional equivalent "nuh-uh", the point still stands. 

&gt;&gt;No he doesn't.

&gt;Yes he does. Multiple paragraphs on it, in fact.

I want you to say, right here and now, that you think Pruss is refuting an *axiom* of modal logic (the one I've been citing).  Namely, the distributive axiom.  Say it, then cite the *exact* paragraphs where he does.

&gt;&gt;Because the statement I made is literally an axiom of modal logic

&gt;Incorrect.

How is this not the axiom of distribution?  [](A-&gt;B)-&gt;([]A-&gt;[]B). 

Or, in plain english, if, necessarily, A entails B, then if A is necessary, so is B. 

B necessarily exists, because the entailing is necessary and A is necessary.  

If you don't see that that's *exactly* what I've been saying from the beginning, well, more proof you really don't know what you're talking about. 

&gt;&gt;You need to back this claim besides hand-waving.

&gt;I don't need to do anything but stay black and die.

Sure, continue being wrong.  I find it entertaining.

&gt;&gt;I'm just hoping one day you sit squarely with yourself that a lot of what you're saying around here is either misinformed, circular, or unfounded.

&gt;It's not. This is all in your fevered imagination, and nowhere else.

Until you're willing to show me where, and *exactly* why, I think the delusion rests elsewhere.

&gt;&gt;I'm trying to help you see the cracks in your own positions,

&gt;Since I don't have one, you can't.

And there it is. Oh hubris, you delight me so. 

&gt;&gt;you seem to think you already have it all figured out

&gt;I don't have a position, nor have I figured anything out.

Is your modus operandi to just not make any sense?  Maybe there's two people behind that keyboard. 

&gt;&gt;tons of literature says on a plethora of subjects directly or indirectly related to what you think you know about.

&gt;Incorrect.

Whoa, Cotton, there's another bold, unsubstantiated claim coming out of right field.  Really adds to the believability that you know what you're talking about.

Clearly this is spinning at this point.  I'll just chalk this up as another end of thread you've failed to defend you claims on.

Show up with some citations or *direct responses* to the most recent issues I've raised, or consider this over.  And simply stating "I have" is going to prove to me you don't even know the things you've failed to address yet.



&gt;I'm more in the business of using solipsism as a weapon to attack "atheism is the None hypothesis, I don't need to defend it" type claims.

I think this actually also falls in line with parsimonious "best" explanations.  We assume it as "default" because it comes naturally to reject something that lacks evidence, but the reason behind this is that the best explanation seems like the most parsimonious one.  If parsimony turns out to be a *True* metric of "best explanation", then it stands to reason that it really is the default position.  Proving that is another matter, however (see below).

----------------------------------

&gt; Although now that I think about it, I'm not sure that appeals to parsimony or abductive reasoning get us all the way there - we'd need to justify our belief that it's reasonable to choose a position based solely off of abductive inference. 

Well there's the real rub ;). 

There's actually some decent arguments on why abductive reasoning is epistemologically acceptable.  One branch tends to show that it's somewhat rigorous like Bayesian methods, which lends itself to an analytic appeal. Another attempts to show that abductive reasoning has been valuable in getting to the truth of the empirical world (science, for instance). Another argues that we can use abductive reasoning reflexively to see that it works\u2014the debate is ongoing about that one for sure. 

None have made a definitively strong case, however. 

&gt;But we stall out a bit at the "solipsist skepticism" phase in trying to find justification for our meta-theoretical selection criteria (i.e. parsimony).

And one of the biggest criticisms of abductive reasoning (so much so that some consider it just a flavor of induction) is that "best explanation" is so poorly defined or justified. 

We can take the pragmatic approach and say "this seems to be working," in conjunction with arguments that make a good case for it.  But it may just be one of those things that can't really be known.  &gt;&gt;Nope.

&gt;All I have to do is stay black and die.

Troll confirmed. 

&gt;&gt;Show up with some citations or direct responses to the most recent issues I've raised, or consider this over. And simply stating "I have" is going to prove to me you don't even know the things you've failed to address yet.

&gt;Yes.

Double confirmed. 

Don't worry, I'm screencapping this comment for all of eternity so nobody else ever wastes their time. 

edit: [screencaps forever](http://imgur.com/a/hjWk8)
&gt;No, it's fine. I have perfectly reasonable conversations with others

Only one of us is giving asshole replies.  80% of that previous reply was nonsense gibberish.  How very mature and Christ-like of you. 

&gt; You are the common denominator because you are hell bent on splintering every comment into a thousand HUGE topics. Conversation with you is impossible.

Did you already forget the *two* things I'm interested in? 

1.  That the Contingency argument depends on a stringent form of the PSR.

2.  That the stringent form of the PSR required for the argument is philosophically dubious at best. 

You've been the one splintering about quantum causes, Aristotelian worldviews, Pruss (who was addressed), etc. 

Stay on topic next time. 

&gt;Conversation with you is impossible.

It's going to be impossible when you don't understand when and how to address well-established criticisms to positions you take.&gt;Which, y'know, is what I'm aiming for: my main target is views which allow atheists to bottle up and claim the argumentative high ground without having to say a word.

Yeah I get that.  The whole "lack of belief" thing gets a little evasive.

&gt;Solipsism is empirically equivalent and doesn't claim existence of an external world, badabing badaboom.

That is True, but then I'd say when fully unpacked it does make less parsimonious claims (our brain maintains a universe running even when we aren't conscious, etc.). :).

&gt;The other two worry me in this context - the reflexive thing gives me the Circularity Spookies and the utility/science thing does in connection with solipsism.

Yeah the key here is it's argued that it's not *viciously* circular.  Which means that the conclusion of the proof isn't inherent in the premises, but that we can *use* the method to determine more about reality.  It's sort of complicated, and I'm not entirely sold on it myself, but I think it's a creative answer. 

The utility one is purely pragmatic.  But maybe pragmatism is ok in certain contexts.  After all, we reject moral conclusions if it doesn't sit well with us, and that's usually the only reason given. 

&gt;I'm not sure if the OP did this exactly but I've always thought that pragmatism opens the door to a breed of theist arguments in favor of life improvement, damn the truth.

It can certainly attempt to make that claim.  The key is that pragmatism should be a last resort, and given this plus the messiness that comes with theism I'm not sure how long that door can stay ajar. 

&gt;At the very least I bet I can lay out a good argument as to why we should all be meditating.

That's probably True regardless.  I can see a Utilitarian argument and  a Virtue Ethics argument.  

&gt;Of course, I can gladly agree that pragmatic considerations would justify abduction.1

Yay practicality! 

[1] Have you ever noticed that this is also the word for "a taking away" as in "alien abduction"? That's just weird.

Oh so weird.  I've never noticed it's the same word.  Just like "windy day" vs. "windy road".  I pronounce one "ABducshun" and the other "ubDUCshun".

&gt; And here we go again. Splinter one smal comment into 3 x 1010 extra topics. It's exponential!

What do you mean?  It's the two things I listed. 

&gt;I suggest you read Pruss' response to this, which is section "2.3.2. Van Inwagen\u2019s modal fatalism argument" in the article I linked, but I'm not going to discuss this with you at all. 

And I suggest you read the SEP's criticism of Cosmological Arguments that directly criticizes Pruss's arguments (from that piece, even) about the PSR but *I'm not going to be discussing them with you at all*.

&gt;Again, I have zero problems getting into good, in-depth conversations with most others on reddit. The problem is with you, not me.

Yet I splinter with nobody else.  And in the last two comments (prior to these), *you* splintered each of my sentences into nonsense answers of "yup" and "nope" and "wherefore".  Hey pot, meet kettle.&gt; It doesn't look possible to me, so you're going to have to explain how it is. I can't conceive of it.

Let's take an event E.  Either it was caused or uncaused, right?  Both are logically possible. All I'm saying is that it's (logically) possible there exists an E that was uncaused. 

What's not to understand? 

&gt;Falsifiability only refers to what can be shown to be False empirically.

[No it doesn't... ](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Falsifiability)

&gt;&gt;A statement is called falsifiable if it is possible to conceive an observation *or an argument* which proves the statement in question to be False.

In fact, you can just read [this](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Falsifiability#Mathematics).

&gt;I don't accept that there can be independent contingent things.

I'm sorry to hear you disagree with logic.

&gt;Please demonstrate this.

I did.  By pointing out that it is logically possible (do you know what logically possible means?).  Do you disagree that they are logically possible? You need to prove that, because, by simple definition, it is logically possible for anything to exist with or without an explanation. You need to prove otherwise, for any and all given events, E, a cause *must* entail it.  Good luck with that.  

&gt;I have many times. In fact, I've occasionally made exactly the same arguments you are. Here for example.

So you understand it, but don't see how logical possibility refutes necessitation?  How much of modal logic have you studied?  You seem displeased with S5, that's already a red flag to me. 

&gt;Is there a meaningful difference between a premise being False and a premise being non-factual?

More precisely, there's a difference between a premise being *known* to be False and non-factual.  Open questions are non-factual, but not necessarily False. God exists as a premise for other arguments (like it's nature) come to mind. 

Any premise about the history or the past or what I'm currently thinking (according to an outsider) are other examples. 

&gt;Go on? How is it not a fact?

It's an open question, and disputable to say the least.  The very fact that Kant can raise such objections demonstrates that, at minimum, it's an open question.  

&gt;If the term "positive" is putting you off, just say that the property is in the set A or something.

But that's precisely my point.  The term "positive" carries a lot of baggage that makes the argument problematic.  With that baggage removed, we see that the argument actually "proves" many many gods. 

&gt;Is it? I don't think so. Let's modify the properties a bit to make it clearer:
Omnipotence: the ability to do anything that is well-defined
Omniscience: the ability to learn any piece of information

Yeah, let's use omnipotent "rock" instead.  We could say instead that the rock is *capable* to do anything, but lacks any *knowledge* of that ability, and therefore remains a rock.  

You *might* be able to make the case that Omnipotence (P) entails Omniscience (S) depending on how you frame what is actually *done* with that potency (after all, just because it *can* be done, does that mean that it *is*?).  I'd actually still be hard pressed to accept it, but if it were so, then what we'd *really* say is that omniscience is a subset of omnipotence.

The bigger problem I have is that the properties you mentioned don't really have intelligible negatives as they're framed.  Are non-omniscient things lacking all knowledge, or at least one piece?  I better way to frame them would be: "the set of all things that can be done" and "the set of all facts".  Clearly then we see that one does not entail the other (or maybe it does), but clearly too, we've just made the case for a nearly infinite number of gods who can do/know all but one thing, two things, etc. all the way down to 0. 

&gt;A good argument!

Thanks!

&gt; The doctrine of divine simplicity holds that each of God's attributes are identical, and are identical with God Himself (Obviously this requires somewhat more sophisticated definitions than what I've given above for omniscience and omnipotence)

Yes, my first question as I was reading this was what this means exactly. 

&gt;In this case, the inverse positive set that you construct isn't really meaningful. You will tell us that there necessarily exists a thing that is not God.

Right, the one issue is when we start talking about properties wherein the "negative" is possibly unintelligible.  Part of the problem is that "ability" and "knowledge" arguably aren't really properties insofar as we conceive of them when we think of the proof.  Under the Identity principle, is the person who knows a new fact the same as one who didn't a second ago?  I'd say definitely yes, which seems to imply that knowledge isn't really an essential property (same goes for potency).

Furthermore, is the fact that negation simply means non-existent (ie., not a contra-property) really a problem?  It seems to me that if we're allowed to treat the *presence* of something as a property (e.g. the presence of knowledge or power), then we can equally do so for the *lack* of said presence.  In which case, I'd say non-omnipotence and non-omniscience are still acceptable. 

In other words, I'd need a more rigorous definition of omni-x to get a better understanding of why one things it's necessary :). 

&gt;Platonism presents the same problem, as abstract objects seem to necessarily exist without God. So it's not enough to get me to reject Godel's argument.

Wait are you saying you are a Platonist?  I'm not following here. 

&gt;How so? Remember we're discussing whether or not necessary existence is a property. I agree that existence doesn't seem to be, Kant makes good arguments there. Can they be similarly used against necessary existence? How?

Under modal logic, necessary is defined as that which is True for all accessible worlds.  If in no world it is logically possible to be False, then it is necessary.  Under this framework, to prove necessity, one must prove that it is *impossible* for it to be False under any condition.  I'm not even sure how that can be done for a property.  One can certainly attempt to *define* it in such a way, but that doesn't make it factually True.The SEP writes in *response* to Pruss.  Your job is to respond to the argument, or provide other responses that address the criticisms. 

Did you not understand that's how philosophical arguments work? &gt;(Doesn't any philosophy that assumes determinism necessarily preclude the existence of evil by the way?)

Not at all.  Evil just means excessive badness, and compatibilism allows for moral responsibility in a deterministic framework (excessive\u2014or willful, as you seem to equate it\u2014badness is possible). 

&gt;So isn't the easy answer to the problem just that God thinks allowing people agency is worth allowing evil to exist?

But saying that doesn't really solve the problem.  If a perfectly healthy and able-bodied father stands by and watches his daughter get raped while he could stop it at any minute just to "let her learn a lesson on her own" or "allow the attacker to make their own choices," that's still pretty obviously evil.

You'd have to go further and demonstrate *why* making one's own choices is more valuable even at the expense of innocent people for no clear gain in that moment. 

&gt;If I stumble on some berries in the woods, I think myself fortunate but no "good" has been done.

If "good" is dependent on intention, then sure. 

&gt;The difference is that he chose it.

I'd say the difference was that there was intention. 

&gt;From my perspective, if you don't allow choice to exist, then you don't allow good to exist and you can't allow choice to exist in any meaningful sense without allowing evil to exist. 

It depends on what you mean by choice. And allowing *others* to do good or evil is not the same as being good or evil yourself.  You can sit back and watch third-world countries commit genocide on one another, but I don't think that's a moral "good" simply because you're letting them *choose* to rip each other apart. 

Allowing others to make choices grants them freedom (full-stop).  The question of the goodness of that freedom and where that freedom ends seems to be related to the problem of evil itself. 

&gt;Neither can exist without the other. Am I missing something here?

If we're talking about morals, then of course choice needs to be involved.  But I think it's a mistake to conflate *granting choice* to be inherently good itself.  Granting choice merely means others are capable of good or evil.  The case must still be made that the granting is morally good, and that prevention of evil choices is unjustified\u2014I'm not sure it is.&gt; Something is contingent when its existence (or its being in some particular state) is dependent upon some other thing--i.e. this other thing is the cause, and the existence or state of the first thing is the effect.

Isn't this an overly specific definition of contingent? My understanding is that "contingent" just means "neither impossible nor necessary."  To invoke the dependency requires an additional assumption that everything *requires* a source to begin with.... and isn't that the end-goal of the argument, making it circular?So I'm aware that the definition of "contingent" provided reflects the historical and required set up for the argument to function properly.  I guess a better way to phrase my question is: what justification is there for this definition?  

Isn't the setup still that there are either contingent or necessary things?  And, correct me if I'm wrong, isn't the basic idea that things are either self-explained (necessary), or dependent on something else as an explanation (contingent)?  

So under what category would uncaused/things lacking any explanation fall under?

It seems to me that if these uncaused things are left unaddressed, that's a problem for the argument.I guess what I'm saying is that the definitions of "necessary" and "contingent" under this context don't seem to cover the entire space of possible entities: namely, uncaused entities don't fit squarely (or at all, it seems) into "necessary" or "contingent" as they're framed.

I'm interested in whether these uncaused entities are ignored, forgotten, or justified as being irrelevant for some reason. (Or are they justified as some form of unusual "necessary" entity?)

&gt;&gt;Isn't the setup still that there are either contingent or necessary things?

&gt;I don't know what you're referring to here.

I'm asking if this argument allows for things that are neither "contingent" nor "necessary" given these established definitions.

&gt;You mean brute facts?

Right.

&gt;According to the proponent of the PSR (or a PSR-like principle), there aren't any such things. 

Yes, but as you know not everybody accepts the PSR (ie., they accept that brute facts are possible), so are you saying opponents of the PSR are justified in rejecting the Argument from Contingency because of the possibility of brute facts? 

In fact, isn't it therefore sufficient to provide a single instance of a possible brute fact (namely the existence of the Universe itself) to refute the argument from contingency?

&gt;According to the opponent of the PSR, there are things whose concept implies such a relation of dependence, i.e. which are contingent in this sense, yet where this relation is not satisfied by anything; that, while this results in nature failing to correspond to any adequate concept, as it is contingent upon things which exist and whose existence doesn't make sense without a cause and yet where there is no such cause, that that is perfectly fine, i.e. since they reject the norm according to which nature is expected to correspond to any adequate concept (i.e. the PSR, or a PSR-like principle).

This is probably because I'm biased because I don't accept the PSR, but I feel like this sounds more controversial than is actually so for opponents of the PSR (or PSR-like principle).  For one thing, I'm not convinced all contingent things imply a relation of dependence, unless we simply defer to the definition of "contingency" already established.  And that deferral seems counter-intuitive for certain entities (such as "why does the universe exist at all"). 

Secondly, this statement: *"while this results in nature failing to correspond to any adequate concept, as it is contingent upon things which exist and whose existence doesn't make sense without a cause and yet where there is no such cause"* seems (to me) to mischaracterize brute facts a little. I think there are brute facts wherein existence makes sense without a cause and there is no such cause. Stating otherwise seems to imply that brute facts are accepted controversially, because such a thing existing only makes sense if it has a cause.

But that could just be my bias speaking.&gt; No, but one of the main responses to the argument from contingency is to argue for brute facts.

Why aren't they justified? 

&gt;No, one would have to provide an instance of an actual brute fact.

Why is that? When talking about necessary existence, I thought the appropriate refutation can come from modal logic: namely, a logically possible counter-example sufficiently undermines posited necessary existence (in this case, of the PSR).  

Or in other words, it seems that the PSR depends on being necessarily True, but because I can construct a logically possible world of events (with at least one brute fact) that do not respect the PSR, the PSR cannot be necessarily True, and therefore, it's possible that it's not True in our world. 

Whether the defense is about the PSR being properly basic or derived from inductive arguments, I feel like the fact that it's logically possible for it to be False means more is required to make it acceptable. 

&gt;Then you're laboring under a misunderstanding, since if the concept of something considered in itself gives an adequate basis for its existing,

But what does it mean to say it has an adequate basis for its existing?  A thing existing uncaused seems to me to lack all basis whatsoever\u2014it simply is. But if we are to say that simply existing is an adequate basis then it seems to undermine the PSR altogether.
&gt;Such as a mass genocide of Christians orchestrated by Athiests? I know I'm not alone in this particular thought as a youth pastor from the states has been quoted saying this "There is nothing we can do to stop the spread of atheism but pray that they treat us better than we have treated them"

People will always be prone to "us vs. them" mentality.  That said, I don't think history is necessarily repeating itself. Rather, we as a society have become more accepting and tolerant than in the past.  The persecution of homosexuals, gentiles, etc. beforehand was due to a dogmatic look at differences in general, and that some differences were unjustifiably evil.  

There's nothing inherent in being secular that commands us to be violent, accusatory, etc. of religious people.  There's also nothing that commands us to be kind or nonviolent.

I think a proper education on morality and ethics is the deciding factor here, independent of one's religious affiliations or lack thereof.&gt; We haven't shown that the argument fails, all we've done is show that we understand the argument enough to see what would be involved in it's failing. It's one thing to understand what's involved in its failing, and another matter entirely to show that that's what is the case. Like if we agreed that had you taken the money from the bank you'd be a thief- this is not the same thing as agreeing that you're a thief.

Sure, but the acceptance that brute facts are possible *does* sufficiently demonstrate a failing, doesn't it?  I guess this question condenses into the questions below about whether a logical possibility dethrones the PSR sufficiently. 

&gt;Because something's being the case is it's actually being the case, and something's possibly being the case doesn't imply it's actually being the case.

Well, yes, I don't disagree. But it seems you're saying that the PSR is already accepted as the case unless shown otherwise (an actual brute fact is shown).  I'm not sure how one can get to that place.  Why must we think the PSR is actually the case?

And again, it's my understanding that the PSR depends on pure necessity as its support.  From what I gather you're saying a case can be made for metaphysical necessity that doesn't require a modal proof of pure necessity. How can this be done? 

&gt;If you can show that it's merely logically possible that the PSR is False, all this does is get your opponent to concede that the PSR is at most metaphysically necessary, which is probably what they had been saying all along in any case.

But what is the justification for it being metaphysically necessary if it's not purely necessary? A case would have to be made that the logically possible worlds that are removed from our consideration (those that have brute facts) do not include our own, actual world.  How is this done? 

&gt;But no one is going to want to say this, at the cost of abandoning all critical thinking whatsoever regarding the existence of anything whatsoever.

Why not? I'd like to say it. I think it perfectly reasonable to work under a methodological PSR without committing to it as a matter of fact. For natural phenomenon if serves a wholly valuable purpose.  But for questions that are seemingly not accessible to inquiry it seems only viciously circular to be unsettled that an explanation is not present.

For example, "Why is there something rather than nothing?" does not seem to be necessarily an intelligible question.  One does not need to give up critical thinking whatsoever to accept that some brute facts may be so, should they address questions beyond our investigative capacity.  And this is not to say one must even *commit* to the idea that the universe's existence is a brute fact, merely that arguments that depend on an explanation being there as their conclusion become undone.

&gt;What the proponent of brute facts says is not that something's existing is an adequate explanation of its existence (which would make brute facts impossible, when to the contrary they maintain that brute facts are actual), but rather that some things do not have an adequate explanation for their existence (i.e. are brute facts).

Sure, that's how I've understood it, and I'm perfectly ok with that.
Thanks a bunch!  I was in a spotty wifi section and I kept getting a connection error, though it wasn't clear if it had been posting.&gt;I take it that "purely" is your word for "logically", but I don't know why we'd be thinking of logical possibility here in the first place, as it seems to me that if the PSR holds, it holds on metaphysical rather than logical grounds.

Right, but under what justification for the metaphysical existence then? Just that intuitively it seems to remove critical thinking?

&gt;But anyway, if it holds on metaphysical grounds, surely that suffices for the argument from contingency, so it seems to me we're chasing a red herring here, and should invest our energies elsewhere.

Well, right, I agree.  I'm wondering how one justifies it metaphysically, if we're not delving into the argument for the PSR from a modal angle. 

&gt;As for what justification there is for the PSR, people give a variety of arguments for it, some empirical, in generally the form of appealing to its seeming to be the case in our experience

Right I take issue with that because it seems largely inductive\u2014overly so, in fact, when the questions we'd most like to answer seem fundamentally different than what we experience casually. I think there's a pretty well-established response to this angle.

&gt;others pragmatic or transcendental, in generally the form of appealing to its being a condition of rational inquiry (and to the pragmatic or transcendental value of rational inquiry)

Hm that's interesting to me, it seems to me like it actually limits what we can inquire about, since we rule out, without even considering, the possibility that the question at hand isn't even intelligible. 

&gt;and others metaphysical, in generally the form of asserting that nature is rational, or that norms of explanation be satisfied in norms of natural relations, or something like this.

Any good material for proponents of this perspective? I feel like it's the least-considered of the arguments I've heard for the PSR. 

&gt;If your position requires completely giving up on any reasoning about anything that occurs, I'm inclined to count this as a *reductio* rather than a defense of your position, and as the point at which we part ways

I'd disagree that it requires anything.  To the contrary, it leaves open a possibility that the contraposition is forced to reject. Specifically, if an explanation has yet to found, the appropriate response is to still investigate and seek an answer, but to hold in possibility that said explanation may not exist.  I think this characterization of "giving up" on seeking an explanation is a tad misplaced. 

&gt;But I'm concerned that this particular issue is getting us off track.

I'm only curious because I get the feeling you find the PSR more reasonable than not, and I'm curious why, since the argument from contingency seems to lend itself heavily to it :).

&gt;If your position requires completely giving up on any reasoning about anything that occurs,

To me it seems to require nothing. It simply leaves particular questions open whereas someone who does not consider brute facts a reasonable option is required follow a certain line of reasoning to a particular conclusion. To be most frank, the question "why is there something rather than nothing?" to me seems to have two possible answers: "that question is meaningless" or "a first cause/prime mover", but accepting the PSR means requiring us to limit our degree of inquiry by half.

&gt;But this is not the position of people who object to the argument from contingency by defending brute facts, so you ought to distinguish their position, which is a significant line of objection, from this position, which is not.

Well I'd say it wasn't mine exactly either. What I mean to say is that a) brute facts are logically possible (ie., worth considering when confronted with the premises for the argument from contingency, ie., "I'd like to say it", ie., "I'd like to say that rejecting the PSR can still be reasonable"), and b) perhaps a better\u2014or at least equally-reasonable\u2014conclusion when confronted with the question the contingency of the universe is that it is merely a brute fact.Let me start by saying I don't disagree at all with your analysis of Stalin's actions.  What I mean to say is that people are inclined to suffer from group-think, and that is something we should be wary of, no matter how we try to divide party lines (politically, religiously, intellectually, racially, sports-team affiliated). 

All I'm really trying to say is that it's always *possible* to persecute people of different faith (even atheists on christians), but that is True not because of the religious background, but because of our group-think weaknesses.  Which is why education is the best defense against persecution of anything.

I also agree that Christians are not institutionally persecuted in largely secular countries.Hm, while I see what you're saying about Leibniz's framing of the PSR to not be modally necessary but, rather, to emphasize a sort of moral necessity of things, I still don't see how one can justify the position that everything actual must be explained (viz. morally, by self vs. others, etc.).

It still seems that any definition of the PSR provided still precludes True brute facts (completely unexplained events), either by not recognizing them, or masking them as "self-explained," which is deceptively missing another sort of brute facts altogether which undermine the argument.

Or put another way, it seems Leibniz's framing succeeds in permitting *modally* contingent entities (but are, per se, morally necessary) which allow for "brute facts" of a sort, but fails to address brute facts of a different sort (those lacking explanation altogether).&gt; Surely the two options are "a first cause/prime mover" or "there is no answer".

Agreed. 

&gt; I'm not sure how there not being an answer makes the question itself meaningless.

I suppose one could say meaningless insofar as, if it has no answer, then pursuing further provides us with no new information, but I agree that it's probably not right saying the question is meaningless. 

Rather, I think the meaningless question is the followup from those who intuitively accept the PSR without realizing it.  That is, "But *why* does it have no answer?" is a meaningless question. 

I can only guess that you've seen this answer before because of the same sort of next-step overthinking that I just committed. 

Someone once told me they liked church, and that it wouldn't be the same without a common faith.  I disagree, as I think Ecumenical gatherings, christian atheist churches in the UK, etc. all still provide this service.

It wasn't a very good argument for religion, but it's the best I've seen.Well it's not even that.  Because community is still possible for reasons *beyond* "I believe in such-and-such god", so it's really a red-herring. First time doing this, please be nice. 

Assumptions: your title is truthful and the timestamp is accurate, the room you are photographing is your own. 

Known (obvious): You are PC a gamer living in the United Kingdom, and you've just finished dinner. You apparently adore My Little Pony and are interested in game design. You sometimes write with a fountain pen.

Suspected:

-  You are living in a shared residence, most likely college related, but this room is private; in any case your residence there is temporary\u2014you do not expect to reside there indefinitely. 

-  You're almost certainly right handed (at least, if not ambidextrous)

-  You prefer to sleep under cooler conditions, and on your side.

-  Most likely male

-  above average height

Little evidence to go on: 

-  Single

-  Average weight

---------------------------------------------------------

Explanation.  Given the assumptions, it was pretty easy getting the location: the darkness outside told me it was night (or early morning) but the electrical outlet told me everything I needed to know. The gaming was beyond obvious, probably don't need to explain that or the my little pony affiliation.  

I deduced you were interested in game design because I saw a box of what looked like a Unity kit in your drawer.  The fountain pen ink made for an obvious case there as well.  

Now to the more interesting stuff: 

You are clearly living in a temporary room.  The spartan conditions, the lack of decor, the dependence on convenient items that were clearly prepared nearby (the plastic tray, the simple bed, the almost factory-like furniture) all indicate cheap, convenient, and temporary residence.  The papers on the wall and piled on the desk indicated likely school work was involved.  And the windowed door to what I suspect was still indoors had curtains, implying other people could walk by.

At first I was inclined to say you are left-handed (mug and fork placement).  But one look at that mouse told me my gut was at least half-wrong.  Unless it's a trick of the photo, the mouse looks to be clearly shaped for right-hands only (bent right). 

The lack of covers and their arrangement indicates a likely affinity for cooler sleeping conditions, and the pillow being pressed more on one side, lead me to believe you sleep on your side.

I presumed your height and maleness by your shoe size and your spartan decor (which is, I admit, a little sexist, but I'm not saying it's a *fact* that you are male :P).

The singleness comes from what looks like little interest or preparation for frequent visitors.  

The weight comes from the tight corners in which you sit (I presume that rotating office chair is yours, whereas the standard chair is the university's), the lack of visible displacement in the bed, and the apparently basic diet on which you subsist.


I'm sure I missed a lot and got a lot wrong (again, first time), but that's what I'm going with.&gt; Left handed Position of the cup on your desk.

I thought that too, but the mouse looks right handed.

&gt;Pills on the shelf unit with your MLP collection, as well as flip flops, plus the brony+gamer combo led me to the assumption you are overweight. Not stereotype, but statistics.

I should have thought of the statistics as well...

&gt;Can't tell where you live. I wanna say not in the USA due to the weird power outlets. Europe or Asia?

Looks like UK to me.  Photo looks like it was taken at night which is aligned with a European timezone, UK outlets have three prongs whereas European are two-pronged.Sorry, I thought you were saying the False equivalence means Leibniz's PSR formulation is left wholly unscathed, as the opponents are rejecting a stronger form (a modal form, in fact) which is not what Leibniz was interested in.  

My point was simply that while the modal deconstruction of the PSR doesn't address Leibniz's formulation, Leibniz's formulation still fails to adequately handle True brute facts (those lacking any explanation). &gt;It seems the would-be reductio of the argument from contingency fails by virtue of resting upon the equivocations I tried to clarify by explaining Leibniz's argument.

I agree.

&gt;I don't understand what significance your concern about brute facts is supposed to have for this issue.

As I said, I just wanted to clarify that your point doesn't mean the opposition to the argument from contingency has nothing to say on the matter.On Leibniz's formulation of the PSR. More specifically, brute facts still pose an issue to the formulation, which undermines the argument from contingency as a whole.&gt;Not UK.

Damn, the one thing I thought I'd be positive of. 

&gt;This residence is not college-related in any way. I don't know if it's permanent permanent, but I've been living here for a while, and have no real plans to move out.

Hm.  Should have followed my gut on that one.  The lack of school books were telling.  And to be honest the room looks more like an office than a dorm in many ways. 

&gt;Wait, there are left-handed mouses? Everyone who I know is left-handed still uses the mouse with right hand.

It's more like the mouse was clearly shaped for right-hands specifically :). Not sure if there are left-handed mouses, just generic vs. right-handed friendly. 

&gt; And you're saying--yes, all of that is fine, but that you'd like to change the subject to talk about something else... as it turns out, to talk about brute facts?

Well all this stemmed from a debate about the argument from contingency, and how the PSR relates to it. The reductio covers one common argument against a modal PSR, which is often mistaken as the one needed for the argument from contingency.  Recognizing this, the question still remains as to whether Leibniz's actual formulation of the PSR holds water. 

&gt;In any case, now changing the subject to follow your tangent--brute facts don't pose any issue to Leibniz's formulation of the PSR. He argues that there aren't any.

What's Leibniz's argument for this position? I tried to do some research on the matter but at best I found myself reading Pruss's formulation of the W-PSR, where he (I think) fails to successfully argue from contingency using the W-PSR.

&gt;Some people think he's wrong about that, but that doesn't mean that he's erred

Right.

&gt;it isn't a fault in Leibniz's reasoning that some people don't agree with him

Well yes and no.  It depends on his reasoning against brute facts.  If the reasoning isn't adequately presented, isn't it then a failing on his part to make a solid case?

&gt;What the critic has to do is attack those arguments, or provide more compelling arguments for the contrary case.

Absolutely.  I'm just wondering what Leibniz's reasoning is for the position that brute facts do not exist.&gt;I understand that it is a convention in apologetics discussions to distract from any point clearly made with the rhetorical display of an unending series of non sequiturs

It wasn't rhetoric or an intentional non sequitur, it was part of a larger conversation... but I recognize you're interested in just talking about the reductio.

&gt;I'm just not interested in that kind of exchange.

Ok fair enough.  For my own learning though (I won't take it up with you, just for my own knowledge), do you recommend any readings/sources on Leibniz's justification against brute facts?  Sorry can you expand on this?  A and B are just propositional variables, they can be True or False. Yeah I lived there for a little while. I thought that was what I was looking at.  The photos were pretty blurry :P Piggy-backing off of what you said:

&gt;It has also been said that, even given the correct constants, the odds of the universe playing out as it has are astronomically small, and I've heard estimates upwards of 1 in 10^80

If I randomly shuffle a deck of cards, the odds of it being perfectly shuffled in order is 52!, which is 1 in 8.06 x 10^67 .  Thing is, the odds of it being shuffled in *any* order is 1 in 8.06  x 10^67 .  Telling me the probability of randomly choosing a sample in a permutation set tells me nothing, *unless* you make the case that one particular permutation is meaningful, while the rest are not. 

But I'm not so sure *our* permutation (this universe) is particularly meaningful.  I think intelligence could have arisen under many different circumstances, albeit different from carbon-formed, solar-powered life. 

This seems to agree with your second objection. 

Overall I'd say your argument summarizes nicely the biggest objections to Teleological arguments, ones that I have not seen very adequately defended against.&gt;Couldn't she say something like 'then there would be no explanation for the world existing,'

This is exactly right, and does a better service to a common objection to the sort of cosmological argument that hammie uses for "sustaining" the universe.  Namely, many like myself see no problem in accepting brute facts. And it seems to me that unless you *frame* it in a particular way s.t. the brute facts are "self-explained", brute facts will persist under any model. 


&gt; or 'then the world would not be ultimately rational' or something like this?

I don't think admitting brute facts is irrational; simply that it reaches the limits of what needs or has explanation.

&gt; Or go further even and say things about how all rational order in the world would not be there and stuff like that.

Not sure about this argument.

edit: to the petty child downvoting a very-clearly cordial conversation/debate between two people, stay immature, I get more joy from it.It's pretty much an extrapolation of modus tollens. 

Given a conditional such that the set of premises imply the consequent, if the consequent is False, we must conclude that somehow the set of premises as provided is False. 

For instance, if I state: *If on my plate there are only noodles, black pepper, and pecorino-romano cheese tossed together, __then__ I am eating cacio e pepe (an Italian dish).*  Supposing we then conclude (by various other means) that I am *not*, in fact, eating *cacio e pepe.* Then what can be said is any one of the premises is False: 

-  Maybe there's no plate in front of me
-  Maybe there's cheese and pepper, but no pasta
-  Maybe there's red sauce

At minimum at least something of this sort must be True, because we did not arrive at the conclusion expected if the premises *were* True.

In theistic terms, what /u/korsei is saying that really what can be said from the theist who is to imagine that "god does not exist" is any number of varying conclusions about the premises.  

E.g. Cosmological argument example: something is *only* either  explained by (i) something else (contingent) or (xor) (ii) by itself (necessary).  Arguments, etc. *therefore* god is the necessary explanandum, and thus the end of the chain of inquiry.  

Now, suppose god does not exist, given this, we must conclude that something about the premises is False.  As an atheist myself, I take issue with the claim that something always has an explanation (either in itself or elsewhere), and it seems the logical conclusion of the theist considering this proposal (god DNE) would also find brute facts to be most tenable, though in theory *any* re-formulation of the premises that falsifies the original set will suffice.&gt; The problem is that if God never existed, neither would the world. 

This is a claim, not a fact. I can think of a large number of scenarios of worlds where god does not exist but the world does.  In fact, it's entirely possible *this* world is one such example.That seems utterly pedantic.  Was it not clear I meant "any *particular* order" from the context? &gt;If a magician could only win in one particular shuffle, take your pick, and there was only one deal, and you got that one shuffle, then, yes, it could have been random, but it's highly, highly implausible. You're far more justified in claiming the magician stacked the deck.

This is a really bad straw man of the critic's position, here's my summary of the biggest issue I see: 

In your game, we have what is decidedly a "winning" order, such that *any* other order is a "loss." The first thing an opponent of the TO will point out is that this is a poor framing of the problem, *precisely because* you are assuming only *our* universe's arrangement is special.  In other words, the odds of shuffling the deck in any order is 1 in 52!, but that does __not__ mean that we agree that the odds of being a *meaningful* arrangement is 1 in 52!.  For instance, there's a 24 in 52! chance of selecting 4 aces (in any order) first.  Or a 40320 in 52! chance of starting with all 2s and As (in any order), etc. with increasing likelihood that something will happen as we'd like it.  The onus is on you to demonstrate why only *one* ordering is valuable and all the others are not. 

TL;DR: __Your first mistake is in framing the game in such a way that there is only one winning ordering\u2014that's exactly what the opponent objects to.__

&gt;My point is that in literally any other context, atheists would not be making this argument, as it is so weak.

But you've framed it poorly to begin with.  *Obviously* if there's only *one* meaningful ordering and only *one* shuffle that creates it (as opposed to infinite multiverses, for instance), then we're going to agree with you.  But I reject that only one ordering is a "winning" one, so already you've failed to show you understand the criticism properly. 

&gt;Sure. There's a small range that allows life, not just one.

According to who? A small range for what, exactly?  Life *as we know it*.  Vary it wildly, and there are all sorts of unknowns that pop up, because we only really have an idea of how things work *here*.  You're imposing this ludicrous idea that life as we know it, or the universe as we know it, is the only one whereby intelligence and understanding can arise.  That seems utterly myopic and presumptuous. 

&gt;Read Rees some time on the math here.

Rees only talks about __carbon-based life.__  I already pointed out *before* that this is a faulty way to frame the problem.  Because it's possible that other meaningful life could arise by other means in other conditions. 

&gt;They're very weak objections, that have been defended against many times.

You don't really seem to understand them...

&gt;https://www.reddit.com/r/DebateReligion/comments/3vtdtq/the_finetuning_argument/cxqidz9

There's a lot of rehashing to the issues I'm raising here, and a lot of what you're saying is blatantly straw-manning what the opposition actually says.  If you're really interested in understanding True criticisms of the teleological argument, I'm happy to help you out, but you'll gain no traction raising defenses if you're attacking your own straw man construction of the opponent. &gt;and was contesting his notion that there is nothing special about our universe with my example

If you contested that our universe isn't somehow special, it wasn't at all clear where you said that or why you think that.  Carbon-based life isn't by any means the only way one can conceive of intelligence arising in nature (of various laws).&gt;Belief without evidence.

Why would you believe something without evidence?  Do you believe there's an invisible, intangible dragon in my garage?  There's no evidence for it either, but I'm telling you it's real.How do you parse two competing views that do not contradict themselves but contradict each other?  Supposing atheism also was not self-contradictory?&gt; It's precisely because someone can say that and provide nothing to prove it that makes it faith.

I see. My issue then would be that "faith" is often considered a virtuous or lofty characteristic.  Might "irrational belief" better fit what we are both referring to?  &gt; Obviously it isn't surprising that you would shuffle the deck in any order because the probability you would shuffle the deck in any order is 1.

Right, but given I stated said probability is 52!, it's pretty clear from the context that I meant the probability of shuffling for any *given* order. It would have been clearly worthless and irrelevant to point out in the middle of what I was saying that the probability of shuffling in one of *any possible* ordering was 1, that's arguably True a priori and worthless to say. 

&gt;If you shuffle the deck to get a specific order, that would be surprising and I would think that you're cheating.

Which is why my bigger point was that finding *one* particular ordering hasn't been shown to be meaningful to the argument.  There's likely many possible orderings that yield the same result we are after (intelligent life).  The probability of producing a *specific* ordering is not the same as producing an ordering with a particular trait (any order with As in the first half of the deck, for instance), which may be all that's required for "intelligent life" (to press the analogy).

&gt; I haven't found any other than Catholicism that doesn't contradict itself (atheism included)

Happy to unpack this issue further.  For starters, what about atheism do you find contradictory? 

&gt;At that point, you need to just evaluate all the evidence to see that Catholicism's claims are supported by reality.

I'm not sure I follow.  Supposing you spent just as many years and found Jainism to be non-contradictory?  You can't just say, by virtue of catholocism being non-contradictory that jainism is contradictory, *unless* you go in believing catholocism is True as you study jainism.  But that's problematic, because obviously everybody who believes what they do think it's non-contradictory, so by that line of thinking, all other religions are contradictory simply because you believe yours is already non-contradictory. 

This creates a paradox, and doesn't provide us with any new information.  

My question can be better phrased as, "ignoring the obvious contradiction of *you presently held* faith being True (and claiming to be only True), what if two faiths on their own have been found to be non-contradictory?"  Happy to defend atheism as the competing non-contradictory belief.Then we're in full agreement.&gt; But this is surely False. Cosmological arguments typically argue for there being a necessary thing, which, being necessary, does not require something outside of itself to explain it's existence.

Sure.  But I take issue with the framing of the problem in Cosmological arguments.  Precisely because they preclude modally (ie., separate from Leibnizian "contingent") contingent brute facts without clear justification.

&gt;And the role this plays in such cosmologies is more or less 'rounding off' our quest for explanation, so that the whole world is explained as a whole. 

Well what if I asked "why is it that necessary things explain themselves?"  It seems your only answer sounds an awful lot like a brute fact.  You can deflect back to the *definition* of necessity, but my bigger question is why it is that there are only two things: necessary and contingent, which ignore the completely valid possibility of modally contingent brute facts.

&gt;ut admitting brute facts is precisely to deny that any such 'rounded off' explanation is possible and admitting that there is at least one thing for which there is no explanation

Sure. I'm not seeing the issue yet.

&gt; even though we would ordinarily want to give an explanation for it.

Wanting something doesn't make it more plausibly True. 

&gt;Or at least it is to admit that we are incapable of ever formulating a satisfactory explanation.

Well, yeah. That's exactly the point. Still not sure what the issue is here. If I asked "why is there god rather than no god?" I assume your answer would be that god provides a necessary explanation for something, but if I then follow up with "why does there need to be a necessary explanation for everything?" which seems to impose a viciously circular response that harkens back to god, etc. 

&gt;Brute facts by definition are things that should but cannot be explained, whereas God or some such necessary being is explained, since it explains itself through it's necessity.

I fully understand the distinction. I don't understand why it's a problem if it turns out that brute facts are a part of reality, beyond being unable to explain some things (at least one).  If it's so, it's so.

&gt;This is no mere framing, but an important and substantial difference.

Well by "framing" what I mean is that defining "necessary" as that which explains itself and "contingent" as that which is explained by something else and *only these two types of things exist* preclude brute facts a priori without any justification.  It's question-begging away from the truth because the framing already excludes the completely valid possibility that somethings simply aren't explained (full-stop). 

&gt;This means that it is not possible to obtain a full understanding of the world, since there must always be at least one necessary gap in such an understanding.

Still not sure why you believe that's a problem. :)

&gt;So the world is not ultimately rational, since there will always be some thing that does not make sense, but yet exists.

This is a misconsTrued meaning of "rational." Rational just means logically deducible.  If something is a brute fact, then it is still logically consistent.  All it means is that, if A is a brute fact, then both (A-&gt;A, self explained) and (B-&gt;A for any B, contingent) are both False.

Rather, we just state A as a propositional variable that is known to be True.  To be an irrational belief you'd have to make the case that brute facts are logically impossible, and it seems to be patently False that they are logically impossible.

&gt;God is often thought to play a role in the rational ordering of the world, such that without God such ordering would not be and all would be chaos or something like this.

I understand the definition, I don't understand why anyone is inclined to believe it *must be True*, and therefore be incapable of conceiving of an ordered world without god. 

&gt;It's a different, though not unrelated, point than the cosmological argument.

Sure, we can focus on the premises of Leibniz's PSR-based CA specifically.&gt;It's not a strawman, it's a counterargument showing why he is wrong when he claims there are no special outcomes.

But that's not even the claim.  The claim isn't "the probability of x happening for any given event is the same, therefore it's not meaningful."  The claim is: "The subset of possible events called 'meaningful events' is not of size one, and, in fact, arguably large enough such that randomly selecting an event that qualifies for the set of being 'meaningful' is large enough that it it's occurrence is not unusual or special". 

You completely missed the point if you think that all I was saying was the probabilities of any given event are equal in a random sampling. 

&gt;Once you allow winning hands as distinct from losing hands, then his argument falls apart, as it requires no distinctions between hands.

Yes, but the *number* of possible hands that can win over a given shuffle matters.  If the rules were "any order wins", then it's *completely* mundane that the player should win.  If the rules were "any order that has all 4 kings show before all (not any) 4 aces are shown" then it's pretty clear the odds are in our favor.  A "winning" hand of the universe isn't just a super-special ordering, it's just any ordering that allows for intelligence, and that can be far more common than you care to think. 

&gt;My argument doesn't require a single winning hand, just a low probability of a winning hand.

Yes, but what is your definition of a "winning hand"? Do you mean to say that all the cards in the whole deck need to be in a particular order?  Or is intelligent life something as achievable as a full-house in five-card stud?  By my count the probability of  shuffling in such a way that a player receives a full-house is pretty unexciting.  Seems to me to be meaningful, we just need a universe with intelligence.  Seems to me that such a setup is far more common than you are making the case for. 

&gt;My argument is about a small winning space, his relies on a flat space with no privileged outcomes.

How small? It matters tremendously.  When most people argue for teleological arguments, they talk about the probability of life happening *as __we__ experience it*.  That's what your favorite source Rees does.  This is different than asking what the odds are of a *winning hand in general*.  

Or in other words, it's different to talk about the probability of getting two 2s and three 3s (of particular suits in particular orders) in a 5-card stud than it is to talk about the odds of getting a full-house in general.

&gt;Unless you're seriously proposing life could evolve in a universe without matter.

&gt;Read Just Six Numbers by Rees on the subject.

Haven't read it, but the issue of the argument you extend from his position doesn't change.

*Six Numbers* points out that the constants have little variation (on certain magnitudes, btw) to support "life", it doesn't tell us what the probability is of *selecting* those constants at random.  Rees seems to assume in his infinite multiverse theory that any value for these constants is possible, but this is problematic, because we don't know what the range of possible values are (if there are any at all).  If the range happens to be within the sweet spot of what you call "finely tuned," then every universe in existence contains life.  It's not enough to say they can't vary much without losing "life in general".  It must also be shown that such wide variations are evenly possible.

You act as if the constants could have been widely otherwise (not just for us or a universe, but in any physical way), but this hasn't been shown at all.

For instance, suppose you want to sell me a rare mineral that costs $1m/kg (pricey).  You're selling me 0.00001kg of the mineral.  I can only buy it from you if the weight is between 0.0001kg and 0kg, how fortunate that you offered me a value I could afford!  But what if this mineral is so rare, that only 0.0001kg of it even exists?  Then no matter what, I'd have been able to buy what you were selling. 

For that matter, let's change it to some unit a little more meaningful.  $1m/kg = $1/mg. And my affordable range is 100g and 0g.  Suddenly the variation seems a little wider. Let's kick it up a notch.  Cost is $0.001/(micro)g.  Interesting, now my range is 100,000 and 0.  Looking wider still.  

The range of *possible* values that can be randomly sampled from matters tremendously when you want to talk about fine tuning. Funny thing is, that range is completely unknown.

All this matters when we want to talk about "number of possible winning hands." 

&gt;If you don't understand the difference between the teleological argument and the and FTA, you should brush up on that first.

And you should know that fine tuning is a subset of teleological arguments.&gt; I don't quite see what you mean by this distinction.

Leibniz talked about necessity and contingency in terms of a sort of moral necessity.  For instance, necessary to be the best-possible world. This leaves room for things that are modally contingent (neither impossible nor necessary) but are morally necessary (required to make the world a best-possible world), etc.

&gt;Well, depending on what specific argument or metaphysical system we were talking about I would refer you to the relevant explanations of what this necessity consists in.

Right, and there are certain metaphysical systems that permit brute facts. The question is: which are more tenable? 

&gt;There are only these two things, because there are things that contain the explanation for their existence within themselves and there are things that don't. The proponent of brute facts, but says that there are some things that don't contain the explanation for their existence within themselves and that yet also don't have any explanation outside of them.

This is simply a restatement of what we already know.  I'm asking why one would reject the possibility of brute facts.

&gt;The point of contention here isn't on this point, but on the truth of some form of the PSR, i.e. the principle that any fact has some explanation. 

This is exactly the point of contention.  Because to deny the PSR is to deny that things are *only* either self-explained or explained by something else (they can be completely lacking any reason/explanation).  Which is why I first said: 

&gt;&gt; Namely, many like myself see no problem in accepting brute facts.

And why I said certain frameworks are made precisely because they deny the PSR, which means they obviously don't allow for them. 

&gt;Rather, the proper response would be some defense of some form of the PSR. And such defenses have been given throughout history. The most recent that I'm aware of is this one.

As someone who doesn't buy into the PSR: that was an impressive argument (of course Della Rocca doesn't need my layman cheerleading).  But I think there are a few issues with the argument that still leave the PSR more objectionable than not.  I agree that the conclusion of necessitarianism isn't necessarily problematic (so Van Inwagen's argument does not dethrone the PSR full-stop), but I think Della Rocca's argument fails in two areas.  The first is that he quite rightly points out that questions of primitive modality or deep facts about causality are open to brute facts.  And I don't think these issues can be casually handed over to the explicability argument. For that matter, one may point out that Della Rocca's formulation of the explicability argument is backwards: he employs modus tollens on understandings better gleaned on modus ponens, but applies the modus tollens *intuitively* retroactively.  This bears evidence in the example like deep questions of causality, which is rejected for its seemingly lacking adequate explanatory power. Of course, I wouldn't say that not having an answer means there must be a brute fact, but this us to the second criticism I must rightly give to /u/oneguy2008, who notes that ([here](https://www.reddit.com/r/philosophy/comments/3tdt4o/michael_della_roccathe_principle_of_sufficient/))there *are* non-arbitrary lines drawn about brute facts.

Namely, what he calls a "defeasible PSR" permits the open question of brute facts, while granting us the intuitive appeal of seeking explanations first. 

If I had anything myself to say on the matter, it's that the defeasible PSR serves a much better answer to the question of explanation of existence than committing to a True PSR that rejects brute facts.

&gt;i.e. anything that doesn't contain the explanation for it's existence within itself. Whether or not this means that it is explained by something else is a matter of contention.

I actually didn't realize this.  The way some thomists talk around here sometimes, you'd think it obvious that the definition of contingency, by definition, entails explanatory dependency always.

&gt;That's one construal of the term, yes. Not the one I was using, though. As long as you understood what I was talking about, there's no real problem.

Yes but then I see your comment as odd, because what does it mean to say the *world* is therefore not rational (your comment from before)? 

&gt; It's not that people think it must be True, it's that people think it is True and that therefore the world would not be ordered without God.

Right, but then it seems trivial to *conceive* of such a world "counterfactual" to their understanding.  It's unclear to me why the statement is always this vague assumption that all other things would be equal, but god just isn't there (and therefore chaotic in their opinion).Glad you're thinking about it!

Yes, this youtube response mirrors what I've been saying about a mischaracterization of the opposition to the fine-tuning argument.  Namely, I'm not interested in the fact that any given order is randomly shuffled with P(1/52!).  Rather, I'm interested in which shuffles produce some sort of interesting result. 

So, to strain the analogy.  Suppose "intelligent life" is needed so long as the "sorting of the deck" contains all 4 aces in the first half of the deck.  Yes, we can consider the odds of *one* such arrangement (namely ours) that has probability 1/52! of occurring.  But this neglects the actual probability, which is interested in just 4 aces before the half-way point.  

The odds of this are fantastically higher, actually P(4 aces in first half) = (26 C 4)/(52 C 4) &gt; 55%. One could say that, under this framing, it's *more likely* intelligent life exists than not. 

Now, what are the required "orderings" of a deck of cards (the universe) to produce intelligent life?  The real answer is, we don't know: we only have our universe.  But at minimum this undermines any argument that says we must be very special for how unlikely we are. Yeah I didn't even bother getting to that :P &gt; Not arguing, just wanted to say that there aren't many (if any) metaphysical assertions that can be verified by observation.

I'm aware. Metaphysical assertions (the good ones anyway) still have evidence: usually in the form of a combination of analytical truths and experiential ones. :)

&gt;The reason many religions consider faith to be a virtue is that the faithful demonstrate "courage" by living their beliefs despite any observational proof.

Not saying you actually agree with this, but this seems blatantly contradictory.  People "observe" god working every day. Without these or religious experiences, etc., there'd be no reason whatsoever to even *conceive* of a god existing. This compels one to think even then they believe based on observation, just that this observation is of a different sort (one I find factually problematic). 

&gt;And there are convenient ways some try to get around this. ("tempt not the Lord your God", etc).

Yes those always seemed so awfully convenient.  Especially because in the past god explicitly asked to be tested (one Elijah with a burning bull comes to mind). 

&gt;That being said, you can still reason your way into many belief systems. The pantheism of Spinoza is one such example.

I'm not disposed to reject rationalism entirely, but I think there's something to also be said on the value of empiricism (to draw the bold, overly distinctive line).  I rather like Spinoza's view, but I don't think the approach of pure rationalism can get us to the truth. 

&gt;This is the critique that materialists make of rationalists, etc., is that they can reason their way into nearly any belief.

Right, and I can see the merits of this claim. 

&gt;Honestly, anything beyond strict materialism requires a certain leap of faith.

I'm not sure even strict materialism can escape this criticism.  But I don't think faith is really the word I'd use here.  Rather, an educated guess or particular metric of "best explanation" seems more apt.  To invoke faith usually implies a blind trust, and I don't think many respectable metaphysics go so far. &gt; Please pick one of the above, so I know what to respond to.

I'm not sure what the issue is between the two statements.  The first is pointing out that the low probability of a single sample is not reflective of the probability of a certain event given some *set* of conditions (multiple samples are possible). 

The second comment merely emphasizes that opponents of fine tuning reject that a single sample reflects the actual odds.  

Or, in analogous terms, even if the probability of choosing a single order of cards is 1/52!, if the requirements for "intelligent life" are just (any ordering wherein the aces are all before the halfway point), then your probability is exceedingly high (above 1/2 even) and fine-tuning makes no sense.

Hopefully that clarifies things a bit. 

&gt;The fraction of winning hands to losing hands is so small that we have to deal with this fact somehow.

The case has yet to be made that the number of winning hands is small.  As I said before, it's not enough to tell me the range of acceptable values (versus non-life giving), I have to know the *odds* of choosing a value outside that range.  Both variables matter. 

&gt;A universe where life is possible. Or more broadly, higher chemistry.

Then your argument is at a stand-still until you can provide for me the *range* of possible values each constant can take on and the *probability* of taking on a certain value. 

&gt;Well yes, again, that's the point. Various estimates have been made like 1 / 1040, or similar vanishingly small numbers. Though I did see one paper that put it much higher, like 1 in 3.

That's a tremendously large difference, and one is left to ask how they even came up with these numbers. 

&gt;Rees demonstrates what happens when each of the constants changes.

Sure, but it's sort of like talking about what would happen to the earth of the ocean swelled by ten overnight: it's obviously bad, but it's not obvious that such a thing is even possible (in fact it isn't) in the range of values that the ocean's volume can be.

&gt;It shows what small ranges of constants allow chemistry to happen. That's the essence of the FTA.

But that range can still be far greater than what is even physically possible under various universe conditions. See my example of the ocean above.

&gt;Based on the math, we don't see any such ranges exist.

What math?  How can that even be known?  We have one universe to observe and one set of physical laws we don't even know are universal (or multi-versal) or not.  We don't even know what the laws were like in the moments where presumed quantum gravity took place.

Unless I get some sources for the math of the actual probability of choosing something *within* the range versus outside it, I don't think this claim holds any water. &gt; If you think math can predict scientific outcomes, then based on what we currently know, there's no particular reason why a constant can't just as likely be another number

This doesn't make sense mathematically or scientifically.  Mathematics still has ranges, and probability density functions.  If you're saying the probability is uniform over all possible numbers (that's clearly bad math), then the probability of *anything* is actually 0, since there is only one possible value to be, but an *infinite* number to choose from (1/infinite = 0).  

Barring this, I need a probability density function, and I need to know what the viable range is, and what the justification is.  Otherwise, we can say the PDF is always over the "sweet spot" range where life always is possible. 

&gt;If you think math can't make predictions in regards to science, then your argument holds.

I think math predicts all sorts of things, but your proposed math is lacking in some very obvious ways.In principle, I'm very much against Utilitarianism; but I've seen no good argument against vegetarianism under any moral framework. 

At best I think contractualism might try to say the veil of ignorance only applies to moral agents (humans and intelligent aliens), but I don't see an argument that draws the line on the veil of ignorance that also successfully protects the disabled, elderly, and young children.&gt; But it does not generate a class of contingent things that need no explanation. Or at least, as long as we believe in the PSR, as Leibniz does, these contingent things still need explanation.

Well, sure, if we look at the argument *given* the PSR, then of course it's valid.  But that's precisely my point from the outset: because these arguments are built on the assumption of the PSR, they are dependent on it and reject brute facts a priori.  It means that for any person who does not accept the PSR (which is a pretty dubious principle, to be frank) the argument fails before it can even get off the ground.

&gt;Note, by the way, that the point of Leibniz' distinction you referred to is precisely to keep the PSR while denying necessitarianism.

Sure.

&gt;In any case, it's been a while since I read the paper, so I can't really respond to your objections to it. The people over at /r/askphilosophy will surely be willing to discuss this with you, if you'd like.

I actually already did some auxiliary sub searching after reading it\u2014most opinions on the piece were that Della Rocca failed to address the hardest criticisms against the PSR (while not an unwarranted claim, I think it worth at least giving attention to Della Rocca's arguments itself) and failed to adequately consider a neat dividing line between explicable arguments and brute facts (this is where the *defeasible* PSR seems to undo any *strong* PSR that would be needed for Cosmological Arguments).

Another discussion of it (besides the one from the comment I linked before, can be found [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/askphilosophy/comments/30ktja/is_there_a_sufficient_explanation_arguing_for_or/cptfxxb)). 

&gt;Well, it means that, conceiving something as rational when it is amenable to reason, the world turns out, on rejection of the PSR, to no longer be rational as a whole, since it is no longer as a whole amenable to reason. Because denying the PSR means precisely that there are some things that simply cannot be understood, but only recognized.

Surely while certain facts would be (by definition) unamenable to reason, the system as a whole could be, if we admit that these brute facts are simply the limits of what can be reasoned, rational insofar as it is a closed system *beneath* these facts.  That is, for explanations *stemmed from* this brute fact, one can perfectly reason from to any further point down the chain.

Or if we think in modal terms, we can say that, while the BCCF is not itself explained, the BCCF is rational for all points stemming *from* this border of brute facts, which still leaves us with (it seems) a great deal to investigate and discover.

It would have to be said, then, that brute facts simply mean the world isn't *ultimately* rational, but I (again) see no problem in this.  If it is the truth of the matter, what is the issue?

&gt;Because this is the most obvious way of conceiving the hypothetical. That is, I assume the point of hypotheticals like this is to understand more about the theists worldview by asking them to counterfactually conceive of a world where their God is absent and then to see what changes, so as to understand the role God plays in their worldview. ....

&gt;If instead you want them to just conceive of an atheist worldview, all we've gotten is an admission that the atheist worldview need not be logically impossible, but absolutely no information about their own worldview. I'm not sure what would be the point of this.

Hm good points.  I guess if one has reasoned to the conclusion that god is the explanation, the natural answer would have to be that without god, there would be nothing around.  

And I see your point about the question.  Frankly I'm not much of a fan of it, since I don't really see what the inquisitor hopes to gain by hearing the theist say that atheism is logically possible. It seems if any progress is to be made on the front, the question must dive deeper and get to the heart of theists believe god is required to explain the world, and debate on that front.&gt; I'd take an opposite tact. I'd argue that chemistry is not special, merely a 2nd order effect of the configuration.

Yes this is also True and a point I had in the back of my mind when addressing his claim. 
Only the necessitation rule requires that A be a theorem.  The distribution theorem (the only one I'm interested in) allows for A as a metavariable, which includes propositional variables.  

A better formulation of what I had originally said is: 

1.  [](A-&gt;B) (Given)
2.  []A          (Assumption)
3.  []A-&gt;[]B (Distribution on 1).
4.  Therefore []B (Modus ponens on 2 and 3). 

The point is, under a general modal construction, B can be necessary *because of* A being necessary and A entailing B. 

Hammie's original comment that necessary things always explain themselves is only True under a description of "moral necessity" (as Leibniz formulated), not a modal description which allows for entailed necessity.You still need to define a [sample space (what you call the configuration space)](http://www.cut-the-knot.org/Probability/ContinuousSampleSpaces.shtml) or the problem becomes unintelligible.  

As I and others have been pointing out, this space is currently undefined, as it is unknown.  The point is that it renders the entirety of the argument unintelligible, because it's uncertain if the total configuration space is within the bounds of the life-supporting range, slightly beyond, greatly beyond, or infinite.  

But no matter how you cut it, you need to define and adequately justify the sample space with respect to the finely tuned range, and that simply has not been (nor shall I say *can* it be) done.&gt; I mean, everybody accepts that if we don't accept some form of the PSR, then cosmological arguments fail. Indeed, rejecting the PSR is the most common objection to cosmological arguments.

I think only in philosophical circles.  Atheists on DR here in reddit seem to get caught up in the logic or something else in the argument most times I see it.  Especially when it's Kalam (I'm sure many proponents of other forms of the CA rue the day Craig used scientific arguments as a support for his brand of the Kalam). 

&gt;Well, it's problematic if we think, as proponents of cosmological arguments do, that the would ought to be ultimately rational. But this is no more than the dispute about the PSR.

Seems like a fundamental problem. Perhaps one day someone should start a debate thread about strictly the PSR :).

&gt;But as I said, there is a point to the hypothetical, if we use it to gain understanding of the role God plays in the theist worldview.

Sure, but perhaps it's due to my de-conversion (having previously believed god held everything together), or the fact that the OP in this thread specifically asked for an answer *other* than "things wouldn't exist", but I get this pressing feeling some people are looking for something else\u2014what, I don't know, but they seem wholly displeased with the "things wouldn't exist" type answer. 

&gt;And this can be a good way to get at the heart of what theists believe about God and indeed further the debate.

Don't get me wrong here, I absolutely agree. It just seems that many times people here don't like the answer given to them (perhaps they think it's too simple?), so it becomes less about the hypothetical, and more about how so-and-so isn't even thinking critically about it (which may or may not be the case).

&gt;It's a pity that most atheists on this sub seem determined to sabotage the hypothetical into uselessness.

Hm, I haven't noticed too much, but then I spend most of my time reading theistic comments, not atheist ones, since it's boring reading comments that I tend to agree with.  To be sure, there's some great things from some of the more sophisticated arguers here, but unless it's something I find stretches me somehow, I'll probably be focused more on theistic answers (hence, my poor sampling bias).
&gt; Yeah, but the people here are for the most part completely uninterested in understanding the issues they're talking about. So it's only natural that they don't know what good responses are to the things they don't like.

It seems there's at least a vocal bunch who depend quite a bit on empirical knowledge as the explanation for everything. 

&gt;I've not much hope for such a thing being successful here, but it's a good topic to be sure.

I'm not alone in that pessimism then. 

&gt;I think most people just plain don't understand why people give this answer. Also, relatedly, I get the feeling many people want to ask this question not as a hypothetical in order to understand, but as a way of making the 'God hypothesis' make predictions that we could scientifically test. Of course in that case this answer isn't helpful.

Ah I see. They're thinking in terms of finding some falsifiable difference (if god, then this happens, if not, then that; let's see if this or that happens). Seems like an odd way to go about it, but maybe it's because they're trying to identify those who say god can't be empirically tested, but then believe that god interacts in such a way that god *should* be able to be.

&gt;I don't mean much more than all the people claiming that theists just aren't understanding the question by answering that the world wouldn't exist. There's little to no effort to try and understand why people give this answer, and in this way the point of the hypothetical gets lost.

I agree.  Thanks for the cordial discussion! It's been sorely missed.Totally read that in Mike Birbiglia's voice with an emphasis on "zany"&gt;I enjoyed exposing you.

Not an argument. 

&gt;Lying about the Vilenkin email Krauss doctored doesn't help. 

Not a lie.  Go back and read my comment where I linked Krauss *directly addressing this issue* and where he *directly quotes Vilenkin* as agreeing with his email.  Not my fault you can't or won't read.

&gt; None of those examples Krauss represented as escaping BGV, escape BGV.

That's because there's plenty of other science that completely brings what Craig raises from BGV into question.  Also, not that you'd understand, but there's actually *two* prominent physicists who disagree with the implications of BGV... Krauss is just one.  

&gt;Krauss deleted the pertinent facts and got caught red handed.

You seem disinterested in facts.  I already addressed this.  Beating someone over the head with this misunderstood point just makes your position look weaker.

&gt; Vilenkin in fact confirmed WLC was correct in an email to WLC.

He didn't, he said he "represented the material well," only to later attest that *so did Krauss*, but since this is your only weak defense, I can understand why you hug it so tightly.  Never mind the overwhelming body of evidence that isn't in the least bit controversial.

&gt;You are simply dead wrong and dishonest about the facts. You got caught with your pants down. Deal with it.

As proof to my statements before, this is not an argument. 

&gt;Don't pretend my ability to defeat you was an inability to comprehend you.

That's funny; you're good.  This was also not an argument, and you definitely have no idea what you're talking about (as evidenced by ignoring all my sources, dropping the *vast majority* of the contentions I have raised with you, and your uneducated understanding of the science).&gt; Are you claiming Krauss did not doctor the email?

He summarized it.  Go back and look at the FB link I cited where Krauss is confirmed to have done a *correct summary* __by__ Vikenkin himself. 

&gt;Why did Krauss doctor Vilenkin's email?

For laypeople (such as yourself) who would lose the content in the thick of technical detail that neither you or I could parse. 

&gt;What was ommitted?

According to Vilenkin, nothing of substance.

&gt;Are you claiming Krauss honestly represented Vilenkin's conclusions that none of the proposed models escaped BGV?

Yes, because Vilenkin said so. Read about it [Right. Here.](https://www.facebook.com/permalink.php?id=54809333509&amp;story_fbid=10151721132708510)

&gt;You lied segFault - and we both know it.

I think you're just illiterate.

&gt;Your attempts at obfuscation and appeal to the liar (Krauss) who was caught red-handed lying to a public audience in an international debate is just silly.

That's a fine misrepresentation of the facts.  Not that I'd expect you to know fact from fiction.  I especially love how you keep calling my tactics obfuscatory.  What was obfuscatory about posting the **direct link** to Vilenkin and Krauss's response?  Do big words just bother you?  Or do you really know that little about science. 

&gt;Now you are reduced to ad-hoc appeals to specualtions 

Speculations are not the same as theories.

&gt;about some hypothetical immaterial, timeless, spaceless dimension where quantum fields exist

"Hypothetical" is not as rigorous as a theory, either.  Poor word choice.  And for the record, your hypothetical scenario is a completely inaccurate depiction of what quantum fields are.  They don't "exist in a dimension."  I'm not really interested in educating you on the entirety of a science you fail to comprehend.  Just read one of the *many* citations I provided before (I'm sure you know how to scroll?).  In case you don't, here they are *again*: 

 [1](http://www.nytimes.com/2012/03/25/books/review/a-universe-from-nothing-by-lawrence-m-krauss.html?_r=0), [2, you'll need to do some searching](https://books.google.com/books?id=rcrf0P8DSe0C&amp;pg=PA170&amp;lpg=PA170&amp;dq=qft+eternal&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=ilsfDXoONx&amp;sig=5x5ejpcEMn_uEaRQwUw5MQt0Fxs&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CDcQ6AEwBWoVChMI3-PGyLe0yAIVUC2ICh1jww5o#v=onepage&amp;q=eternal&amp;f=False), [3](http://www.colorado.edu/philosophy/vstenger/Timeless/08-timeless.pdf).  

Ask [Sean Carroll](http://www.preposterousuniverse.com/blog/2014/02/24/post-debate-reflections/).  [Here's](http://soi.blogspot.ca/2014/04/the-essential-quantum-field-theory.html) a 101 forum on it.  It points out that the fields are not time-dependent.  [More stuff](http://phys.org/news/2015-02-big-quantum-equation-universe.html).

Failing all else, ask /r/askscience (there's no reason not to do this), I'm sure they'll be happy to elucidate more.

&gt;in NOWHERE IN SPACEbut have the capacity to actually create our physical Universe from no physical material.

Thank you for again demonstrating your science illiteracy.  Read the links above and actually bother to learn the material before spouting this nonsense, please.  It's embarrassing to watch.

&gt;Which oscillation models avoid the fatal problems of accumulated entropy or development of multiple singularities during contraction that render them incapable of sustaining bounce phases through cycles?

[The Baum-Frampton Model is just one, for example](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cyclic_model#The_Baum.E2.80.93Frampton_model).  

There's also [Loop Theory](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loop_quantum_cosmology) and [The Big Bounce Theory](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Big_Bounce). 

By the way, you seem fixated on oscillation models, I only provided those as *one set* of competing theories to Craig's cosmological ideas.  If you watch the Carroll debate (watch it, until you do I'll address this no further), you'll see there's a lot of assumptions Craig isn't permitted to make, but does about cosmology.  There's, in fact, *many* competing theories all respectable in their own way. 

&gt;I'm still waiting on a plausible escape from Contingency and KCA.

You haven't demonstrated anything about Contingency.  I already pointed out the argument is flawed from the beginning, because the formal MODAL definition of contingency does not require a necessary entity.  Have you studied modal logic?  My guess is, no.  

KCA is based on tons of misinformed assumptions by a religious philosopher trying to do PhD grade cosmology.  I've been trying to tell you that your science is seriously lacking, and you seem to pull out the same outdated responses that physicists have addressed for quite some time now.

&gt;You have utterly failed to provide a POSSIBLE escape from anything much less a MORE PLAUSIBLE alternative necessary to defeat the premise

Every one of the theories I've linked are well-vetted and respected cosmological theories that are *still actively debated* in today circles.  The fact that you think there's one solid theory that's "most plausible" demonstrates how little you understand about the ongoing discussions in the field.  You've cherry-picked a phenomenon that sounds good, called it "more plausible" because it sits will with your world view, and then think you know anything at all about anything.  It's very child-like to be honest. 

&gt;Also, I'm still waiting on your proof arguments and evidence that atheism is correct.

I've already told them to you (you really don't read my comments).  In the absence of any sound evidence, the more reasonable assumption is that the proposed entity does not exist.  It is reasonable to believe that unicorns do not exist because there is no evidence whatsoever about them\u2014the same can be said of a god.  I suggest you read up on Russell's Teapot to better understand that "absence of all evidence is evidence of absence" is a philosophically and logically supported claim.

There's also no *proofs* here, in either direction.  We live in a world where only one thing can be certain: "I exist."  Anything short of this is symbolically proven, or empirically demonstrated with the best possible evidence. &gt;You are simply dishonest. 

Facts are dishonest?  I genuinely don't even know how you'd think that, when all I've done is link objective sources...

&gt;We both know Krauss deleted the qualifiers from Vilenkin's statements that in fact reversed the conclusions 180 degrees.

Vilenkin doesn't seem to think so, read the FB post.  Are you saying you understand BGV better than the guy who thought of it? 

&gt;Krauss used deceit as a pretext to deny BGV held True against the models Krauss fraudulently represented as escaping BGV.

You sound particularly offended that the facts disagree with your perception of reality.  I mean, are *you* a cosmologist?  He (and Vilenkin) seem to be of an agreement of Krauss's interpretation.  I don't know how many ways you can reword the same thing you seem to be beating yourself over the head with, but we have a direct quote from Vilenkin himself, end of story. 

&gt;Krauss purposefully deceived the audience to a conclusion opposite of Vilenkin's True conclusion.

Take off the tinfoil hat and look at this objectively.  

&gt;This is a demonstrable fact

Then demonstrate it.  All you've done is linked to an apologetics site that shows that *Craig* (a religious philosopher) thinks that Krauss is saying something different.  As I've showed you now (maybe ten times), Vilenkin explains that Craig is incorrect in this assertion, and that Krauss had performed an accurate summary.  If you disagree with *evidence*, then to claim your "fact" you need to shoulder the *burden of proof*.  The fact that you don't seem to grasp this is very telling.

&gt;You remain dishonest in defiance of proof.

To be in defiance of proof you need to have proof.  I've already discredited your ridiculous article by a *quote, from the founder of the argument __itself__, explaining how Krauss has done no wrong*.  I'm not sure how many more ways I need to spell this out for you, but I'm sure you'll get it eventually.

&gt;Why are you are prostituting yourself for atheism?

I'm not sure what you mean by this.  Atheism isn't a movement, it's a belief.  And I'm not sure how one can prostitute themselves to a belief.  Do you have some examples, maybe a diagram? &gt;I was just reading Bertrand Russel's criticism of Aquinas the other day and he said basically the same thing...

Damn, I *need* to read this.  Which work?  Do you have a source?It's not that philosophy isn't equipped to deal with it (many philosophers these days get second degrees in physics or neuroscience, etc.), it's that philosophy isn't about ignoring the facts, and has to adapt to new acquisition of information. 

I'd say there's still plenty to digest in a philosophical sense from what we know today, but we can't just hold on to antiquated notions that defy facts, so Aquinas is out.&gt;However, you must check your premises. In order for a chain of contingencies to begin, it's beginning must be contingent upon something

I think you're misusing the definition of contingent here.  There's basically two definitions, but they are *vitally important* to be distinguished depending on the context.  When we're talking modally, my understanding is that contingent means "possible, but not necessary."  In other words, in some accessible worlds it will hold True, in others, False, but it is not necessary nor impossible. 

Now, the second meaning seems to be the one you're employing: "contingent things depend on something else to bring them about".  But that's a bit hasty, isn't it?  After all, to accept this claim means we need to accept a universal notion of causality, and that all things must be caused.  I take issue with this leap.  Yet, without this, then we are happy to accept some contingent things as just happenstance, and that's perfectly valid.  

Once we parse these two meanings, it becomes abundantly clear that the "argument from contingency" really depends on an argument for causality, of which there are many problematic premises (Hume had much to say on this).He'll tell you it's all in these books that he can't summarize or provide theses for, but that you're mistaken according to the books.  Are you convinced now? &gt; The likelihood that someone could have worked out the nuances of quantum mechanics without actually conducting experiments is stupendously low.

I don't disagree.

&gt;It could be argued that "philosophy" of sorts could be used to formulate hypotheses to test, but it is a philosophy that is constrained by the evidence of science...so pretty much just science.

I think we're talking about different things here.  Philosophy isn't in the place to make scientific claims, that's why they're different fields.  But that doesn't mean philosophy has no place using the information acquired by science to produce new ways of thinking and observing problems in the human condition. Rather, philosophy is in the business of answering different questions than science, or in ways in which science is currently unable to answer.Oh shit, a whole dedicated chapter from one of my favorite philosophers; I'm going to eat this up.I prefer "wooey"&gt;I didn't say philosophy was no longer equipped to handle anything...just that it is no longer relevant in the endeavor of understanding how the universe itself works and what it's made of.

By and large I'm inclined to agree here, though I do think at times philosophy is still needed to parse metaphysical positions (eg. neutral monism vs. materialism vs. physicalism).  &gt;So you're saying that a contingency is not the same thing as a causal relationship? 

Yessir. 

&gt;Also, could you explain more about "some accessible worlds?" I'm not sure what exactly you mean by that.

Accessible worlds is terminology from [modal logic](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Modal_logic).  A branch of modal logic is called "possible worlds theory" which is often used in modern adaptations of the Ontological argument.  An "accessible world" means a world that in some way can map back to us, in basic terms that means all "logically possible worlds," (though there are mappings that are stricter than this).  This excludes things like married bachelors, invisible colors, and immaterial material, but allows for things like parallel universes.  If something is "necessary," it means that it is True in *every* possible world, no exceptions (clearly that makes "necessary maximum beings" a questionable notion).  "Impossible" means it's *False* in every possible world. 

In these terms, "contingent" just means it's not impossible and it's not necessary.  Or more basically, that it's True in at least one world and False in at least another.

Note that this has nothing to do with dependency on anything else (beside the truth value in other worlds).  Modal logic does not require an assumption about causality.

&gt;Thanks for your response, by the way.

Sure thing.It's not just that they think it stopped, they *refuse* to listen to actual philosophical issues raised against him.  It's like he's bullet proof because they know he's the thin veil between their argument and delusion.
&gt;The discourse of ethics is also not scientific (regardless of what Harris incorrectly says using an overly broad sense of "science")

I agree.

&gt;and the majority of philosophers are also moral realists, so ethics is still a big component of philosophy that science can't ever handle.

Also True. 

&gt;It is extremely important, but it has not usurped the positions that metaphysics, epistemology, and ethics- amongst other fields in philosophy (such as aesthetics, or philosophy of mind)- hold.
Science is bolstered by philosophy, but philosophy is certainly neither irrelevant, nor replaceable.

Exactly right.  &gt;Through thorough study of history and philosophy

What about it do you respect, exactly? 

&gt;I personally believe Christianity to be a system of "slave morality", basically teaching you to forget all the joys and wonders this life has to have in hope for a possible one in the next. What do you think?

I don't think Christians see it that way (as an ex-christian I know I didn't).  If anything they view their life as more enriching for having temperance and a goal greater than themselves.  I can respect these positions in and of themselves.  

That said, I think the bigger problem is the way of thinking.  When you believe that there's a god who governs the universe and knows all things, you (typically) respect religious authorities on matters that are not really in their sphere.  Ol' Billy Craig is one who comes to mind\u2014he's a religious philosopher with an *appreciable* understanding of Cosmology, but nowhere near sufficient enough to be making the arguments he does in the debate sphere.  What this amounts to is believers holding a particular world view about things (prison reform, choice, civil rights), that is too heavily dependent on unqualified spokesmen in lieu of objective thinking.  It sets back human progress and, in terrible cases, actually causes a substantial amount of harm.&gt;I think your comment evidences a conflation of "objectivity" with "things that can be scientifically verifiable."

You've already read far too into my comment then.  I would have said science if I meant science.  That said, I do think science is a valuable tool and often provides a lot of information to make judgments that we normally wouldn't have, but I wouldn't dream of implying it's the only objective thing out there. 

&gt;The religious voice in relation to two of the three matters you cited\u2014abortion and civil rights\u2014is not an expression of science, per se, but rather of moral and ethical reasoning.

I wouldn't have tried to argue against that. 

Also, "choice" was not specific to abortion, it was about the notion of free will and moral accountability.  If you believe in LFW, then you believe that all people's actions are of their own accord, if you do not, then at some point we must recognize that there are ways to positively change a person's behavior other than beating them over the head with "you need to change." 

&gt;Objective thinking in such matters cannot be limited to the application of the scientific method, precisely because science tells us what is (at lest in part), but philosophy and theology tell us what ought to be

I agree, but I think philosophy does an adequate and sufficient job, many times in direct conflict with what religion has to say on the matter. 

&gt;Many Christians have eminently defensible philosophical reasons for taking the positions that they do on moral issues,

Then they're using philosophy, not religion, which is still objective and still not based on religious thinking, which is what I was calling dangerous. 

&gt;advancing indeed the view that there is such thing as an objective morality that is accessible not through the scientific method but through an appreciation for those principles that we know intrinsically as human beings.

Philosophy adequately addresses this, so I don't see where religious thinking has even come into play.  It sounds as though you agree that secular thinking (philosophy and science) *together* complete an adequate picture without religion, so I again maintain that religious thinking does nothing but cloud this objective way one can think. &gt;It has a better track record than most other religions, specifically the Catholic Church.

I can't forgive the CC for the Spanish Inquisition, the Crusades, and child molestation protection.  The "best" is still a really low bar that isn't worth respect, IMO. 

&gt;It helped boost science, it helped end slavery, it started Universities, and it has the largest amounts of charities.

These things are nice, and it's nice the faith coincidentally got us to this place, but this isn't a strictly *Catholic* thing.  We could have fully reached this same place without religious backing from the start.  I'm just not sold yet that this means they deserve some sort of respect. 

&gt;I never said I don't see the appeal of certain doctrines. I personally find it distasteful.

Which is fine.

&gt; Even if it were True, I think we live in a terrifying reality.


Terrifying and exciting all in one.
Thank you kindly!&gt;The Crusades was a defensive war against Muslim aggression.

That depends on who you're asking. 

&gt;And as for the molestations, while terrible, were not as huge as many people think.

It's not about numbers, it's about the blatant disregard for justice.  These are accused men who have sexually abused children and are giving them legal asylum despite all evidence and due process.  

&gt;The Church are dicks for covering it up, but nothing in the Catholic doctrine encourages child rape, the problem wasn't what they believed, it was that they were fucking kids.

But you've uncovered a double standard: either it's the institution or the doctrine that we give credit for.  If it's the institution, then we have a clear problem.  If it's the doctrine, then I'm not sure what about the doctrine we can really credit for scientific and philosophical advancements.  It seems that the CC has at least 300 years of regression in the doctrinal sense working against them. 

&gt;I think it's pretty intellectually dishonest to ignore their historical contributions.

I'm not ignoring them, I'm asking what they should be accredited to.  Seems to me we could have done without the CC and still made this, if not more progress.  So what about this should be accredited to the doctrine itself? This is actually a pretty good response for me to mull over.  I'd have to do the historical studies myself to see if this assessment really lines up with reality, but that said, there's some good points here to consider.

My first concern, however, is that history has not necessarily shown that doctrine applied to institution always brings about a net good.  For instance, the opposition to birth control and gay marriage, the violent crimes of the dark ages, the near theocratic power the pope adorned himself at various points in history.  While I can't deny up front the benefits you've proposed, my hesitation with crediting the catholic doctrine with the outcome has to do with a spotty and inconsistent past.

In other words, this inconsistency has led me to believe that some of these were advances of blind luck, rather than intentional advancements for the sake of what those advancements bring.  Some were certainly brought about by thinkers under the *umbrella of catholicism* without necessarily being tethered to its doctrine to bring about the change.

I guess my bigger issue is that, if we give doctrine the catalyst angle of the institution, the doctrine itself, while at times beneficial, does not consistently bring about this benefit that a direct conscious effort for it would.  It's sort of like moving to a new country but failing to adopt the culture, but telling oneself they have good intentions.  At times you may succeed in being polite, but other times your intention (the doctrine) will be off-the-mark.  &gt;But you specifically cited the notion of objectivity in your earlier top-level comment, and I deny that philosophy can arrive at any sort of objectivity vis-\u00e0-vis moral standards unless it ventures into the realm of natural theology, which is an extension of philosophy that attempts to investigate the transcendent without specific reference to revelation

This is a curious position to me.  What is it about moral inquiries that requires natural theology?  It seems to me many moral components come from evolutionary advantages and rational thinking in terms of what best benefits the self (in a contractarian and empathetic sense).

&gt;However this is not appropriately "secular" precisely because it is an inquiry into God, who natural theology would posit is the standard by which morality is objectively evaluated.

I'm wondering if you think this requires natural theology because moral philosophy often requires a "does this sound actually right to me?" which isn't as rigorous as something more objective.  However, it seems hasty to suppose that objectivity requires divinity in this case.  After all, we may all perceive "red" differently, but it's still the same wavelengths that are hitting our eyes, and to me "red" doesn't require a divine source. 

&gt;Without reference to such a standard I do not see how philosophy and science can together form a comprehensive moral framework that can be properly considered 'objective.'

Naturally I disagree, but at this point it's hard to object because I'm unsure why you think moral philosophy requires a natural theology.  From what I've studied, there's never needed to be an invocation of any god, and I have a relatively normal set of morals. Hasty generalizers are my favorite!  This should be fun.

&gt;You say this, but I have yet to see a single instance where an 'agnostic atheist' type person actually attacks Aquinas rather than their own misunderstanding of Aquinas

Lucky for you, I don't agree with the term "agnostic atheist," nice generalization though\u2014I'm just an atheist.  Sounds like you're about to make a new friend.

Also, I've had numerous discussions on the topic, and I've done my own independent study.  Name the Aquinas argument, and I'll tell you precisely why I disagree.  (Hint: the arguments lack soundness).

&gt;You've decided in advance God is a delusion!

Considering I'm an ex-theist who studied apologetics and lost my faith many years later, *while still studying apologetics,* I find this hasty generalization delightful.  If you actually care about the opposition, I'm happy to share with you what makes the arguments problematic, but don't resort to ad hominem again, it doesn't help your argument look stable.

&gt;round these subreddits there's these vague mutterings like Aquinas &amp; every cosmological argument have been soundly debunked, yet nobody can actually say why.

Let me solve that problem for you: the Cosmological arguments (in all their forms) are unsound.  KCA suffers from bad scientific evidence, as well as unfounded premises, for instance.

&gt;Most of the people saying this havne't even read them.

I have.

&gt;People think they can have an opinion on this while not understanding the difference between soundness and validity.

I do.  Is this going to be a discussion about why you think logically valid arguments are sufficiently reasonable?  Because if so, I'm going to ask why you don't believe Russell's Teapot is really out there in space. 

&gt;I mean holy shit there are legitimate ways to disagree with Aquinas but the overwhelming majority of the time, around these parts, the disagreement is just a mix of bias and confusion.

I see a fairly heterogeneous mixture. 

&gt;Generally some reading has to be done in order to understand something.

I've done it.  But you can't just leave it at that.  It's also on the defender to be able to justify their position.  Every time I've engaged here, I leave on a sour note because the defender of the argument just leaves with "it would take a book," which is absolute bullshit (and I'll call anyone on it if he or she devolves to this).  Even tomes with tremendous chapters have theses and summaries for what the content is about.  Then when things are unclear, they get unpacked, and things that are agreed upon, are agreed.  

To cut to the chase with Aquinas, his premises are prescriptive, not descriptive.  So naturally you'll see the patterns of causality (eg. Unmoved Mover) because they've already been prescribed.  That's not how to justify a sound argument, however.

&gt;I'll settle for maybe someday people at least not attacking the Kalam while thinking they are attacking Aquinas.

Lucky for you I know the difference. 

&gt;PS: If you hadn't, to use the top of this comment chain's word, presupposed that belief in God is delusional you might realize that not agreeing with you isn't actually the same as refusing to listen.

And *your hurt feelings* has clouded your judgment and led you to a False generalization of me.  I didn't say I reject the arguments because the belief is delusional, I simply said I find the belief delusional (and that theists depend on Aquinas's arguments to maintain a supposed reasonable position for god).  I disagree with the arguments for entirely different reasons. That's just because he's referring to the prime mover argument (or unmoved mover), which is also problematic for different reasons.Don't bother, he's an idiot.&gt; Where does this fact fit into your worldview?

I agree that he doesn't know shit about philosophy and has a poor attitude in general, which is why I only ever cite him when I'm talking about physics.  

edit: So what's your point?&gt;Here is Vilenkin's unambiguous quote

You've completely forgotten how I already addressed this, and how Vilenkin was talking about an __eternal past__, which is *different* from a __timeless__ entity (such as quantum fields).  But since your dumb dumb brain seems unable to grasp what I've been trying to tell you, let's play devil's advocate for a moment.  Let's pretend that what you *think* Vilenkin is saying is what he's actually saying.  He is quoted saying this in 2006.  Guess when the Facebook post Krauss wrote confirming Vilenkin's support of his position was written.  __2013.__

Even if we granted your quotation as being relevant (which would require a significant degree of scientific ignorance), you'd have to accept the fact that, *since then*, Vilenkin has admitted that Krauss's interpretation of the argument still allows for what he was positing.  I don't know how else to get the fact that you're wrong across to you, but here's hoping stooping to your level of ignorance will get us somewhere. 

&gt;You are lying outright to claim Krauss was 'saying something different' by butchering Vilenkin's email to completely reverse the conclusions. 

I don't know how a post by *Vilenkin himself* can be lying, but I'd be interested to see how you aim to prove that.  

Does adding it here somehow make you accept it more?  Here: 

&gt;&gt;"In response to the noise regarding the use of an email communication between the two of us in a dialogue with William Lane Craig, there are two relevant points we have decided to make.

&gt;&gt;1. we both willingly agreed to the request from Dr. Craig to have the full email, which had been edited on the powerpoint slide simply to save time during a 15 minute presentation by Krauss, as there was nothing in the full correspondence that either of us were concerned about sharing.

&gt;&gt;2. we both agree that the edited version does not distort the content or ideas expressed in the original email at all. Those who are claiming otherwise, including apparently Dr. Craig, are mistaken.

&gt;&gt;Lawrence Krauss and Alex Vilenkin"

[Confirmed facebook post, 9/24/2013](https://www.facebook.com/permalink.php?id=54809333509&amp;story_fbid=10151721132708510).

&gt;You have lost this debate on the merits.

This is not an argument.  Nice opinion though.

&gt;Of course, you can keep shoveling BS to deflect and obfuscate from the fact you have lost badly, but you are just prostituting yourself for atheism.

I'm sorry, but I just can't help but find it hilarious that plain-english quotes __with citations__ and scientifically backed statements are "obfuscatory" to you.  

You never explained what prostituting myself to a belief was, but I'm interested in what you think that means.

&gt;Pretending you don't know what I mean and asking for diagrams is just more dishonesty. You know exactly what I mean.

I sincerely don't.  The